DEPARTMENT OFTHE ARMY PAMPHLET 27-100-92 D 0 MILITARY LAW REVIEW VOL. 92 Introduction: Criminal Law Symposium ARTICLES Privileges Under the Military Rules of Evidence Inconsistent Defenses in Criminal Cases Gustavus Adolphus and Military Justice
PUBLICATIONS RECEIVED AND BRIEFLY NOTED
VOLUME INDEX
HEADQUARTERS, DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY
SPRING 1981
Pamphlet N O. 27 -100 -92
1 )
HEADQUARTERS DEPARTMENT OF THE ARMY Washington, D.C., Spring 1981
MILITARY LAW REVIEW-VOL. 92 (USPS 482 -130)
Title Introduction: Criminal Law Symposium Major Percival D. Park., ................................
ARTICLES: Privileges Under the Military Rules of Evidence Captain Joseph A. Woodruff..
...........................
Inconsistent Defenses in Criminal Cases Major James F. Nagle ...................................
Gustavus Adolphus and Military Justice Lieutenant Colonel Norman G. Cooper
Page 1
5
77
...................129 ....
139 201
PUBLICATIONS RECEIVED AND BRIEFLY NOTED..
INDEX FOR VOLUME 92
..................................
i
MILITARY LAW REVIEW (USPS 482-130) EDITORIAL POLICY: The Military Law Review provides a forum for those interested in military law to share the products of their experience and research.
Writings offered for publication should be of direct concern and import in this area of scholarship, and preference will be given to those writings having lasting value as reference material for the military lawyer.
The Military Law Review does not purport to promulgate Depart ment of the Army policy or to be in any sense directory.
The opinions reflected in each writing are those of the author and do not necessarily reflect the views of The Judge Advocate General or any governmental agency.
Masculine pronouns appearing in the pam phlet refer to both genders unless the context indicates another use.
SUBMISSION OF WRITINGS: Articles, comments, recent development notes, and book reviews should be submitted typed in duplicate, double spaced, to the Editor, Military Law Review, The Judge Advocate General's School, U.S. Army, Charlottesville, Virginia 22901.
Footnotes should be doubled spaced and should appear as a separate appendix at the end of the text.
Footnotes should be numbered consecutively from beginning to end of a writing, not chapter by chapter.
Citations should conform to the Uniform System of Citation (12th ed., 6th prtg., 1980) copyrighted by the Columbia, Harvard, and University of Pennsylvania Law Reviews and the Yale Law Journal.
Typescripts should include biographical data concerning the author or authors.
This data should consist of rank or other title; present and immediate past positions or duty assignments: all degrees, with names of granting schools and years received; bar ad missions; and previous publications.
If the article was a speech or was prepared in partial fulfillment of degree requirements, the author should include date and place of delivery of the speech or the source of the degree.
EDITORIAL REVIEW: The Editorial Board of the Military Law Reviewconsists of the Deputy Commandant of the Judge Advocate General's School; the Director, Developments, Doctrine, and Literature Department; and the Editor of the Review.
They are ii
assisted by subject - matter experts from the School's Academic Department.
The Board will evaluate all material submitted for publication.
In determining whether to publish an article, comment, note or book review, the Board will consider the item's substantive accuracy, comprehensiveness, organization, clarity, timeliness, originality and value to the military legal community.
There is no minimum or maximum length requirement.
When a writing is accepted for publication, a copy of the edited manuscript will be provided to the author for prepublication ap proval.
However, minor alterations may be made in subsequent stages of the publication process without the approval of the author.
Because of contract limitations, neither galley proofs nor page proofs are provided to authors.
Italicized headnotes, or summaries, are inserted at the beginning of most writings published in the Review, after the author's names.
These notes are prepared by the Editor of the Review as an aid to readers.
Reprints of published writings are not available.
However, authors receive complimentary copies of the issues in which their writings appear.
Additional copies are usually available in limited quantities.
They may be requested from the Editor of the Review.
SUBSCRIPTIONS AND BACK ISSUES: Interested persons should contact the Superintendent of Documents, United States Government Printing Office, Washington, D.C. 20402, for subscrip tions.
Effective immediately, the subscription price is $10.00 a year for domestic mailing, and $12.50 for foreign mailing.
A single copy is $4.00 for domestic mailing, and $5.00 for foreign mailing.
Please note that these are increases over the prices published in DA Pam phlet 27-100-89 (Volume 89 (fall 1980)).
Inquiries concerning subscriptions for active Army legal offices on pinpoint distribution should be addressed to the U.S. Army AG Publications Center, ATTN: Distribution Management Division, 2800 Eastern Boulevard, Baltimore, MD 21220.
Back issues for in dividual military personnel are also available through the U.S. Ar my AG Publications Center.
Bound copies are not available, and subscribers should make their own arrangements for binding if desired.
iii
REPRINT PERMISSION: Contact the Editor, Military Law Review, The Judge Advocate General's School, Charlottesville, Virginia 22901.
The primary Military Law Review indices are volume 91 (winter 1981) and volume 81 (summer 1978).Volume 81 covered all writings in volumes 1 through 80, and replaced all previous Review indices.
Volume 91 covers writings in volumes 75 through 90 (excluding Volume 81), and replaces the volume indices in Volumes 82 through 90.
Volume indices appear in volume 92 (spring 1981) and later volumes.
Military Law Review articles are also indexed in the Advance Bibliography of Contents: Political Science and Government; Legal Contents (C.C.L.P.);Index to Legal Periodicals; Monthly Catalog of United States Government Publications; Law Review Digest; In dex to U.S. Government Periodicals; Legal Resources Index; two computerized data bases, the Public Affairs Information Service and The Social Service Citation Index; and other indexing services.
Issues of the Military Law Review are reproduced on microfiche in Current U.S. Government Periodicals on Microfiche, by Infordata International Incorporated, Chicago, Illinois.
This issue of the Review may be cited 92 Mil. L. Rev. (number of page) (spring 19811.
iv
INTRODUCTION: CRIMINAL LAW SYMPOSIUM Three articles on diverse aspects of military justice are presented in this issue of the Military Law Review.
This is the fourth criminal law symposium issue that the Review has presented since the sym posium series commenced with volume 80, spring 1978.
Previous issues devoted to criminal law are volume 84, spring 1979; volume 87, winter 1980; and volume 88, spring 1980.
In the opening article, Captain Woodruff discusses section V of the new Military Rules of Evidence.
These Rules, replacing chapter XXVII of the Manual for Courts - Martial, govern the use of all types of testimony, documents, and physical evidence, as evidence in court - martial proceedings.
The Military Rules, which become ef fective on 1 September 1980, are largely based upon the Federal Rules of Evidence, promulgated in 1975 for use by United States district courts and magistrates.
The text and analysis of the Military Rules may be found in Appendix 18, Manual for Courts' Martial, added to the Manual by Change 3.
Section V of the Military Rules of Evidence sets forth rules governing use of privileged communications as evidence.
Ex amples of such communications include confidential discussions between lawyer and client, priest and penitent, and husband and wife.
Others less obvious include the Government's privilege of protecting the identity of clandestine criminal informants, the political vote privilege, and the secrecy of deliberations of courts and juries.
Information which has been given a security classifica tion or is otherwise considered sensitive by the Government is also subject to privilege.
An article concerning section V should be especially helpful to judge advocates practicing in the field.
While most provisions of the Military Rules are similar to if not identical with the Federal Rules, section V represents a major exception.
The drafters of the Federal Rules originally proposed an extensive codification of the law of privileges.
However, this part of their work proved extreme ly controversial for many unrelated reasons.
Congress disapproved the proposed section V and substituted a short provision that simp ly preserves prior law intact.
Section V in the Military Rules is based in part on the rejected section V of the Federal Rules.
During the past several years a con-
1
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
siderable body of case law and scholarly commentary has grown up around the portions of the Federal Rules which were approved, and all this law is available for use by military attorneys.
Unfortunate ly, little or no such guidance concerning the section V privileges has evolved, except for a few portions taken more or less intact from the Manual for Courts - Martial.
Captain Woodruff's ground - breaking article is followed by "In consistent Defense in Criminal Cases," by Major James F. Nagle.
Criminal defendants occasionally present two or more defenses which may seem to contradict one another.
The defense may con tend, for example, that the defendant did not commit the crime, but that if he did, he was entrapped by government agents, or commit ted an act of violence in self - defense, or took a piece of property under the reasonable but mistaken belief that it belonged to him.
Such defense contentions are not always as illogical as at first they may seem.
The defendant may present one theory, and the government's evidence may raise another entirely different defense.
It is clearly in the defendant's best interests to use both theories if at all possible.
In other cases, such as denial of guilt and assertion of insanity, the defenses are not truly inconsistent.
Fur ther, some courts have felt that, in the case of a defense such as en trapment, the public policy considerations behind the defense are so strong that it should be permitted even if inconsistent with another defense.
Major Nagle provides an extensive review of the federal, state, and military case law on use of inconsistent defenses.
He sorts out the various jurisdictions according to the extent, if any, that their appellate courts have permitted presentation of such defenses.
He concludes that inconsistent defenses are generally permitted in American jurisprudence, but that there are still some major in consistencies in treatment of such defenses between the various jurisdictions, which should be rectified.
Our concluding article by Lieutenant Colonel Norman G. Cooper is a note on military legal history.
Modern western military criminal law and procedure are descended in part from the Swedish Articles of War of 1621, promulgated by King Gustavus I1 Adolphus (1595-1632).This monarch's reputation is based upon his military genius during the Thirty Years' War, a complex religious and economic conflict which tore northern Europe apart in the ear ly seventeenth century.
Gustavus Adolphus initiated extensive
2
19811
CRIMINAL LAW
reforms in the recruitment, training, leadership, and support of soldiers, and not the least important were his efforts at moderniza tion of disciplinary practices.
Lieutenant Colonel Cooper discusses the relationship between the Articles of 1621 and our present Uniform Code of Military Justice.
The Military Law Review is pleased to present these articles on criminal law and procedure and legal history.
All of them are valuable additions to the growing body of military legal literature.
PERCIVAL D. PARK Major, JAGC Editor, Military Law Review
3
PRIVILEGES UNDER THE MILITARY RULES OF EVIDENCE* by Captain Joseph A. Woodruff**
The Military Rules of Evidence became law in 1980 by executive order of the President.
The new rules are based largely upon the Federal Rules of Evidence, signed into law in 1975, and upon former chapter XXVII of the Manual for Courts - Martial.
Captain Woodruff'sarticle focuses on section V of the Military Rules.
This section states rules concerningprivileged communications, such as statements made to an attorney by a client.
Captain Woodruff reviews section V, rule by rule, and compares its text with that of the previous Manual provisions, and with the text of :;heprivilege rules proposed by the drafters of the Federal Rules of Evidence but rejected by Congress.
He concludes that for the most part the new rules do not represent a drastic change from prior military law, and that in certain respects they improve significantly upon that law.
I. INTRODUCTION This article reviews the military law of privileged communica tions.
Statements made by certain persons within protected rela tionships are protected by the law from forced disclosure on the witness stand, at the option of one of the participants in the rela tionship.'
Well - known examples include statements made in the `This article is based upon an essay submitted by the author in partial fulfillment of the requirements for the degree of Juris Doc`- ' at the University of Alabama School of Law.
The opinions and conclusions presented in this article are those of the author and do not necessarily represent the views of The Judge Advocate General's School, the Department of the Army, or any other governmental agency.
**United States Army.
The author is on active duty and studying law under the Funded Legal Education Program, with impending branch transfer from the Field Artillery to the Judge Advocate General's Corps.
B.A., University of Alabama, 1974; distinguished military graduate, U.S. Army ROTC, 1974; student, University of Alabama School of Law, 1978 -1981; Hugo L. Black Scholar, 1980; J.D. expected 1981.
'Black's Law Dictionary 1078 (5th ed. 1979).
5
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
context of an attorney - client relationship, or between priest and penitent, or husband and wife, and sometimes doctor and patient.
In civilian proceedings, the law of privileged communications is generally part of the common law, varying from state to state.
At the federal level, an ambitious attempt was made to codify the law of privileged communications in section V of the Federal Rules of Evidences2This attempt was rebuffed by Congress when the pro posed rules were enacted in 197E1.~ Section V as it now reads is a
9ee the Notes of the House and Senate Committees on the Judiciary, the text of which is reproduced after Rule 501 of the Federal Rules of Evidence, 28 U.S.C. app., at 556-58 (1976).
Article V or section V of the Rules consists of Rule 501 above.
As originally pro posed by the United States Supreme Court, that section contained thirteen aroposed rules.
Nine different non - constitutional privileges were defined.
Thesc were: required reports privileged by statute, the lawyer - client privilege, the physicianpatient or psychotherapist.patient privilege, the husband - wife privilege, the clergyman.penitent privilege, a political vote privilege, a trade secrets privilege, a privilege for secrets of state and other official information, and identity of criminal informants.
The Congress disapproved the proposed section V. See discussion in footnote 3, infra.
Extensive information about the proposed but rejected rules may be found in the two editions of the Federal Rules of Evidence Manual by Professors Kenneth R. Redden and Stephen A. Saltzburg of the University of Virginia School of Law.
The 1975 edition sets forth the text of a Library of Congress research report at pages 114-28 prepared by a Mr. Charles Doyle in 1973 for the House Judiciary Committee.
The 1977 edition includes the text of the rejected rules themselves.
The 1977 edition and its 1980 supplement are reviewed by Lieutenant Colonel Herbert J. Green at 89 Mil. L. Rev. 96 (1980) and are briefly noted at 89 Mil. L. Rev. 130 (19801.
The Federal Rules of Evidence were prepared chiefly by an Advisory Committee on Rules of Evidence appointed by Chief Justice Earl Warren in 1965.
The Commit. tee's initial draft, completed in 1969, was made available for comment by the bench and bar and was extensively revised before it was approved by the Supreme Court and was submitted to Congress in 1973.
Following congressional approval, Presi dent Ford signed the Federal Rules into law on January 2, 1975, as Pub. L. No. 93595, 88 Stat. 1926, effective 180 days later.
K. Redden 
'According to the Notes of the House and Senate Committees on the Judiciary, sec tion V as originally written was rejected by Congress because it was too controver sial.
Most of the proposed provisions were vigorously attacked by critics, for many different reasons; no concise summary of objections is possible.
The congressional committees concluded that section V would have to be sacrificed to make possible the passage of the remainder of the Federal Rules of Evidence.
Apparently no other section of the proposed rules was changed so drastically by Congress.
K. Redden 
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
relatively short statement that privileges "shall be governed by the principles of the common law as they may be interpreted by the courts of the United States in the light of reason and e~perience."~ In military practice, the law of privileged communications was formerly set forth in chapter XXVII of the Manual for CourtsMartial,5 replaced in 1980 by the Military Rules of Evidencee6Since 1950, military courts have been obliged by statute to conform their procedures and modes of proof to those recognized in the trial of criminal cases in the United States district court^.^ Accordingly, large portions of the Military Rules of Evidence were taken with lit tle or no change from the Federal Rules of Evidence.* As an excep tion, section V of the Military Rules differs drastically from section V in the Federal Rules.
The military section V is an elaborate 4Fed.
R. Evid. 501.
In civil actions in which the rule of decision is found in state rather than federal law, state law, not federal law, controls any privileges asserted.
Id.
5Manual for Courts - Martial, United States, 1969 (Rev. ed.), ch. XXVII [hereinafter cited in text and footnotes as MCM or as Manual].
The text of the Military Rules of Evidence may be found in the new Appendix 18 to the Manual for Courts - Martial, added by Change 3, dated 1 September 1980; and also in West's Military Justice Reporter, at 8 M.J. LXVII through CCXXXIX (1980).
6Exec.
Order No. 12,198, 45 Fed.
Reg. 16,932 (1980).
This order was signed by Presi dent Ca,.er on March 12, 1980, effective prospectively from September 1, 1980.
For discussion of the Military Rules of Evidence and comparison between them and the old chapter XXVII of the Manual for Courts - Martial, note 5, supra, see the sym posium issue, May 1980, of The Army Lawyer, the monthly companion to the quarterly Military Law Review.
See note 8, infra.
710 U.S.C. รยง 836(a) (19761, or U.C.M.J. art.
36(a).
The Uniform Code of Military Justice, 64 stat. 108 (1950), as amended, in 140 numbered articles, is codified at 10 U.S.C. 5s 801-940 (1976).
Cases in which the Court of Military Appeals has changed military evidentiary law to conform to federal practice include United States v. Johnson, 3 M.J. 143 (C.M.A. 1977), concerning admissibility of statements against penal interest as an exception to the hearsay rule; and United States v. Miller, 23 C.M.A. 247,49 C.M.R. 380 (19731, concerning admissibility of laboratory reports as business entries.
*Comparison of the texts of the Federal and Military Rules of Evidence reveals that the texts of sections I, 11, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, X, and XI are similar.
Many rules in these sections are identical or nearly so.
The others are at least analogous.
Sections I11 and V, however, differ greatly as between the two sets of rules.
Section V is the subject of this article.
Section I11 in the Federal Rules of Evidence consists only of two articles on presumptions and the applicability of state law in civil actions and proceedings.
Fed.
R. Evid. 301,302.
Such provisions of course have no relevance to military prac tice, which does not encompass civil trials.
Instead, section I11 of the Military Rules
7
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
codification of the law of privileged communications,g and is similar in many respects to the proposed codification which Con gress rejected for the Federal Rules.'o This article focuses on section V of the Military Rules, comparing its twelve rules with prior military law and practice on the subject, and with the privilege rules proposed by the framers of the Federal Rules but rejected by Congress.
In addition to the privileges themselves, waiver of privileges and involuntary disclosure of privileged information are briefly discussed.
Mention is made also of the problems of comment by an adverse party on his or her oppo nent's assertion of a privilege, and adverse inferences drawn by a jury from such assertion.
of Evidence codifies and imposes order upon the federal common law of exclusions constitutionally mandated by the fourth and fifth amandments to the US.
Constitu. tion.
For a discussion of the fourth amendment aspects of the M.R.E., see Eisenberg, Fourth Amendment Practice and the Military Rules of Evidence, The Army Lawyer, May 1980, at 30.
For a discussion of the Military Rules' fifth amendment aspects, see Basham.
Suppression Motions Under the Military Rules of Evidence, The Army Lawyer, May 1980, at 17, and Schlueter, Bodily Evidence and Rule 312, M.R.E., The Army Lawyer, May 1980, at 35.
The May 1980 issue the The Army Lawyeris a sym. posium issue containing seven short articles on the Military Rules written by members of the faculty of The Judge Advocate General's School, Charlottesville, Virginia.
Note 6, supra.
Section I11 of the Military Rules is entitled, "Exclusionary Rules and Related Matters Concerning Self.Incrimination, Search and Seizure, and Eyewitness Iden tification."
It consists of fourteen separate numbered rules and is one of the largest sections.
The many topics covered include, but are not limited to: self - incrimination (Mil. R. Evid. 301), confessions and admissions (Mil. R. Evid. 304), rights warnings (Mil. R. Evid. 305), unlawful searches and seizures (Mil. R. Evid. 3111, probable cause (Mil. R. Evid. 314, 3151, and eyewitness identification (Mil. R. Evid. 3211.
(The rules in section 111 as published are not numbered consecutively: nos. 307-310 and 318-320 are reserved for future use.)
%ection V of the Military Rules of Evidence consists of twelve numbered rules.
Like section 111, it is one of the largest sections in the Military Rules.
`"The lawyer - client privilege (Mil. R. Evid. 5021, the privilege for communications to the clergy (Mil. R. Evid. 5031, the husband - wife privilege (Mil. R. Evid. 504), the privilege protecting the identity of informants (Mil. R. Evid. 5071, and the political vote privilege (Mil, R. Evid. 509) are all similar to or analogous with privileges found among the section V rules proposed for the Federal Rules by the Supreme Court but rejected by Congress.
The rule on classified information (Mil. R. Evid. 505) and that on government information other than classified information (Mil. R. Evid. 506) are loosely analogous with the proposed privilege for secrets of state and other official information.
The Military Rules include no provision for required reports privileged by statute, an extremely limited physician - patient privilege, and no privilege for trade secrets.
Concerning the physician.patient privilege, see Mil. R. Evid. 501(d). and also notes 14 through 26 and accompaning text, infra.
The Rules do include a privilege for deliberations of courts and juries (Mil. R. Evid. 5091 not found among the proposed Federal Rules.
8
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
11.
RULE 501: GENERAL PROVISIONS Rule 501 states the nature and scope of evidentiary privileges allowed under the new rules.
" Neither its limited incorporation of federal rules1*nor its provision describing the kinds of assertions available to a privilege holder13 are significant departures from prior practice.
"Rule 501 reads as follows: (a) A person may not claim a privilege with respect to any matter except as required by or provided for in: (1) The Constitution of the United States as applied to members of the armed forces; (2) An Act of Congress applicable to trials by courts - martial; (3)These rules or this Manual; or (4) The principles of common law generally recognized in the trial of criminal cases in the United States district courts pursuant to rule 501 of the Federal Rules of Evidence insofar as the application of such principles in trials by courts - martial is practicable and not contrary to or inconsistent with the Uniform Code of Military Justice, these rules, or this Manual.
(b) A claim of privilege includes, but is not limited to the assertion by any person of a privilege to: (1)Refuse to be a witness; (2) Refuse to disclose any matter; (3)Refuse to produce any object or writing; or (4) Prevent another from being a witness or disclosing any matter or pro ducing any object or writing.
(c) The term " person " includes an appropriate representative of the federal government, a State, or political subdivision thereof or any other en tity claiming to be the holder of a privilege.
(dl Notwithstanding any other provision of these rules, information not otherwise privileged does not become privileged on the basis that it was ac quired by a medical officer or civilian physician in a professional capacity.
Mil. R. Evid. 501 "Mil R. Evid. 50l(a)(4),id. Note, however, Rule 1102 of the Military Rules, which automatically incorporates into those rules any amendment to the Federal Rules of Evidence.
Amendment of the Military Rules under this provision takes effect 180 days after the effective date of amendment of the Federal Rules, in the absence of contrary action by the President.
13Mil.R.
Evid. 501(b).
9
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
Subdivision (d) is a reiteration of the military's longstanding In nonrecognition of any physician - patient pri~i1ege.l~ United States v. Wright,15the Army Court of Military Review held that so long as the medical officer was engaged in his professional capacity as a physician, and was not acting as an investigator, all statements made to him by the accused were nonprivileged and could be received into evidence.
The physician in Wright was a doc tor on duty at the base hospital whom the accused had sought out voluntarily.
That fact distinguishes Wright from cases involving compulsory psychiatric evaluations or sanity boards.16 The argu ment was made that during such compulsory examinations the physician had an investigative or quasi - judicial function; therefore statements by the accused merited protection, as surely as if he or she were being interrogated by a CID investigator.
This issue was resolved in a series of cases.
In United States v. Shaw," a 1958 decision of the Army Court of Military Review, the court found that if a physician - patient privilege existed, the accused had waived it at trial by failing to object and by introduc ing similar evidence himself.
Having thus disposed of the case, the court did not reach the issue of whether a privilege attached.
In the 1959 case of United States v. Burke,'B the defense alleged that sec'"he former paragraph l5ld2) of the Manual for Courts - Martial stated: (2) Communications to medical officers and civilian physicians.
It is the duty of medical officers to supply medical services to members of the armed forces, to make periodical physical examinations as required by regula. tions, and to examine persons for appointment and enlistment, and medical officers may be specifically directed to observe, examine, or attend members of the armed forces.
This observation, examination, or attendance is official and the information thereby acquired is official.
Although the ethics of the medical profession forbid medical officers and civilian physi cians to disclose without authority information acquired when acting in a professional capacity, no privilege attaches to this information or to statements made to them by patients.
158
C.M.R. 850 (A.C.M.R.1953).
16SeeM.C.RI..supranote 5, para. 121
Paragraph 121 of the Manual, note 5, supra, has been extensively revised in sec tion 11 of Exec.
Order No. 12,198, to set forth a new test for insanity and to make clear that the results of compulsory psychiatric or sanity evaluations are indeed privileged.
For the text of the new paragraph 121, see 8 .MM.J. CCXXXIII (1980).For an explanation of the change.
see the analysis following Rule 302.
at 8 M.J. XCV 11980).
"9 C.M.A. 267.26 C.M.R. 47 (1958).
'Y28C.M.R.604(A.C.M.R. 19591.
10
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
tion 4244 of Title 18, United States Code,lg applied in the military.
This statute prevents admission into evidence on the issue of guilt of statements made by an accused during a sanity or competency examination, The then - Army Board of Review opined that section 4244 was not applicable to trials by courts - martial, but stated that it was not forced to so hold since the government psychiatrist did not testify to any statements made by the accused.
The question was finally put to rest in 1966 in United States v. Wimberley,zO where the Court of Military Appeals held that the privilege established by section 4244 was not applicable to military criminal practice.
The Court reasoned that paragraph 121 of the Manualz1 was the military equivalent of section 4244 in that it established a preliminary proceeding to determine mental capacity.
Therefore, paragraph 151d2) of the Manualzzwas dispositive of the privilege provision.
Rule 501(d) does not disturb these precedents.
Rule 302, however, gives the accused a privilege to prevent any statement made by him during a mental examination, ordered under paragraph 121, from being received into evidence.z3 The privilege created by Rule 302 goes further than the section 4244 privilege.
Section 4244 restricted the admission of such statements on the issue of guilt.
Rule 302 prevents their use both on 1918U.S.C. para. 4244 reads in pertinent part:
sanity or mental competency provided for by this section, whether the ex amination shall be with or without the consent of the accused, shall be ad mitted in evidence against the accused on the issue of guilt in any criminal proceeding.
2016C.M.A.
3,36 C.M.R. 159 (C.M.A. 1966).
21Note16, supra.
22Note14, supra.
23Rule302(a),Mil. R. Evid., reads as follows: (a) General rule.
The accused has a privilege to prevent any statement made by the accused at a mental examination ordered under paragraph 121 of this Manual and any derivative evidence obtained through use of such a statement from being received into evidence against the accused on the issue of guilt or innocence or during sentencing proceedings.
This privilege may be claimed by the accused notwithstanding the fact that the accused may have been warned of the rights provided by rule 305 at the examina tion.
No statement made by the accused in the course of any examination into his
11
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
the merits and in sentencing.24 Subdivision (b) of Rule 302 creates an exception to the privilege when the accused first introduces such statements into evidenceaZ5 Subdivision (c)establishes a mechanism whereby the government may gain access to such statements.
If the accused opens the door by offering expert testimony concerning his or her mental condi tion, the military judge may order release of the examination report to the prosecution, with the accused's statements excised.
And should the defense offer a portion of the accused's statements into evidence, the military judge may, in the interest of justice, order the release of all such statements.26 The 1966 holding in Wimberley has not been repealed, however, and section 4244 has not been made applicable to courts - martial.
Rules 302 and 501(d), taken together, replace paragraph 151c(2) of the Manual.
As explained above, Rule 302 is a privilege of broader application than its 8 4244 counterpart.
And neither the federal cases nor the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure have fashioned any exceptions to 8 4244 which correspond to those found in Rule 302(c).
What has occurred, however, is of practitioners.
The new rules retain of a physician - patient privilege, but for statements made by an accused mental examination.
2p
great significance to military the traditional nonrecognition they create a limited privilege during the course of a pretrial
Id. 25Rule302(b),Mil. R. Evid., reads thusly: (b)Exceptions.
(1) There is no privilege under this rule when the accused first introduces into evidence such statements or derivative evidence.
(21 An expert witness may testify as to the reasons for the expert's conclu sions and the reasons therefor as to the mental state of the accused, but such testimony may not extend to statements of the accused except as pro vided in (1).
z6Rule302(c),Mil. R. Evid., is as follows: (c) Release of evidence.
If the defense offers expert testimony concerning the mental condition of the accused, the military judge, upon motion, shall order the release to the prosecution of the full contents, other than any statements made by the accused, of any report prepared pursuant to paragraph 121 of this Manual.
If the defense offers statements made by the accused at such examination, the military judge may upon motion order the disclosure of such statements made by the accused and contained in the report as may be necessary in the interests of justice.
12
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
111.
RULE 502: THE ATTORNEY - CLIENT PRIVILEGE
Of all the confidential relationships for which evidentiary privileges may be granted, those of husband and wife, and of at torney and client are two whose roots penetrate so far into the history of the common law that their protection is almost assumed as a matter of course.
Of course, any evidentiary privilege is an im pediment to the judicial search for truth and must be justified by sound policy.
The attorney - client privilege rests on three stout pillars.
First is the salutory purpose of encouraging frank and open discussion between the lawyer and his client.
The second justifica tion is that the attorney, by his representation of his client, is in ef fect his client's alter ego, and the attorney - client privilege is a vicarious extension of the privilege against self - incrimination.
Finally, the privilege is a reflection of the lawyer's duty to preserve the confidences of his client.27This third consideration has found expression in the American Bar Association's Code of Professional Responsibility.28 The military justice system recognized the necessity of the attorney - client privilege and expressly incorporated it into the
27For a discussion of the background and policy of the privilege, see Radin, The Privilege of Confidential Communications between Lawyer and Client, 16 Calif.
L. Rev. 487 (1928).
For a discussion of the privilege in military practice, see Oldham, Privileged Communications in Military Law, 5 Mil. L. Rev. 17 (July 19591, and Fontanella, Privileged Communications: The Personal Privilege, 37 Mil. L. Rev. 155 (Jan. 1967).
A recent article discussing the lawyer - client privilege in military law is The AttorneyClient Privilege under Military Rule of Evidence 502, by Captain Kenneth Gale, JAGC, U.S. Army, published at 12 The Advocate 335 (1980).Captain Gale con cludes that Rule 502 is an improvement over prior law, combing the best of the old Manual provisions and the best of the proposed Federal Rule.
Id. at 352.
Captain Gale is assigned to the Defense Appellate Division, U.S. Army Legal Services Agen. cy, Falls Church, Virginia.
28Canon 4 of the ABA Code of Professional Responsibility states, "A Lawyer Should Preserve the Confidences and Secrets of a Client."
This is given substantive content by the texts of Ethical Considerations 4-1 through 4 - 6, and Disciplinary Rule 4.101.
Rule 1.7, Confidential Information, of the ABA Model Rules of Profes sional Conduct (1980), deals in part with the privileged nature of lawyerdient com munications.
13
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[ VOL. 92
Manual.29As was the case in civilian courts, the privilege extended to "[c]ommunications between a client or his agent, and his at torney or the agent of the attorney, if made while the relationship of client and attorney was in existence, made in connection with that relationship, and under circumstances not indicating a lack of confidentialit~."~O Thus stated, the rule was subject to two important exceptions.
First, no privilege attached where the communication "clearly contemplated the future commission of a fraud or crime."31Second, when a person outside the privileged relationship gained knowledge of the confidential matter by either accident or design, the right to invoke the privilege was Since the privilege is designed to protect the relationship that ex ists between attorney and client, one of the threshold requirements is that such a relationship must exist.
Whether such a relationship exists is a question of fact.
The military courts have held that the mere designation by a convening authority of appointed counsel does not create an attorney - client relationship in the absence of an acceptance of the appointment by the accused.33Likewise, the ex istence of the relationship has been held not to depend upon the legal qualifications of counsel,34and the privilege may attach even though the counsel is not a lawyer.35Similarly, the existence of the 2tl
Communications between a client or his agent and an attorney or his agent, such as the attorney's clerk, stenographer, or other associate.
are privileged when made while the relationship of client and attorney existed in connec tion with that relationship, unless the communications clearly con. templated the future commission of a fraud or crime, for instance, perjury or subornation of perjury.
Manual for Courts - martial, note 5 supra, para. 151b(2),page 27-60
30J.
Munster 
Military Evidence, 9 8.6.c.l.
at page 312, 3'Note 29, supra.
32 Id. 33UnitedStates v. Brady.
8 C.M.A. 456,24 C.M.R. 266 (1957).
34UnitedStates v. Bennett, 28 C.M.R. 650 (N.C.M.R. 1959).
35Thereis no requirement that legally qualified defense counsel be appointed for an accused at a summary court - martial.
Art.
27, U.C.M.J., 10 U.S.C. 5 827 (1976).
Defense counsel at special courts - martial may be nonlawyers if military exigencies are such that legally qualified counsel are not available.
M.C.M., note 5, supra, para. 8 c. Discussion of who is and is not a "lawyer" may be found at Mil. R. Evid. 502(b)(2): 12) A "lawyer" is a person authorized, or reasonably believed by the client to be authorized, to practice law; or a member of the armed forces detailed, assigned, or otherwise provided to represent a person in a court - martial
14
19811
E VIDE NTIARY PRIVILEGE S
privilege does not depend upon the kind of proceeding that occa sioned the establishment of the attorney - client relati~nship.~~ Rule 502 of the Military Rules of Evidence does not substantially alter the traditional attorney - client privilege, and, except for ex pressly extending the privilege to nonlawyer counsel, it is a mirror image of proposed Federal Rule 503.
As written, the rule creates a privilege held by the client protecting against disclosure "confiden tial communications made for the purpose of facilitating the rendi tion of professional legal services to the client."37 The rule goes on to create five exceptions to the privilege, one of which, the future crimes exception, had a counterpart in prior practice.
Of the re -
case or in any military investigation or proceeding.
The term "lawyer" does not include a member of the armed forces serving in a capacity other than as a judge advocate, legal officer, or law specialist as defined in Article 1, unless the member: (a) is detailed, assigned, or otherwise provided to repre sent a person in a court - martial case or in any military investigation or pro ceeding; (b)is authorized by the armed forces, or reasonably believed by the client to be authorized, to render professional legal services to members of the armed forces; or (c) is authorized to practice law and renders profes sional legal services during off - duty employment.
36Rule502(b)(2) defines "lawyer" to include a commissioned officer or member of the farmed forces who represents a person "in a court - martial case or in any military in. vestigation or proceeding."
Mil. R. Evid. 502(b)(2)(a). military investigations or The proceedings contemplated by the rule include administrative elimination boards, see Army Reg. No. 635 -200, Enlisted Personnel (21 Nov. 1977); investigations con ducted to determine pecuniary responsibility for lost property, see Army Reg. No. 735-11, Accounting for Lost, Damaged, and Destroyed Property (15 Oct 1978); and other fact - finding investigations, see Army Reg. No. 15-6, Procedure for In vestigating Officers and Boards of Officers Conducting Investigations (24 Aug. 1977).
Although the above references are to Army regulations, every branch of the service has equivalent regulations establishing essentially similar investigations or proceedings.
37R~le 502(a),Mil. R. Evid., states: (a) General rule of privilege.
A client has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent any other person from disclosing confidential communica tions made for the purpose of facilitating the rendition of professional legal services to the client, (1)between the client or the client's representative and the lawyer or the lawyer's representative, (2) between the lawyer and the lawyer's representative, (3) by the client or the client's lawyer to a lawyer representing another in a matter of common interest, (4) between representatives of the client or between the client and a representative of the client, or (5) between lawyers representing the client.
15
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
maining exceptions, some are codifications of prior waiver rules and others are completely new.3a The second exception, concerning opposing nonclient parties who both claim through a common deceased client, has no parallel in pre - rule case law.
The Advisory Committee Comments on the pro posed Federal Rule imply that this exception is applicable when an attorney is called as a witness in a dispute between two parties who both claim the right to assert the privilege as representatives of the witness attorney's deceased client.39The applicability of such an exception to a military criminal trial is doubtful since the govern ment will never be in a position to assert, by representation, the privilege of a deceased.
This does not mean, however, that relevant testimony cannot be adduced from the attorney of a deceased witness.
For example, assume the following situation: A, the accused, is on trial.
The government calls L, the lawyer of D, a deceased witness, who will testify as to certain relevant information that was communicated to
38R~le 502(dJ,Mil.
R. Evid., is as follows: (dJ Exceptions.
There is no privilege under this rule under the following circumstances: (I) Crime or commission of or obtained to or reasonably
fraud.
If the communication clearly contemplated the future a fraud or crime or if the services of the lawyer were sought enable or aid anyone to commit or plan what the client knew should have known to be a crime or fraud;
(2) Claimants through same deceased client.
As to a communication rele. vant to an issue between parties who claim through the same deceased client, regardless of whether the claims are by testate or intestate succes sion or by inter vivos transaction; (3) Breach of duty by lawyer or client.
As to a communication relevant to an issue of breach of duty by the lawyer to the client or by the client to the lawyer; 14) Document attested by lawyer.
As to a communication relevant to an issue concerning an attested document to which the lawyer is an attesting witness; or
(5) Joint clients.
As to a communication relevant to a matter of common interest between two or more clients if the communication was made by any of them to a lawyer retained or consulted in common, when offered in an ac. tion between any of the clients.
59Fed.R.
Evid. 503(d)(2) [not enacted], Advisory Committee's note
16
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
L as part of his duties as an attorney.
If D had waived his personal privilege before he died,40 the attorney would be free to testify because A would have no privilege to a~sert.~' The third exception to the general rule of attorney - client privilege exempts from protection communications relating to an alleged breach of the attorney's duty to his client.42This exemption is closely related to the earlier rule of waiver for a client who charges his attorney with inc~mpetence.~~ Whereas the exception is narrow in scope, applying only to conversations relevant to the issue of breach of duty, the waiver provision removed the privilege from all attorney - client comm~nications.~~ is doubtful that military It courts will substitute the (d)(3) exception for the former waiver rule, because waiver by allegation of incompetence is a longstanding and well - recognized feature of the attorney - client privilege.45 Subsection (d)(4) exempts from the ambit of the rule testimony by an attorney who was an attesting witness to a document which is in issue.
This exemption may be likened to the holding of the Court of Military Appeals in the case of United States v. Marrelli.46 In its opinion the Court distinguished between actions by an attorney which are legal in nature and those which are not, protecting the former but not the latter.47Clearly a lawyer may render purely legal service to a client in the drafting of a document and still perform the nonlawyer act of attestation.
According to Marrelli the only nonprivileged evidence would be that which related to the process of attestation.
According to the M.R.E. there is no privilege as to any issue "concerning an attested do~ument,"~~ presumably in cluding the advice given during the drafting process.
The final exception expressed in Rule 502 deals with communica tions made by opposing litigants to counsel they retained or con`OSince the attorney - client privilege is perpetual in duration, it survives the death of the client, in the absence of waiver.
"For the kinds of relationships covered by the rule, see Mil. R. Evid. 502(aj(lj-(5), supra note 37.
supra note 38.
"Mil. R. Evid. 502(d)(3), `3United States v. Allen, 8 C.M.A. 504,25 C.M.R. 8 (1957).
"25 C.M.R..
at 12.
`5Hunt v. Blackburn, 126 U.S. 4.64 (1668j; C. McCormick, Evidence Cleary 19721.
464C.M.A.276, 15C.M.R.276(1954).
4715C.M.R.
at 287.
48Mil.R.
Evid. 502(d)(4), supra note 38.
0 91 (2d ed. E. W.
17
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
sulted together.49By its terms the exception applies only when the testimony i s offered "in an action between any of the clients."50 This makes the rule wholly inapplicable to trials by court - martial since such trials are not actions "between" any of the clients.
Representation of both the accused and the government by the and same counsel in the same case is expressly f~rbidden,~' where it occurs a presumption of prejudice to the accused arises, tainting all subsequent proceeding^.^^ Furthermore the communications between co - accused and their counsel are expressly embraced by the general rule of privilege.53 Interestingly enough, the most striking change to the attorney client privilege brought about by the M.R.E. is not found in Rule 502 at all.
Rather it is Rule 51 1 which rids the privilege of the harsh and unfair exception for inadvertent or involuntary disclosure.
Rule 511 makes evidence of privileged matter inadmissible if disclosure was erroneously compelled or made without an op portunity for the holder to assert his privilege.54 This effectively reverses the provision of paragraph 151 b(2) of the Manual allowing eavesdroppers to testify as to communications presumed by the parties to be confidential.
IV.
RULE 503: COMMUNICATIONS TO CLERGY The development of an evidentiary privilege protecting confiden tial communications to clergy is a statutory as opposed to common 49Mil.R.
Evid. 502(d)15), supranote 38.
501d.
51Art.
27(a),U.C.M.J.; 10 U.S.C. 5 827.
52See generally United States v. Green, 5 C.M.A. 610, 18 C.M.R. 234 (19551, concern ing improper activities of defense counsel during Art.
32 proceeding tainting subse. quent trial; and United States v. Bryant, 16 C.M.R. 747 (A.F.C.M.R.
1954), concern.
ing improper participation by defense counsel in preparation of post - trial clemency recommendation tainting S.J.A. review.
But see United States v. Brown, 20 C.M.R. 823 (A.F.C.M.R.
19551, holding that consideration by S.J.A. of the fact that clemen cy recommendation was prepared by unqualified officer cured any prejudice resulting from breach of attorney - client privilege.
53Mil.
Evid. 502(a)13), R. supra note 38.
54Paragraph(a)of Rule 511, Mil. R. Evid., states as follows: (a) Evidence of a statement or other disclosure of privileged matter is not admissible against the holder of the privilege if disclosure was compelled erroneously or was made without an opportunity for the holder of the privilege to claim the privilege.
18
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
law phen~menon.~~ Nevertheless the same policy judgments justify ing the traditional common law privileges apply to the relationship between the individual penitent and his or her spiritual advisor.
Military law recognized the confidential nature of this relationship and fashioned an evidentiary privilege for communications be tween a person and a "chaplain, priest, or clergyman . . . made.
. . as a formal act of religion or concerning a matter of con~cience."~~ There is very little military case law in this area.
In United States v. Kidd,57the court found no prejudice to the accused by the fact that a chaplain conducted the post - trial interview and rendered an adverse clemency recommendation, in the absence of any evidence indicating an unauthorized disclosure of confidential inf~rmation.~~ Obviously there is no presumption of prejudice as is the case with defense counsel performing the same function.
In United States v. Hender~on,~g prejudice resulted from a chaplain no refusing to testify as to words spoken to him by the accused, in
558Wigmore, Evidence 05 2394.96 (Rev. ed. McNaughton 1961).
56M.C.M.,note 5, supra para. 151b(2).
The text of Rule 503, Mil. R. Evid., is as follows:
COMMUNICATIONS TO CLERGY (a)General rule of privilege.
A person has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent another from disclosing a confidential communication by the person to a clergyman or to a clergyman's assistant, if such communication is made either as a formal act of religion or as a matter of conscience.
(b)Definitions.
As used in this rule: (1)A "clergyman" is a minister, priest, rabbi, chaplain, or other similar functionary of a religious organization, or an individual reasonably believ ed to be so by the person consulting the clergyman.
(2)A communication is "confidential" if made to a clergyman's assistant in the assistant's official capacity and is not intended to be disclosed to third persons other than those to whom disclosure is in furtherance of the purpose of the communication or to those reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communication.
(c) Who may claim the privilege.
The privilege may be claimed by the per son, by the guardian or conservator, or by a personal representative if the person is deceased.
The clergyman or clergyman's assistant who received the communication may claim the privilege on behalf of the person.
The authority of the clergyman or clergyman's assistant to do so is presumed in the absence of evidence to the contrary.
5720C.M.R.713(A.F.C.M.R.1955).
581d.
719.
at 5911C.M.A.
556,29 C.M.R. 372 (1960).
19
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
light of the fact that the chaplain later returned and testified fully.
The court declined to speculate as to what result would have ob tained had the chaplain remained silent.
It should be noted, however, that the holder of the privilege is the penitent, not the cleric.60And in United States v. Moore,61the court indicated its in tent to construe the rule strictly when it declared that a letter writ ten to a nun fell outside the privilege.
Rule 503 of the M.R.E. is a recodification of the Manual's state ment of the privilege,62 plus an adoption of the definition of " clergyman " found in the proposed F.R.E.63The Advisory Com mittee pared this definition down further in its comments: [I]t is not so broad as to include all self - denominated " ministers.
" A fair construction of the language requires that the person to whom the status is sought to be attached be regularly engaged in activities conforming at least in a general way with those of a Catholic priest, Jewish rabbi, or a minister of an established Protestant denomination though not necessarily on a full - time Like the other paragraph 151b(2)privileges, the priest - penitent communication was made subject to the eavesdropper exception.
And like the attorney - client privilege discussed above, and the spousal privilege discussed below, Rule 511 of the M.R.E. cures the problem.
"M.C.M. para 151
3130C.M.R.868(A.F.C.M.R.
1963j,pet.denjed,33C.M.R.436(1963).
" Rule 503 uses the " act of religion or , . . matter of conscience " language found in the Manual, instead of the " professional character as spiritual advisor " language of the Federal Rules of Evidence.
Note 56, supra.
The relevant portion of para 151b(2) of the Manual, at page 27 - 60, reads as follows: Also privileged are communications between a person and a chaplain, priest, or clergyman, or assistant or other agent thereof, of any denomina tion made in the relationship of penitent and chaplain, priest, or clergyman, either as a formal act of religion or concerning a matter of conscience.
i3"A 'clergyman' is a minister, priest, rabbi, or other similar 'functionary of a religious organization, or an individual reasonably believed so to be by the person consulting him.
" Fed.
R. Evid. 506(a)(l) [not enacted].
The text of the military rule is identical except that the words " the clergyman " are substituted for " him.
" Rule 5031bl(ll. note 56.
supra.
64Fed.R.
Evid. 506 [not enacted] Advisory Committee Note.
20
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
One final aspect of this otherwise placid rule deserves comment.
Rule 503 does not provide for closed sessions to minimize un necessary disclosure when clerics are required to testify.
Yet in the Henderson65case the judge closed the courtroom to the public when the chaplain returned to the stand.
The Court found no prejudice or impropriety.
However, this case was twenty years prior to the United State Supreme Court's decision concerning public access to criminal trials,66 and Henderson may no longer be a foundation upon which a similar order may rest.
V. RULE 504: THE MARITAL PRIVILEGE Traditionally the marital privilege has been divided into a spousal competency branch67 and a confidential communicat,ions branch.@ Both aspects have long been recognized in military law and both branches have been carried over, with certain modifica tions, to the M.R.E.69 By contrast, the federal rule, as originally 65Note59, supra.
66RichmondNewspapers, Inc. v. Virginia,
U.S.
-, 100 S. Ct. 2814 (1980).
67F~rmer para. 148e of the Manual states, " Interest or bias does not disqualify a witness . . , .
Husband and wife are competent witnesses in favor of each other.
Although husband and wife are also competent witnesses against each other, the general rule is that each is entitled to a privilege prohibiting the use of one spouse as a witness against the other.
" 68Former para 151M2) of the Manual states in relevant part, " Confidential com munications between husband and wife, made while they were husband and wife and not living in separation under a judicial decree, are privileged.
However, a confiden. tial communication between husband and wife is not privileged when the marital relationship was a sham at the time the communication was made.
" 6gThefirst two of the three paragraphs of Mil. R. Evid. 504 read as follows: (a)Spousal incapacity.
A person has a privilege to refuse to testify against his or her spouse.
(b)Confidential communication made during marriage.
(1)General rule ofprivilege.
A person has a privilege during and after the martial relationship to refuse to disclose, and to prevent another from disclosing, any confidential communication made to the spouse of the person while they were husband and wife and not separated as provided by law.
(2) Definition.
A communication is " confidential " if made privately by any person to the spouse of the person and is not intended to be disclosed to third persons other than those reasonably necessary for transmission of the communication.
21
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
proposed, would have codified the holding in Hawkins v. United States,'O a position that has been subjected to unfavorable criticism and has been rejected by the National Conference on Uniform State Laws.71 The proposed federal rule would have established a com petency privilege running to the criminal accused but would not have created a privilege for confidential marital communications.72 The M.R.E. solution was to create a competency branch privilege consistent with the United States Supreme Court's decision in Trammel v. United States,73 and a confidential communications branch similar to that suggested by the Uniform Rules of Evidence.
(3) Who may claim the privilege.
The privilege may be claimed by the spouse who made the communication or by the other spouse on his or her behalf.
The authority of the latter spouse to do so is presumed in the absence of evidence of a waiver.
The privilege will not prevent disclosure of the communication at the request of the spouse to whom the communication was made if that spouse is an accused regardless of whether the spouse who made the communication objects to its disclosure.
70358U.S.
74, 79 S. Ct. 136 (1958);Fed.
R. Evid. 505 (not enacted).
7 1 F ~ rdiscussion of the policy judgments underlying the confidential communica a tions branch, seeC.
McCormick, supra note 45, at 9: 86.
The Advisory Committee's Notes for proposed Rule 505, F.R.E., state the commit tee's reasons for rejecting the confidential communications branch: The rule recognizes no privilege for confidential communications.
The traditional justifications for privileges not to testify against a spouse and not to be testified against by one's spouse have been the prevention of marital dissension and the repugnancy of requiring a person to condemn or be condemned by his spouse.
8 Wigmore Qรยง 2228, 2241 (McNaughton Rev. 1961).
These considerations bear no relevancy to marital communications.
Nor can it be assumed that marital conduct will be affected by a privilege for confidential communications of whose existence the parties in all likelihood are unaware.
The other communication privileges, by way of con trast, have as one party a professional person who can be expected to in form the other of the existence of the privilege.
Moreover.
the relationships from which those privileges arise are essentially and almost exclusively verbal in nature, quite unlike marriage.
See Hutchins and Slesinger, Some Observations on the Law of Evidence: Family Relations, 13 hlinn.
L. Rev. 675 (1929).Cf. McCormick 8 90; 8 Wigmore Q 2337 [McNaughton Rev. 19611.
Fed.
R. Evid. 505 [not enacted] Advisory Committee Note.
72Rule504 of the Uniform Rules of Evidence eliminates the competency branch en. tirely and allows only a limited confidential communication privilege.
73 U.S. , 63 L.Ed.2d 186, 100 S. Ct.906 (1980).
The analysis following the text of Rule 504, Mil. R. Evid.. explains as follows:
United States,
(a) Spousal incapacity.
Rule 504(a) is taken generally from Trammel v. U.S. , 63 L.Ed.2d 126 (1980) and significantly
22
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
A. THE SPOUSAL COMPETENCY BRANCH The former competency rule, as found in chapter XXVII of the Manual, was that spouses were competent witnesses in each other's behalf, and were also competent adverse witnesses, but that each spouse had the privilege of prohibiting such adverse testimony.74 In other words both the witness spouse and the party spouse were considered to be equal holders of the privilege.75As was the case at common law,76this branch of the privilege was limited in duration by the existence of an actual state of marriage.77 the termination of which extinguished the privilege.
The privilege was further limited by what is best known as the "injury e~ception,"~8 which precluded the party spouse from asserting the privilege with respect to those injuries to the witness spouse which were deleterious to the marital relation~hip.~~ However, in United States v. Moore, the Court of Military Appeals declined to apply the injury exception to the privilege of the witness spouse as well.80 changes military law in this area.
Under present law, see present Manual paragraph 148e, each spouse has a privilege to prevent the use of the other spouse as an adverse witness.
Under the new rule, the witness spouse is the holder of the privilege and may choose to testify or not to testify, as the witness spouse sees fit.
But see Rule 504(c)(exceptions to the privilege).
Implicit in the rule is the presumption that when a spouse chooses to testify against the other spouse the marriage no longer needs the protection of the privilege.
Rule 504(a) must be distinguished from Rule 504(b),Con fidential communication made during marriage, which deals with com munications rather than the ability to testify generally at trial.
Although the witness spouse ordinarily has a privilege to refuse to testify against the accused spouse, under certain circumstances no privilege may exist, and the spouse may be compelled to testify.
SeeRule 504(c).
74M.C.M., para. 148e, note67, supra.
75D.Fontanella, Privileged Communications: The Personal Privilege, 37 Mil. L. Rev. 155 (1967).
McCormick, supra note 45, at รยง 66.
77M.C.M.,para 148e, note 67, supra.
78Sincethe basis for allowing the competency privilege is the preservation of marital harmony, it is altogether logical that an exception exists for crimes involving injury to the other spouse.
See 8 J. Wigmore, Evidence 2239 at p. 243 (Rev. ed. McNaughton 1961).
'Wnited States v. Moore, 14 C.M.A. 635, 34 C.M.R. 415 (1964).
"Occasional or sporadic injury to one spouse by the act of the other does not mean that the marriage is necessarily a failure or so unstable that enforcement of the public policy for its preservation is no longer justified."
Id.
`Old.
at 420.
Distinguishing United States v. Leach, 7 C.M.A. 388, 22 C.M.R. 178 (19561, the Moore court held it was error for the trial court to compel the testimony of
23
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
The extent of the injury exception as found in the Manual was not exclusive,*' but the Courts did not engage in any kind of wholesale expansion.**Furthermore, the injury had to be the result of the ofthe spouse of the accused, notwithstanding that the accused was charged with assault on his wife.
8'J.Munster 8i M. Larkin, Military Evidence 276 (1978);United States v. Parker, 32 C.M.R.482(A.C.M.R.1962).
82Theoffenses listed in the former Manual provision as triggering the exception are: (1)an assault by one spouse upon the other, (2) bigamy, (3)unlawful cohabitation, (4) adultery, (5)abandonment or failure to support the spouse and children, (6)mistreat ment of a child of the other spouse, and (7) forgery of one spouse's signature to a writing, thereby injuring the legal rights of the other.
Manual, supra note 5, at para. 148e.
The Manual provision continues: Second, the privilege does not e,xist in favor of either spouse and, conse quently, cannot be asserted by either(1)In a prosecution of the husband for any of the offenses set forth in chapter 117, title 18, United States Code, when the wife is the victim or for any offense involving the using or transporting of the wife for "white slave" or other immoral purposes, regardless of whether the offense was committed before or after the marriage.
(2) In a prosecution under Section 278 of the Immigration and Nationality Act (66 Stat. 230; 8 U.S.C. 9 1328; Importation of alien for immoral pur pose).
(3)When the marital relationship was parties to live together as husband and ing the purported marital relationship mains a sham at the time the testimony to be introduced against the other.
entered into with no intention of the wife, but only for the purpose of us as a sham, and that relationship re or statement of one of the parties is
(4)When, at the time the testimony or statement of one of the parties to the marriage is to be introduced in evidence against the other party, the witness.party is dead or the parties are divorced.
Id.
The provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2). above, have been preserved in rule 5041~)(2)(CI, R. Evid.
That provision states that there exists no privilege of Mil. spousal incapacity under Rule 504(a) or confidential communications under Rule 504(b)-
(CI In proceedings in which a spouse is charged, in accordance with Ar ticles 133 or 134, with importing the other spouse as an alien for prostitu tion or other immoral purpose in violation of section 1328 of title 8, United States Code; with transporting the other spouse in interstate commerce for immoral purposes or other offense in violation of sections 2421-2424 of title 18.
United States Code; or with violation of such other similar statutes under which such privilege may not be claimed in the trial of criminal cases in the United States district courts.
24
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
fense charged; the fact that the evidence tended to establish a separate uncharged offense against the spouse was not enough.83 Under the new rule, both spouses are competent to testify but can prohibit each other's adverse testimony, as before.
The new rule limits the duration of the privilege to a period of actual matrirn~ny,~~ denies the privilege when, at the time testimony and is given, the marital relationship is a sham.85 It is the injury exception that has been the most revised.
Under the M.R.E., the injury exception applies only "[iln proceedings in which one spouse is charged with a crime against the person or pro perty of the other spouse or a child of either, or with a crime against the person or property of a third person committed in the course of committing a crime against the other spouse."86The focus of the in jury seems to have shifted from an injury to the marital relation ship to personal or property injury to the witness spouse.
If this is indeed the case, then it is questionable whether such injuries to the marital relationship as adultery87will survive the adoption of the new rule.
An argument could be made, however, based upon the underlying policy of the rule, to construe the kinds of personal in-
Wnited States v. Massey, 15 C.M.A. 274,37 C.M.R. 246 (19651 84MilR.
Evid. 504(c)(l) reads as follows: (1) Spousal Incapacity Only.
There is no privilege under subdivision (a) when, at the time the testimony of one of the parties to the marriage is to be introduced in evidence against the other party, the parties are divorced or the marriage has been annulled.
85Mil.
R. Evid. 504(c)(2)(B) states that there is no privilege of spousal incapacity under Rule 504(a)or confidential communications under Rule 504(b)-
(B)When the marital relationship was entered into with no intention of the parties to live together as spouses, but only for the purpose of using the pur. ported marital relationship as a sham, and with respect to the privilege in subdivision (a),the relationship remains a sham at the time the testimony or statement of one of the parties is to be introduced against the other; or with respect to the privilege in subdivision (b),the relationship was a sham at the time of the communication.
'
B6Mil.
Evid. 5041c)(2)(A).
R. 87UnitedStates v. Francis, 12 C.M.R. 695 (A.C.M.R. 1953).
The accused was charged with adultery with his minor step - daughter in violation of Art.
134.
The court held that no privilege existed for the accused to prevent his wife from testifying as a government witness.
25
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
juries contemplated to include the mental anguish resulting from such offenses.88 The new formulation of the injury exception also appears to change the doctrine that the injury must be the result of the charg ed offense.
The last phrase of the exception denies the privilege where the accused is charged with a crime against the person or property of another that arose out of the commission of " a crime'' against the spouse.
The rule does not require that the misconduct directed toward the spouse be part of the charges.
Therefore if the evidence offered to prove the offense includes evidence of an injury to the spouse, then no privilege exists to shield that spouse's testimony.
Perhaps the most profound change in this branch of the privilege is the change in which spouse holds the privilege.
The proposed F.R.E. 505 would have the party spouse as the holder, and the Manual gave the privilege to both spouses, but the United States Supreme Court, in the case of Trammel v. United limited the privilege to the witness spouse only.
The M.R.E. codifies the Trammel position.
Rule 504(a)simply states, "A person has a right to refuse to testify against his or her spouse.
" In the majority opi nion in Trammel, Mr. Chief Justice Burger wrote, " This modifica tion - vesting the privilege in the witness spouse - furthers the im portant public interest in marital harmony without unduly burden ing legitimate law enforcement needs."g0 Rule 504, M.R.E., contains no waiver provision, and the general waiver provision of Rule 510 applies only to confidential com munications.
It is unclear how the waiver mechanism for the spousal competency privilege operates.
Under the old chapter XXVII of the Manual, the scope of cross - examination was limited .
88As Dean Wigmore wrote, " That adultery by one spouse is an offense against the other is conceded in good morals and ought to be plain in law.
" 8 J. Wigmore, Evidence 5 2239, note 78.
supra.
The same argument could be extended to all sexual offenses involving third parties, as the Army Court of Military Review wrote in United States v. Parker.
supra n. 15: " Nor is the injury contemplated limited to physical violence upon the witness.spouse but extends to mental suffering arising from violations of the marriage relationship as in the offenses of adultery and bigamy.
" 89 U.S. ,63 L.Ed.Pd 186,100 S. Ct.906 (1980) 'Old., L.Ed.Zd at 196.
100 S. Ct. at 914 (1980).
63
26
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
generally to the matters covered by direct e~amination.~' Likewise a spouse who testified on behalf of the other was subject to cross examination, provided the cross - examination was limited to the issues testified to on direct, and to the question of ~redibility.~~ Rule 611(b) of the M.R.E. limits the scope of cross to the subject matters of direct examination, but allows`the military judge to per mit "inquiry into additional matters as if on direct."93In relation to the former practice, the new rule would seem to make waiver of the competency privilege occur when the witness spouse voluntarily testifies either as a favorable or adverse witness.
In sum, the spousal competency branch adopted in the M.R.E. is the privilege of a witness spouse to refuse to give testimony adverse to the accused spouse, during the existence of a bona fide marriage and limited by an injury exception that focuses upon per sonal or property injury rather than upon injury to the marital rela tionship.
B. THE
CONFIDENTIAL COMMUNICATIONS BRANCH
The military version of this branch of the marital privilege, both before and after adoption of the M.R.E., is essentially the same privilege for interspousal confidences found' at common law.
Unlike the competency branch, which when properly invoked bars all adverse testimony, this branch shields only confidential disclosures or communications made while the parties were mar-
g'"[Cross-examination]should, in general, be limited to the issues concerning which the witness has testified on direct examination and the question of his credibility."
Manual for Courts - Martial, supranote 5, para. 149b(l),at page 27 - 54.
92"If an accused's spouse testifies in his favor, the privilege may not be asserted by either spouse upon cross - examination of the spouse who has so testified, provided the cross - examination is limited to the issues concerning which the spouse has testified on direct examination and the question of the credibility of the spouse."
Id., para. 148e.
See also D. Fontanella, Privileged Communications: The Personal Privileges, 37 Mil. L. Rev. 155, 193 (1July 1967).
93Rule611(b),Mil R. Evid., reads as follows:
(b) Scope of cross - examination.
Cross - examination should be limited to the subject matter of the direct examination and matters affecting the credibility of the witness.
The military judge may, in the exercise of discre tion, permit inquiry into additional matters as if on direct examination.
27
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
ried, " the nature of which would betray conjugal confidence and A " communication " may be an utterance or a writing, but does not include conduct unless the conduct is intended as a substitute for an utterance.95 Such confidential communications, under the Manual and the M.R.E., are privileged from disclosure for a duration unlimited by the continuance of a marital relation s hip.96 The only exceptions or limitations placed upon the privilege by former chapter XXVII of the Manual were that: (1) an accused spouse could compel disclosures by the witness spouse not withstanding the fact that the witness was the communicator and hence the theoretical holder of the privilege, and (2) a person out side the protected relationship could be compelled to testify concer ning any presumably confidential communication he or she overheard, whether by accident or design.97 Rule 504 expressly Wnited States v. McDonald, 32 C.M.R. 689 (N.C.M.R. 1962).
g5J.Munster 
""The privilege does not terminate uDon a breach in the marital relation but lives on in prepetuity,-as does the attorney-ciient privilege, " Fontanella, supra note 92, at 182.
Mil. R. Evid. 504(b)(l) states in part: " A person has a privilege during and after the martial relationship to refuse to disclose.
. . any confidential communication.
" 97Para.151b(2)of the Manual, supra note 5, explained the two exceptions or limita tions upon the privilege of confidential spousal communications as follows: The privilege pertaining to confidential communications between hus band and wife will not prevent allowing or requiring such a communication to be disclosed at the request of the spouse to whom the communication was made if that spouse is an accused, and this is so even when the spouse who made the communication objects to its disclosure.
The privilege pertaining to privileged communication between husband and wife, client and attorney, or penitent and clergyman, which is based on a recognition of the public advantage that accrues from encouraging free communication in these circumstances, will not prevent allowing or requir ing a person outside the privileged relationship who either by accident or design gained knowledge of the communication to testify concerning it, nor will it prevent the reception in evidence of a writing containing the com. munication which was obtained by such a person either by accident or design.
But see 152.
However, this exception to the general rule does not ap ply if the person outside the privileged relationship who gained knowledge of the privileged communication or who obtained the writing containing it did so, as to a communication between husband and wife, with the con. nivance of the spouse to whom the communication was made, or.
as to a communication between client and attorney or penitent and clergyman, with the connivance of the attorney or clergyman or agent thereof or in any other manner not reasonably to be anticipated by the client or penitent.
28
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
adopts the first of these two limitations98 and by so doing effective ly makes the accused spouse the holder of the privilege regardless of the accused's role in the communication.99 However, the working of Rule 504(b)(l),taken together with Rule 511, apparently rejects the second limitation allowed by chapter XXVII.
According to the general provision of the rule, a person may not only refuse to disclose, but may also "prevent another from disclosing"'00 any confidential communication made to his or her spouse.
Rule 511 states that, even if a holder of the privilege has disclosed the privileged matter to another, if such disclosure was "compelled erroneously or was made without an opportunity.
. . to claim the privilege,"'01 such disclosure does not constitute a waiver of the privilege.
When considered in tandem, these two provisions clearly permit an accused to seal the lips of a stranger to the mar riage who has overheard or obtained knowledge of the subject mat ter of a communication intended to be confidential.
Another change in the new rule is the creation of an injury excep tion for the confidential communications branch where none ex isted previously.
In the old chapter XXVII, the injury exception was included only in the paragraph dealing with the competency of witnesses,lo2and the courts treated this as creating no injury excep tion for the admissibility of confidential communications.103Rule 504(c), however, extends to the confidential communications branch the same injury exception which applies to the spousal com petency ~rivilege.1~~
98Rule504(b)(3), Mil. R. Evid., supranote 69.
99This represents a departure from the traditional construction of the privilege, which considered the communicator to be the holder regardless of whether he or she was the witness or accused.
See C. McCormick, supra note 45, 0 83; 8 Wigmore, supra note 78, 0 2340.
'OORule 504(b)(l), Mil. R. Evid., supra note 69.
'O'Rule 511(a),Mil. R. Evid., supranote 54.
'O*Manual for Courts - Martial. supra note 5, at para. 148e.
No injury exception to the privilege of confidential spousal communications is to be found in para. 151b(2), supra note 97.
`W.M. 325 636, Devine, 74 B.R. 387 (1947);Oldham, Privileged Communications in Military Law, 5 Mil. L. Rev. 17 (1 July 1959). lWMil.R.
Evid. 504(c)(2)(A), 
For the text of these provisions, see notes 82 (B), and 85 and the text at note 86, supra.
29
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
One unusual aspect of the marital privilege, under the old as well as the new practice, not found in either the F.R.E. or Uniform Rules of Evidence, deserves brief mention at this point.
That feature is the proviso that the mere fact that the parties are not living together when the confidential communication is made does not change the privileged nature of the communication.'05 This provi sion is obviously a recognition of the fact that military service often requires periods of long separation of spouses, and that it is therefore neither fair nor logical to condition the marital privilege upon cohabitation.
The topic of waiver for confidential communications and the ap plication of Rule 510 is discussed hereafter in depth in Part IX.
VI. RULES 505 AND 506: CLASSIFIED INFORMATION AND GOVERNMENTAL INFORMATION The United States Supreme Court, in the Reynolds case,Io6held that an evidentiary privilege exists whereby the government may withhold or prevent the disclosure of military and state secrets.
Like the privilege of concealment of the identity of police in formant~,'~~ a privilege in the hands of the party bringing a such criminal prosecution is fraught with potential for abuse and must be carefully controlled.
Most of the text of Rules 505 and 506 of the M.R.E. are devoted to the procedures to be employed in determin ing whether a claim of privilege is to be denied and, when a claim is denied, to the procedures applicable for controlling unnecessary disclosure of nonrelevant information.
Accordingly, this section focuses both on the procedural aspects of the rules and the substan tive nature of the privilege.
lo5The Manual protected confidences between spouses "made while they were hus band and wife and not living in separation under a judicial decree."
M.C.M. para. 151MZ).
The M.R.E. extends the privilege to confidential communications made "while they were husband and wife and not separated as provided by law."
Mil. R. Evid. 504(bl(l).
'06UnitedStates v. Reynolds, 345 U.S. l(19531.
'O'Mil.
R. Evid. 507, discussed in part VI1 of the text of this article, infra.
30
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
A. THE NATURE OF THE PRIVILEGE The 1969 Revised Edition of the Manual provided, "Official com munications and documents containing military and state secrets . . . are privileged from disclosure in a court - martial proceeding where in the opinion of the head of the executive . . . agency con cerned such disclosure would be detrimental to the national interest."lo8This rather broad privilege was strictly controlled by the requirement that nondisclosure of relevant classified material by the government required the government to abandon the prosecution.lo9The government could, however, elect to exclude the public from the trial and appoint members to the court, including counsel, who had sufficient security clearances.11o There was authority for the proposition that, whenever classified information related to the case, even if the document involved was only a classified in vestigative report, the convening authority had to appoint defense counsel who possessed the requisite security qualifications.'"
In United States v. Reyes,ll* the Air Force Court of Military Review held that the defense must be allowed to introduce classified evidence once it has established the relevance and ad missibility of the evidence.ll3 The government could elect either to permit the introduction of the proffered evidence, or to cease pro secution of the charge to which it related.'14 The Court of Military Appeals summed up the government's problem in the case of United States v. Gagnon,'l5 when it held that the military judge was without power to order that highly classified information be made available to defense counsel.
As the court observed, "A judge who has made a determination that this hard choice is unavoidable can then recess the trial while the decision is weighed by the convening authority, , , ."'le
lo8Manual for Courts.Martia1, supra note 5, para. 151M1).
Note that lodging the privilege with the head of the governmental agency concerned is in accordance with Reynolds.
345 U.S. 1 at 8.
'OWnited States v. Dobr, 21 C.M.R. 451,455 (A.C.M.R.1956).
"Old.
"'United States v. Craig, 22 C.M.R. 466,469 (A.M.C.R. 1956).
11*30 C.M.R. 776 (A.F.C.M.R.
1960).
113Id.,at 787.
114~.
llS2l C.M.A. 158,44 C.M.R. 212 (1972).
'1644C.M.R.
at 219.
31
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
The M.R.E. deal in much greater detail with the problems involv ing this privilege.
Whereas the Manual made no distinction bet ween classified information and other kinds of privileged govern mental information, the new rules do.
Rule 505 creates a blanket privilege for classified information when disclosure would be Rule 506 creates a privilege detrimental to the national ~ecurity."~ of nondisclosure for governmental information not otherwise re quired to be disclosed by act of Congress, if disclosure would be " detrimental to the public interest.'''18 Rule 505 is in keeping with the substance of the privilege as it has been applied prior to the new rules.
By its terms it applies only to information relating to national defense and foreign relation^"^ that has been determined to require protection against unauthoriz'17Rule 505(a),Mil. R. Evid., states: (a) General rule of privilege.
Classified information is privileged from disclosure if disclosure would be detrimental to the national security.
The government pays a price for the enjoyment of this privilege, however.
The first paragraph of the official analysis following the text of Mil. R. Evid. 505 explains succinctly: Rule 505 is based upon H.R. 4745,96th Cong., 1st Sess. (1979).which was proposed by the Executive Branch as a response to what is known as the " graymail " problem in which the defendant in a criminal case seeks disclosure of sensitive national security information, the release of which may force the government to discontinue the prosecution.
The Rule is also based upon the Supreme Court's discussion of executive privilege in United States v. Reynolds, 345 U.S. 1 (1953) and United States v. Nixon, 418 U.S. 687 (1974).
The Rule attempts to balance the interests of an accused who desires classified information for his or her defense and the interests of the government in protecting that information.
8 M.J. CLXXII (1980).For further discussion concerning graymail, see the article Graymail and Grayhairs: The Classified and Official Information Privileges Under the Military Rules of Evidence.
by LTC Stephen A. J. Eisenberg, published in The Army Lawyerat 9 (Mar. 1981).
'18Rule 506(a),Mil. R. Evid., states: (a) General rule of privilege.
Except where disclosure is required by an Act of Congress, government information is privileged from disclosure if disclosure would be detrimental to the public interest.
'lgThis is indicated by the definition of " national security " found in Rule 505(b)(2), Mil. R. Evid: (2) National security.
" National security'' means the national defense and foreign relations of the United States.
32
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
ed disclosure,12opursuant to an executive order,12' statute,lZ2or regu1ati0n.l~~ other words, Rule 505 applies to documents or in In formation that has been properly classified as confidential, secret, or top secret, and to restricted data as defined by the Atomic Energy By contrast, Rule 506 applies to official communications, documents, and other information, not otherwise classified, within the custody or control of the g0~ernment.l~~ rule, however, exThe lZoSee definition of "classified information" in Rule 505(b)(l), the Mil. R. Evid.: (1) Classified information.
"Classified information" means any informa tion or material that has been determined by the United States Government pursuant to an executive order, statute, or regulation, to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national security and any restricted data, as defined in section 2014(y)of title 42, United State Code.
lZIExec.Order No. 12,065, National Security Information, 43 Fed.
Reg. 28,949 (1978).
See also the executive orders cited in note 122, infra, implementing the National Security Act of 1947.
lZZSeveral provisions concerning restricted data may be found in the Atomic Energy Act of 1946, Pub. L. No. 79-585, 60 Stat. 774, as amended, codified at 42 U.S.C. $5 2011 - 2296 (1976).
A definition of restricted data is provided at 42 U.S.C. Q 2014(y), and various provisions on classification, declassification, and dissemination of restricted data are collected at 42 U.S.C. QQ 2161-2166.
The National Security Act of 1947, Pub. L. No. 80 - 253, 61 Stat. 496, as amended, codified at 50 U.S.C. $5 401-412 (1976), deals indirectly with protection of govern mental information against unauthorized disclosure.
At 50 U.S.C. รยง 401, it is stated to be the intent of Congress, among other things, "to provide for the establishment of integrated policies and procedures for the departments, agencies, and functions of the Government relating to the national security."
This provision is implemented in part by Exec.
Order No. 10,865, Safeguarding Classified Information Within In dustry, 25 Fed.
Reg. 1583 (1960); by Exec.
Order No. 11,652, Classification and Declassification of National Security Information and Material, 37 Fed.
Reg. 5209 (1972); and by the National Security Council Directive of May 17, 1972, Classifica tion, Downgrading, Declassification and Safeguarding of National Security In formation, 37 Fed.
Reg. 10,053 (1972).
The text of these and other executive orders and materials is set forth in the United States Code following50 U.S.C. 401 (1976).
lZ3See Dept. of Defense Directive No. 5200.1, DOD Information Security Program (Nov. 1978) (also designated DOD 5200.1-R).
See also Army Reg. No. 380-5, Depart ment of the Army Information Security Program Regulation (15 Aug. 19791, and the many references listed at Enclosure 1 thereto, pp. J - 9 through J-11.
lzo42U.S.C.
5 2014(y)(1976).
Seediscussion at note 122, supra.
125This stated at Rule 506(b),Mil. R. Evid., which reads as follows: is
(b) Scope.
"Government information" includes official communications and documents and other information within the custody or control of the federal government.
This rule does not apply to classified information (rule 505) or to the identity of an informant (rule 507).
33
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
tends protection only to communications, documents, and informa tion not required by act of Congress to be divulged,lZ6 disclosure of which would be "detrimental to the public interest."'27 This "public interest" privilege is without a counterpart under chapter XXVII of the Manual, which only protected "military and state secrets."12s Being without precedent, the "public interest" stan dard is difficult to pin down, and may involve some very grave con stitutional problems.
The Reynold~'~9 decision recognized a privilege only for "military and state ~ecrets,"~30 Rule 506 purports to exclude yet material that is not related to national security.
Perhaps the best description of Rule 506 is that it is an assertion of an executive privilege arising out of the implied powers of the President in the exercise of his authority under Article I1 of the United State Con~itituti0n.l~~ a privilege was asserted by the President and Such recognized by the Supreme Court in the case of United States v.
lZ6Thestatute most likely to apply is the so - called Jencks Act, (19761, which requires the government to deliver to the defense records made by its witnesses that relate to the case.
A discussion its history, provisions, and application in military law, may be Open Government and Military Justice, 87 Mil. L. Rev. 7, 47 -51 (winter 1980).
127Mil.
Evid. 506(al.
See note 118, supra.
R. 12*
18 U.S.C. Q 3500 any statements or of the Jencks Act.
found in Luedtke, and notes 188-205
b. Certain priviledged communications.
(1)Military and state secrets, and informants.
Official communications and documents containing military or state secrets, including diplomatic correspondence, are privileged from disclosure in a court - martial proceeding where in the opinion of the head of the executive or military department or government agency concerned such disclosure would be detrimental to the national interest.
Manual for Courts - Martial, supra note 5, para. 151 M11.
12'United State v. Reynolds, 345 U.S. l(1953).
13"345U.S.
at 7.
13'In Branzburg v. Hayes, 408 U.S. 665 (1972, the Supreme Court wrote concerning the tension between the search for truth and the need to preserve privileged com munications that "[tlhe public , , , has a right to every man's evidence, except for those persons protected by a constitutional, common law, or statutory privilege.'` 408 U.S. at 688.
The common law privileges are those involving protected relation.
ships such as attorney - client and husband - wife.
Rule 505 is a statutory privilege as it relates to the Atomic Energy Act and National Security Act.
See note 122, supra.
But Rule 506 defines categorization as anything other than assertion of an executive privilege arising out of the president's constitutional functions.
34
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
Nixon.132 The Court characterized the privilege as applying only to "communications between high Government officials and those who advise them,"'33 but added that "when the privilege depends solely on the broad, undifferentiated claim of public interest in the confidentiality of such conversations a confrontation with other values a~ises."'3~ Clearly the greatest problem facing the military judge is that of striking the balance between the due process guarantee of the fifth amendment and confrontation and com pulsory process rights of the sixth amendment on the one hand, and the alleged detriment to public interest on the other hand.
Certainly the first step is to determine what kind of public interest is involv ed.
In United States v. Progressive I ~ c . , where the issue facing the '~~ court was whether to enjoin the publication of nuclear weapons design information, a United States district court found as a matter of fact that publication by the defendant of certain restricted data136 would result in "direct, immediate, and irreparable damage to the United States."13' The balance in that case was between harming the public interest and preserving first amendment guarantees.
The guarantees of the fifth and sixth amendments are certainly no less jealously guarded.
As the Supreme Court stated in Nixon, "[Tlhe generalized assertion of privilege must yield to the demonstrated, specific need for evidence in a pending criminal Therefore, in order to sustain a claim of "public interest" privilege, the court must find palpable and irreparable damage to the public safety or to the proper conduct of an essential govern mental function.139 These rather difficult problems may possibly be vitiated by an in terpretation of the rule which limits its scope narrowly.
By its own 13*418 U.S. 683 (1974).
1331d.
705.
at 1341d.
706.
at `35467F.
Supp. 990 (W.D.Wis.
1979).
136N~t~ith~tanding that some of the information involved was in the public the fact domain, the court determined that the aggregation and analysis of the information was within the definition of "restricted data" as set forth in the Atomic Energy Act at 42 U.S.C. รยง 2014(y)(19761.
Seenote 122, supra.
"'467 F. Supp. 990, at 999.
'38UnitedStates v. Nixon, 418 U.S. 683, at 713 (1974).
13Wnited States v. Nixon, 418 U.S. 683 (1974);Reynolds v. United States, 345 U.S. 1 11953).
35
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
provisions the rule does not protect information required to be disclosed by Act of Congress.14oThe Jencks Actq4'requires the disclosure of prior statements of government witnesses.
Thus material required to be disclosed by the Jencks Act is beyond the scope of the rule.
In addition, evidence favorable to the defense is constitutionally required to be disclosed to the defense where such evidence is material to the issues of guilt or p~nishment.'~~ 16 Rule of the Federal Rules of Criminal exempts from defense discovery only items not material and the work product of government Finally, Rule 506 itself requires the govern ment to produce material concerning which a claim of privilege has been made, if the requesting party has demonstrated its relevance.145 The penalty for failing to produce the requested evidence is dismissal of the pertinent charge by the military 140MilR.
Evid. 506(aJ.Seenote 118, supra.
14118U.S.C.
5 3500.
Seenote 126, supra.
142See e.g., Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963);United States v. Augure, 427 US. 97 (1976); cf. United States v. Giglio, 405 U.S. 150 (1972) (evidence relating to credibility required to be disclosed).
'Wed.
Rules Cr. Proc. 16, 18 U.S.C., Appendix.
The Federal Rules of Criminal Pro cedure are applicable in courts - martial to the extent not otherwise provided by the Manual.
U.C.M.J. art.
36, 10 U.S.C. Q 836 (1976); see United States v. Batchelor, 19 C.M.R. 452 (A.C.M.R. 1955).
144Under Rules 16(a)(l)(C) (D), Fed R. Crim.
Proc., supra note 143, the defendant and is guaranteed access to documents, tangible objects, and reports of examinations and tests "within the posession, custody or control of the government," if they "are material to the preparation of the defense or are intended for use by the government as evidence in chief at the trial."
There is no requirement of materiality for access by the defendant to statements of the defendant or to the defendant's prior criminal record in the hands of the government, under Rules 16(a)(l)(A) (B). and Under Rule 16(a1(2),the defendant is not authorized to discover or inspect "reports, memoranda, or other internal government documents made by the at torney for the government or other governmental agents in connection with the in vestigation or prosecution of the case, or of statements made by government witnesses or prospective government witnesses except as provided in 18 U.S.C. Q 3500."
lq5Thestandard is stated in Rule 506(i1(4)(B), Mil. R. Evid., as follows:
(BJ Standard.
Government information is subject to disclosure under this subdivision if the party making the request demonstrates a specific need for information containing evidence that is relevant to the guilt or in nocence of the accused and otherwise admissible in the court - martial pro ceeding.
Mil. R. Evid. 506(iJ deals with in camera proceedings concerning government in formation other than classified information.
36
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
In light of these restrictions, the argument could be made that the exceptions, necessary to preserve its constitutionality, have swallowed up the rule.
What this indicates is that Rule 506 is not a rule of evidence or a privilege at all.
Rather it is a procedural rule regulating the discovery of certain kinds of evidence.
It establishes procedures to be followed in determining whether discovery is nece~sary,'~' regulating the manner of disclosure to the and limiting lG6This set forth in Rule 506(i)(4)(D), is Mil. R. Evid.: (Dj Sanction.
If the military judge makes a determination under this sub division that permits disclosure of the information and the government con tinues to object to disclosure of the information, the military judge shall dismiss the charges or specifications or both to which the information rekt~s.
"'The procedures to be followed for in camera proceedings are described in Rule 506(i)(4)(A), follows: as
In camera proceeding.
(A) Procedure.
Upon finding that the disclosure of some or all of the in. formation submitted by the government under subsection (1)reasonably could be expected to cause identifiable damage to the public interest, the military judge shall conduct an in camera proceeding.
Prior to the in camera proceeding, the government shall provide the accused with notice of the in formation that will be at issue.
This notice shall identify the information that will be at issue whenever that information previously has been made available to the accused in connection with proceedings in the same case.
The government may describe the information by generic category, in such form as the military judge may approve, rather than identifying the specific information of concern to the government when the government has not previously made the information available to the accused in connection with pretrial proceedings.
Following briefing and argument by the parties in the in camera proceeding, the military judge shall determine whether the information may be disclosed at the court - martial proceeding.
When the government's motion under this subdivision is filed prior to the proceeding at which disclosure is sought, the military.
2ge shall rule prior to com mencement of the relevant proceeding.
(4)
1G8Disclosure discussed in Rule 506(gj, Mil. R. Evid.: is (gl Disclosure of government information to the accused.
If the govern ment agrees to disclose government information to the accused subsequent to a claim of privilege under this rule, the military judge, at the request of the government.
shall enter an appropriate protective order to guard against the compromise of the information disclosed to the accused.
The terms of any such protective order may include provisions: (1) Prohibiting the disclosure of the information except as authorized by the military judge; (2) Requiring storage of the material in a manner appropriate for the nature of the material to be disclosed:
37
MILITARY LAW REVIEW the unnecessary revelation of sensitive inf0rmati0n.l~~
[VOL. 92
Rule 505 cannot be similarly characterized.
As previously noted, a governmental privilege for state and military secrets is well (3) Requiring controlled access to the material during normal business hours and at at other times upon reasonable notice: 14) Requiring the maintenance of logs recording access by persons authorized by the military judge to have access to the government informa tion in connection with the preparation of the defense;
15) Regulating the making and handling of notes taken from material con taining government information: or
(6) Requesting the convening authority to authorize the assignment of government security personnel and the provision of government storage facilities.
'dgPr~~ed~re~ for protecting government information used as evidence are set forth in Rules 506(j)and (k).Mil. R. Evid..
as follows: (j) Introduction of government information subject to a claim of privilege
(1) Precautions by military judge.
In order to prevent unnecessary disclosure of government information after there has been a claim of privilege under this rule, the military judge may order admission into evidence of only part of a writing, recording, or photograph or may order ad mission into evidence of the whole writing, recording, or photograph, with excision of some or all of the government information contained therein.
(2) Contents of writing, recording, or photograph.
permit proof of the contents of a writing, recording, tains government information that is the subject under this rule without requiring introduction into or a duplicate.
The military judge may or photograph that con of a claim of privilege evidence of the original
(3) Taking of testimony.
During examination of a witness.
the prosecution may object to any question or line of inquiry that may require the witness to disclose government information not previously found relevant and material to the defense if such information has been or is reasonably likely to be the subject of a claim of privilege under this rule.
Following such an objection, the military judge shall take such suitable action to determine whether the response is admissible as will safeguard against the com promise of any government information.
Such action may include requiring the government to provide the military judge with a proffer of the witness' response to the question or line of inquiry and requiring the accused to pro vide the military judge with a proffer of the nature of the information the ac. cused seeks to elicit.
(kl Procedures to safeguard against compromise of government informa tion disclosed to courts - martial.
The Secretary of Defense may prescribe procedures for protection against the compromise of government informa -
38
39811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
recognized.
In addition, Rule 505 is distinguished from Rule 506 by the provisions of Rule 505 for alternatives to full di~clo~ure,'~~ and by the requirement that the military judge must find material pre judice to a substantial right to the accused before dismissal is all~wed.'~'
B. PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS Because the procedural implications of Rules 505 and 506 are nearly identical, this discussion will focus on Rule 505, pointing out those areas where the rules differ.
tion submitted to courts - martial and appellate authorities after a claim of privilege.
'Vhese provisions are set forth in Rule 505(i)(4)(D), follows: as
(D) Alternatives to full disclosure.
If the military judge makes a deter mination under this subdivision that would permit disclosure of the in formation or if the government elects not to contest the relevance, materiali ty, and admissibility of any classified information, the government may proffer a statement admitting for purposes of the proceeding any relevant facts such information would tend to prove or may submit a portion or sum mary to be used in lieu of the information.
The military judge shall order that such statement, portion, or summary be used by the accused in place of the classified information unless the military judge finds that use of the classified information itself is necessary to afford the accused a fair trial.
'51Thisprovision appears at the end of Rule 505(f),Mil. R. Evid.:
(f) Action after referral of charges.
If an claim of privilege has been made under this rule with respect to classified information that apparently con tains evidence that is relevant and material to an element of the offense or a legally cognizable defense and is otherwise admissible in evidence in the court - martial proceeding, the matter shall be reported to the convening authority.
The convening authority may: (1) institute action to obtain the classified information for use by the military judge in making a determination under subdivision (i);
(21 dismiss the charges; (3) dismiss the charge or specifications or both to which the information relates; or (4) take such other action as may be required in the interests of justice.
If, after a reasonable period of time, the information is not provided to the military judge in circumstances where proceeding with the case without such information would materially prejudice a substantial right of the ac cused, the military judge shall dismiss the charges or specifications or both to which the classified information relates.
39
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
Prior to the referral of charges,152 any request for discovery of classified information made by the accused must be answered by Not the convening authority if a claim of privilege is to be made.153 withstanding the provision of subparagraph (c), that the holder of the privilege (the convening authority) may authorize a witness or trial counsel to assert the government's claim,154 prior to referral the convening authority must personally act.
The rule not only allows the convening authority to withhold but also
'52'*Referral''is the process of placing the charges before a court - martial for trial.
Referral of the charges by competent authority (a commander exercising special or general court - martial convening authority) is a jurisdictional requirement.
Sec Manual for Courts - Martial, supra note 5, at paras.
33jand 35a.
'53Mil.R.
Evid. 505idl states: (d)Action prior to referral of charges.
Prior to referral of charges, the con vening authority shall respond in writing to a request by the accused for classified information if the privilege in this rule is claimed for such in formation.
The convening authority may: (1)Delete specified items of classified information from documents made available to the accused;
(2) Substitute a portion or summary of the information for such classified documents: (3) Substitute a statement admitting relevant facts that the classified in formation would tend to prove: (4) Provide the document subject to conditions that will guard against the compromise of the information disclosed to the accused; or
(5) Withhold disclosure if action under (1) through (4) cannot be taken without causing identifiable damage to the national security.
Any objection by the accused to withholding of information or to the con ditions of disclosure shall be raised through a motion for appropriate relief at a pretrial session.
lS4This explained at Mil. R. Evid. 505(cl, as follows: is (c)Who may claim the privilege.
The privilege may be claimed by the head of the executive or military department or government agency concerned based on a finding that the information is properly classified and that disclosure would be detrimental to the national security.
A person who may claim the privilege may authorize a witness or trial counsel to claim the privilege on his or her behalf.
The authority of the witness or trial counsel to do so is presumed in the absence of evidence to the contrary.
lS5Mil.
Evid. 505(d(5).Seenote 153, supra.
R.
40
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
provides him or her with alternatives to full disclosure,'56 and em powers him to regulate disclosure so as to avoid compromi~e.'~~ Rule 506 is substantially similar to Rule 505 in its pre - referral procedures.
The only significant difference is that the personal ac tion of the convening authority is not required.
Instead, the rule is addressed only to "the go~ernment."'~~ Apparently, an appropriate government representative, exercising the requisite authority, could take the actions allowed by this section.
Such an official could be the staff judge advocate or chief of military justice.
Subdivision (e) of Rule 505, dealing with pretrial sessions, is ap plicable only after charges have been properly referred.
Discussion of such sessions in this article will follow an examination of postreferral options.'59 After the charges have been referred, the convening authority still has the responsibility of taking action.
Subdivision (f) allows -
`56Mil.R.
Evid. 505(d)(1)-(3), Seenote 153, supra.
15'Mil.R.
Evid. 505(d)(4).
Seenote 153, supra.
15*Thetext of Mil. R. Evid. 506(d) is as follows: (d) Action prior to referral of charges.
Prior to referral of charges, the government shall respond in writing to a request for government informa. tion if the privilege in this rule is claimed for such informaton.
The govern ment shall: (1) delete specified items of government information claimed to be privileged from documents made available to the accused; (2) substitute a portion or summary of the information for such documents;
(31 substitute a statement admitting relevant facts that the government in formation would tend to prove; 14) provide the document subject to conditions similar to those set forth in subdivision (g)of this rule; or
(5) withhold disclosure if actions under (1) through (4) cannot be taken without causing identifiable damage to the public interest.
Seenote 153, supra, for the text of the analogous provision of Rule 505.
159Rule506 arranges these subdivisions in reverse order from Rule 505.
This might indicate a transpositional error.
It is this author's opinion that Rule 505 sould be corrected so as to present the material in a more orderly fashion.
41
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
the convening authority to dismiss the charges in lieu of disclosure,160 make the material available to the military judgelG1 or so that a determination can be made as to the relevance and ad missibility of the desired evidence162 well as its relationship to as national security.lG3Should the convening authority continue to withhold the evidence, and not dismiss the charges, then the military judge, upon a finding of material prejudice to a substantial right of the accused, may order the charges dismissed.lG4This 160Mil.R.
Evid. 505(f)(2) and (3).Seenote 151, supra.
16'Mil.R.
Evid. 505(f)(l).
Seenote 151, supra.
`62The requirements for such a determination are set forth in Rules 505(i)(4)(B) and iC1.
Mil. R. Evid..
as follows:
(B) Standard.
Classified information is not subject to disclosure under this subdivision unless the information is relevant and material to an ele ment of the offense or a legally cognizable defense and is otherwise admissi ble in evidence.
(C) Ruling.
Unless the military judge makes a written determination that the information meets the standard set forth in (B),the information may not be disclosed or otherwise elicited at a court - martial proceeding.
The record of the in camera proceeding shall be sealed and attached to the record of trial as an appellate exhibit.
The accused may seek reconsideration of the determination prior to or during trial.
'63Therequirement for this showing is set forth in Rule 505(i)(3), Mil. R. Evid..
as follows: (3) Demonstration of national security nature of the information.
In order to obtain an in camera proceeding under this rule, the government shall sub mit the classified information for examination only by the military judge and shall demonstrate by affidavit that disclosure of the information reasonably could be expected to cause damage to the national security in the degree required to warrant classification under the applicable executive order, statute, or regulation.
`62Thispower is given to the military judge at the end of Rule 505(f),Mil. R. Evid.
See note 151, supra, for the text of the rule.
The analogous provisions of Rule 506 differ from these provisions of Rule 505, in that the accused must demonstrate a specific need for the information.
Mil. R. Evid. 506(i)(4)(B); note 145, supra.
The judge see may dismiss the charges after a reasonable time has elapsed, without a showing of material prejudice: (e)Action after referral of charges.
After referral of charges.
if a claim of privilege has been made under this rule with respect to government in. formation that apparently contains evidence that is relevant and material to an element of the offense or a legally cognizable defense and is otherwise admissible in evidence in the court - martial proceeding, the matter shall be reported to the convening authority.
The convening authority may: (1)institute action to obtain the information for use by the military judge in making a determination under subdivision (i);
42
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
represents a broadening of the military judge's powers over the former practice wherein all decisions with respect to compliance or dismissal rested with the g0~ernment.l~~ Subdivision (e) requires that matters concerning claims of privilege under 505(a)be litigated at a pretrial session conducted in accordance with Article 39(a) of the Code.166The rule allows the military judge to hold such a hearing upon application of either par ty or upon his own motion.
Subdivision (g) empowers the military judge to regulate the man ner and extent of disclosure agreed to be made by the government.
Upon government motion the military judge may enter a protective order to safeguard the classified information from unauthorized disclos~re,'~~ or may make a determination to limit the amount of 121 dismiss the charges; (31 dismiss the charges or specifications or both to which the information relates: or (4) take other action as may be required in the interests of justice.
If, after a reasonable period of time, the information is not provided to the military judge, the military judge shall dismiss the charges or specifica tions or both to which the information relates.
Mil. R. Evid. 506(e).
This difference in the threshold reuirement substantiates the author's contention that 506 is more of a rule of discovery than a rule of privilege.
WJnites States v. Gagnon, 21 C.M.A. 158,44 C.M.R. 212 (1972).
16'jMil.
R. Evid. 505(e), note 164, supra.
An article 39(a) session is an out - of - court hearing at which the accused and counsel for both sides are present.
Testimony may be taken and the proceedings are made part of the record.
For detailed discussion of the procedures followed under Art.
39(a), see Manual for Courts - Martial, supra note 5, para. 53d(l).
'"Mil. R. Evid. 505(g)(l), which lists the measures which the military judge may take: (g) Disclosure of classified information to the accused.
(1) Protective order.
If the governme'nt agrees to formation to the accused, the military judge, at the ment, shall enter an appropriate protective order to promise of the information disclosed to the accused.
protective order may include provisions: disclose classified in request of the govern guard against the com The terms of any such
(A) Prohibiting the disclosure of the information except as authorized by the military judge;
43
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
governmental disclosure.168 In this regard the judge's options in clude deletion or excision of portions of the classified material made available,169 substitution of information summaries in lieu of the actual material,170 or substitution of stipulations of fact in lieu of the actual material.171In making his determination that limited disclosure is appropriate, the military judge may consider the government's motion, and any material submitted in support thereof, outside the presence of the accused.
The material available to the judge would presumably include the classified material itself, provided by the convening authority in accordance with paragraph (f)(l) of the rule.
The Supreme Court endorsed such in (B) Requiring storage of material in a manner appropriate for the level of classification assigned to the documents to be disclosed: (C) Requiring controlled access to the material during normal business hours and at other times upon reasonable notice:
(DI Requiring appropriate security clearances for persons having a need to examine the information in connection with the preparation of the defense; (E) Requiring the maintenance of logs regarding access by all persons authorized by the military judge to have access to the classified information in connection with the preparation of the defense;
(F) Regulating the making and handling of notes taken from material con taining classified information; or
(G) Requesting the convening authority to authorize the assignment of government security personnel and the provision of government storage facilities.
16*Threetypes of limitations on disclosure are set forth in Mil. R. Evid. 505(g)(21,as follows: (2) limited disclosure.
The military judge, upon motion of the government, shall authorize (A) the deletion of specified items of classified information from documents to be made available to the defendant, (B) the substitution of a portion or summary of the information for such classified documents, or (C) the substitution of a statement admitting relevant facts that the classified information would tend to prove, unless the military judge deter mines that disclosure of the classified information itself is necessary to enable the accused to prepare for trial.
The government's motion and any materials submitted in support thereof shall, upon request of the govern ment, be considered by the military judge in camera and shall not be disclosed to the accused.
'69Mil.R.
Evid. 505(g)(2)(A), id. 170Mil.R.
Evid. 505(gJ(2)(B), supra note 168.
"'Mil.
R. Evid. 505(gi(2)(c), supra note 168.
44
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
camera evaluation by the trial court in the N i x ~ n case, and com l~~ mented on the necessity of preserving the secrecy of nonrelevant material excised from the wh01e.l~~ Rule 506(g)provides only for the issuance of protective orders by the military judge.
It does not authorize limited disclosure, nor does it address Jencks requests as provided in Rule 505(g)(3).
Rule 505(g)(3)provides that, whenever the government asserts a Rule 505 privilege in response to a Jencks Act request'75 by the defense, the military judge shall examine the privileged material in camera and outside the presence of the The military judge is required to determine, in his in camera examination, whether the material is properly ~lassified"~ whether the state and ment is consistent with the witness's in - court testimony.
If the judge determines the classified portion to be consistent with the
"'United States v. Nixon, 418 US. 687 (1974).
173 It is elementary that in camera inspection of evidence is always a pro cedure calling for scrupulous protection against any release or publication of material not found by the court, at that stage, probably admissible in evidence and relevant to the issues of the trial for which it is sought.
418 US. at 714.
17418 U.S.C. 4 3500 (1976).
175TheJencks Act makes statements prepared by government witnesses subject to discovery by the defense.
Seenote 126, supra.
l"jMil.
R. Evid. 505(g)(3)(B), which reads as follows: (B) Closed session.
If the privilege in this rule is invoked during con sideration of a motion under section 3500 of title 18, United States Code, the government may deliver such statement for the inspection only by the military judge in camera and may provide the military judge with an af fidavit identifying the portions of the statement that are classified and the basis for the classification assigned.
If the military judge finds that disclosure of any portion of the statement identified by the government as classified could reasonably be expected to cause damage to the national security in the degree required to warrant classification under the ap plicable executive order, statute, or regulation and that such portion of the statement is consistent with the witness' testimony, the military judge shall excise the portion from the statement.
With such material excised, the military judge shall then direct delivery of such statement to the accused for use by the accused.
If the military judge finds that such portion of the statement is inconsistent with the witness' testimony, the government may move for a proceeding under subdivision (i).
'77R~le 505(g)(3)(B), provides that the judge must find "that disclosure of any id., portion of the statement identified by the government as classified could reasonably
45
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
witness's in - court testimony, he may order excision of the classified portion prior to delivery to the defense.
If the material is determined to be inconsistent with the in - court testimony, the government must litigate its claim in a closed Article 39(a), U.C.M.J., session as provided by Rule 505(i).178 Before disclosing any classified material in connection with a court - martial, the defense must provide the government adequate notice.179 Failure to comply with this notice requirement may result in the military judge prohibiting the introduction by the defense of be expected to cause damage to the national security in the degree required to waTrant classification under the applicable executive order, statute, or regulation."
(Emphasis added.)
Two inferences may be drawn from this language.
First, the judge could determine that material that is not classified meets the criteria established for classification and is therefore the proper subject of a claim of privilege.
And second, the military judge could determine that the material is improperly classified; that the criteria established by executive order, statute, or regulation, have not been met.
As to the first inference, Rule 505(a),note 118, supra, and Rule 505(bl(l),note 120, supra, com. bine to negate it.
Rule 505(a) creates a privilege only for "classified information," which is defined by 505(b)(l)as material "that has been determined . . . to require protection against unauthorized disclosure."
Clearly this means that material must beclassified to be subject to the privilege, The second inference remains.
The judge could, upon inspection, determine that the material is not properly classified and that the privilege does not apply.
This ap parently substitutes a judicial determination for an administrative one.
Not withstanding the problems associated with this blurring of the separation of the judicial and executive functions the wording of the rule clearly empowers the military judge to effectively declassify material he determines not to warrant classification.
This same language is used in Rule 505(i)(3) and will be dealt with again.
See note 163, supra.
178Mil.
Evid. 505(g)(3)(B), R. note 176, supra.
"In camera proceeding" is defined at Rule 505Ml) as follows: (1) Definition.
For purposes of this subdivision, an "in camera pro ceeding" is a session under Article 39(a)from which the public is excluded.
17"he notice requirement is set forth in Rule 505(h): (h)Notice of the accused's intention to disclose classified information (1)Notice by the accused.
If the accused reasonably expects to disclose or to cause the disclosure of classified information in any manner in connec. tion with a court - martial proceeding, the accused shall notify the trial counsel in writing of such intention and file a copy of such notice with the military judge.
Such notice shall be given within the time specified by the military judge under subdivision (e] or, if no time has been specified, prior to arraignment of the accused.
46
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
classified evidence or testimony.la0 Rule 506 merely prohibits defense disclosure until the government has been afforded an op portunity to assert its privilege.18' Subdivision (i) of each of the two rules provides for litigation on the merits of the government's privilege claim at an Article 39(a) session closed to the public.
Before we examine the details of this provision, an examination of the constitutionality of such hearings is appropriate, in light of Richmond Newspapers Inc. v. Virginia.la2 Later we will consider Rule 505(j)(5), which permits the exclusion of the public from in - court sessions involving the introduction of classified material.
In the Richmond Newspapers case, the Supreme Court was called upon to decide whether the public and press had a right to attend criminal trials.'83 The majority opinion distinguished the court's as decision in Gannett Co. Inc. v. DePasqualela4 dealing solely with the exclusion of the public from pretrial suppression hearings.
Clearly if the closed article 39(a) session held under the provisions of M.R.E. 505(i) is the result of a pretrial assertion of the privilege, Gannett would say it was constitutionally permissible.
The groblems arise when the 505(i) hearing is held as a result of a motion
(2) Continuing duty to notify.
Whenever information not covered by a notice under expects to disclose at any such proceeding, counsel and the military judge in writing as
the accused learns of classified (1) that the accused reasonably the accused shall notify the trial soon as possible thereafter.
(3) Content of notice.
The notice required by this subdivision shall include a brief description of the classified information.
(4) Prohibition against disclosure.
The accused may not disclose any in. formation known or believed to be classified until notice has been given under this subdivision and until the government has been afforded a reasonable opportunity to seek a determination under subdivision (i).
(5) Failure to comply.
If the accused fails to comply with the requirements of this subdivision, the military judge may preclude disclosure of any classified information not made the subject of notification and may prohibit the examination by the accused of any witness with respect to any such in formation.
'80Mil.R.
Evid. 505(h)(5), id. '*'Mil.
R. Evid. 506(h),supranote 179.
la* _U.S.,65L.Ed.Zd973, lOOS.Ct.2814(1980).
le31d., L.Ed.2d at 978, 100 S. Ct. at 2818.
65 la4433U.S.
368 (19791, discussed at 65 L.Ed.2d 981.
47
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
raised after trial has commenced, and when the public is excluded from in - court proceedings under Rule 505(j).
Richmond Newspapers does not create an artificial litmus test by which public access to criminal trials is to be measured.
In his historical review of the tradition of public trials, the Chief Justice was concerned with the trial as a whole and drew no distinction be tween sessions held with the jury present and sessions held without the Instead of propounding a test for public access, the Court concludes that the trials of criminal cases are presumptively open'86 and may be closed only when "the defendant's superior right to a fair trial, or . , . some other overriding consideration re quires Protection of the government's well recognized privilege to safeguard military and state secrets is properly one of the "overriding considerations" justifying the conduct of a pro ceeding closed to the public.'S8 The right of the public to an open trial is grounded in the first and fourteenth amendments.'89 Neither of those amendments mandate public access to governmental information.'gO The right of the ac cused to access to confidential government information is bottomed upon his rights under the fifth and sixth amendments.
By its own terms the rule requires the government to produce or abate when those rights are materially impaired.
Therefore while the ac cused may compel disclosure of confidential information in the in U.S.
lE5
,
65 L.Ed.2d 982-85, 100 S. Ct. 2821-2823 (1980).
`a6"[T]hehistorical evidence demonstrates conclusively that at the time when our organic laws were adopted, criminal trials both here and in England had long been presumptively open.
This is no quirk of history; rather, it has long been recognized as an indispensable attribute of an Anglo - American trial."
Id..
65 L.Ed.2d at 984, 100 S. Ct. at 2823.
`871d., L.Ed.2d at 982, 100 S. Ct. at 2821.
"We have no occasion here to define the 65 circumstances in which all or parts of a criminal trial may be closed to the public, but our holding today does not mean the First Amendment rights of the public and representatives of the press are absolute."
Id., 65 L.Ed.2d at 992, 100 S. Ct. at 2830, n. 18 (citations omitted).
la8SeeUnited States v. Nixon.
418 U.S. 683 (1974);Reynolds v. United States.
345 U.S. l(1953).
189RichmondNewspapers, Inc. v. Virginia, , 65 L.Ed.2d 973, 992, 100 S. U.S. Ct. 2814, 2829 (1980). lgUHouchkins KQED, Inc..
438 U.S. l(1978). v.
48
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
terest of a fair trial, the government may still protect itself from unreasonable compromise by closing the doors of the court to the public.
Before the military judge convenes an "in camera proceeding" under Rule 505(i),the government must demonstrate to the military judge that its claim of privilege is properly taken.lgl This requires, as does subdivision (g) concerning Jencks Act motions, that the military judge determine whether the information involved is pro perly classified.'g* This not only calls for a substitution of the judge's assessment of the national security value of the informa tion for the classifying authorities' assessment, it also requires the judge to make a determination for which his training may not have equipped him.
Also raised, but not resolved, is the question of whether the military judge may determine that the nation's securi ty is not implicated and may sua sponte order declassification.
Notwithstanding what the rule does not resolve, it clearly does give the military judge the authority to make the following deter minations: He may determine the information to be irrelevant to an element of the offense or to a legally cognizable defense, and ex clude the evidence.
He may determine the evidence to be relevant but inadmissible.
He may conclude that the evidence is relevant, admissible, and properly classified (therefore privileged).
Or he may determine that the evidence is relevant and admissible but not properly classified (therefore not privileged).lg3 is with these last It two options that we are concerned.
If the relevant and admissable evidence is privileged, the military judge may permit the government to elect an alternative to full disclos~re'9~ unless the interest of fairness requires otherwise.lg5If the relevant and admissible evidence is not privileg ed, then no alternatives to full disclosure are available.
Should the judge determine that full disclosure is required, and the governlS1Mil.R.
Evid. 505(i)(4)(A).
lg2Note 177, supra.
'"Mil. R. Evid. 505(i)(4)(AI, supra note 191, Mil. R. Evid. 505(i)(4)(B), supra note 162.
lg4Mil.R.
Evid. 505(i)14)(D), supra note 150.
The government may submit a stipula tion of fact or summary of the information to be used in lieu of the actual informa. tion. 195
Id.
49
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92 him, cor full than
ment does not comply, a variety of sanctions are available to including dismissal of charges.lg6Rule 506 does not have any responding provisions allowing for alternatives to disclosure.197 Nor does it provide for sanctions other dismiss a 1.
98
In addition to allowing for closed trial se~sions,~99 subdivision (j) contains other provisions designed to prevent the unnecessary compromise of privileged matter, the most important of which is (j)(3),200exception to the best evidence rule.2o'This provision per an mits the military judge to allow introduction into evidence of proof lg6The permissible sanctions are described in Rule 505(i)(4)(E), Mil. R. Evid., as follows:
(E) Sanctions.
If the military judge determines that alternatives to full disclosure may not be used and the government continues to object to disclosure of the information, the military judge shall issue any order that the interests of justice require.
Such an order may include an order: (i) striking or precluding all or part of the testimony of a witness; (ii)declaring a mistrial; (iii) finding against the government on any issue as to which the evidence is relevant and material to the defense; (iv)dismissing the charges, with or without prejudice; or (vl dismissing the charges or specifications or both to which the informa tion relates.
Any such order shall permit the government to avoid the sanction for non disclosure by permitting the accused to disclose the information at the per tinent court - martial proceeding.
lg7 Mil. R. Evid. 506ii1(4)(C). supra note 162.
lg8Mil.R.
Evid. 506(i)(4)(D), supra note 150.
lg9Thisis provided in Rule 505(j)(5). follows: as (51 Closed session.
If counsel for all parties, the military judge, and the members have received appropriate security clearances, the military judge may exclude the public during that portion of the testimony of a witness that discloses classified information.
200The text of rule 505(j)(3) as follows: is (3) Contents of writing, recording, or photograph.
The military judge may permit proof of the contents of a writing, recording, or photograph that con tains classified information without requiring introduction into evidence of the original or a duplicate.
*O'The best evidence rule as it appears in the Military Rules of Evidence is Rule 1002, which reads as follows:
50
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
of the content of a privileged writing, recording, or photograph without requiring introduction of the original.
The previous chapter XXVII of the Manual allowed the head of an executive agency or military department to substitute a summary in lieu of the original if a determination was made that disclosure of the original would result in "detriment to the public interest."*02The authority to determine whether a summarized exhibit will be admit ted under the M.R.E. now rests instead with the military judge.
Rule 506(j) is substantially similar to 505(j) and also adopts an ex ception to the best evidence r~le.~03does not allow for closed trial It REQUIREMENT OF AN ORIGINAL To prove the content of a writing, recording, or photograph, the original writing, recording, or photograph is required, except as otherwise provided in these rules, this Manual, or by Act of Congress.
The official analysis following the text of the rule is set forth here in part: Rule 1002 is taken verbatim from the Federal Rule except that "this Manual" has been added in recognition of the efficacy of other Manual pro visions.
The Rule is similar in scope to the best evidence rule found in para. 143a(19)of the present Manual except that specific reference is made in the rule to recordings and photographs.
Unlike the present Manual, the Rule does not contain the misleading reference to "best evidence" and is plainly applicable only to writings, recordings, or photographs.
202The former Manual provision states in relevant part: (d) Summaries of official records.
If the head of an executive or military department or independent governmental agency determines that it would be detrimental to the public interest to disclose the text or informational source of a certain official record kept under the authority of the depart. ment or agency, a properly authenticated (143b(2)(f)) certificate or statement signed by him, or by his deputy or assistant, setting forth a summary of the record is as admissible in evidence as the record itself, provided that the certificate or statement contains a statement to the effect that the abovementioned determination was made.
Manual for Courts - Martial, supra note 5, at para. 143a(2)(d).
*03Thisexception is set forth in Rule 506(j)(2): (2) Contents of writing, recording, or photograph.
permit proof of the contents of a writing, recording, tains government information that is the subject under this rule without requiring introduction into or a duplicate.
The military judge may or photograph that con of a claim of privilege evidence of the original
51
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
sessions nor does it permit the record of trial to be classified.204 In sum, the new classified information privilege confers upon the military judge greater authority and flexibility than he or she en joyed under the former practice.
Along with this expanded authori ty comes the threat of blurring the separation between the judicial and executive functions by substituting the judgment of one for the other.
The procedures established in the M.R.E. are an excellent at tempt to balance the competing interests of the government and ac cused.
Yet the military judge should be mindful of the public's right to open access to criminal trials and he should consider that right before ordering that the proceedings be closed.
Rule 506 does not really establish a public interest privilege for the government.
Rather it provides the judge and the accused with procedures to be followed when sensitive, nonclassified informa tion is sought to be discovered.
It also provides guidelines to deter mine when the government will be forced to produce such evidence or abate the prosecution.
VII.
RULE 507: INFORMERS
American jurisprudence has long recognized the need to shield the identity of police informants to encourage free disclosure to law 2041n contrast, Rule 505 does provide for both steps.
Closed sessions are authorized by Rule 505(j)(5), note 199, supra.
Classification of trial records is covered by Rule 505(jH6),as follows: (6)Record of trial.
The record of trial with respect to any classified matter will be prepared under paragraph 82dof this Manual.
Para 82dof the Manual, supranote 5, reads as follows: d. Security classification.
When the record contains information which is required to be classified by the security regulations of the armed force con. cerned, the trial counsel will take appropriate action in accordance with per. tinent regulations to assign a proper security classification to the record.
However, convening authorities, staff judge advocates, and legal officers will be on the alert to downgrade or declassify a record of trial which does not contain data requiring security protection.
If the papers accompanying the record of trial include classified matter which is not material to the in quiry, this matter should be withdrawn from the papers to be bound with the record if the withdrawal will permit downgrading or declassification of the record.
If the accompanying papers include classified matter which is material to the inquiry, action should be taken to have this matter declassified or downgraded when that action is possible and will permit downgrading or declassification of the record.
52
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
enforcement authorities.205As originally expressed this privilege extended not only to the identity of the informer but to all com munications between the informer and the police.206When the Manual was first published it adopted this view and granted to in formants' communications a status equal to that of the delibera tions of courts and juries, and of diplomatic corre~pondence.~O~ But as the policy underlying the rule, to protect the informant from future dire consequences,208came into clearer focus, the courts began to shrink the scope of the privilege so that eventually only the informant's identitywas protected.209 In Roviaro v. United the Supreme Court denied the privilege of withholding an informant's identity at trial when the informer was a material participant in the crime2" or was a witness whose testimony was necessary for a fair determination of the case.212Declining to enunciate a fixed rule, the Court adopted a balancing test in which the need for secrecy is weighed against the defendant's right to prepare his defense, by considering the crime 205Vogel Gruaz, 110 US.311 (1884). v. zosId.
315.
at 207The1951 edition of the Manual for Courts - Martial states the following concerning informant's communications: b. Certain privileged communications.
- (1) State secrets and police secrets.
- Communications made by informants to public officers engaged in the discovery of crime are privileged.
The deliberations of courts and of grand or petit juries are privileged, but the results of their deliberations are not privileged.
Diplomatic correspondence is privileged and, in general, so are all oral and written official communications the disclosure of which would, in the opinion of the head of the executive or military department or independent governmental agency concerned, be detrimental to the public interest.
The privilege that extends to communications made by informants to public officers engaged in the discovery of crime may be waived by ap propriate governmental authorities.
This privilege does not warrant the exclusion from evidence of statements of informants which are inconsistent with, or might otherwise be used to impeach, their testimony as witnesses.
See 153 b (Impeachment of witnesses).
Manual for Courts - Martial, United States, 1951, para. 151Hl).
Seeunited States v. Hawkins, 6C.M.A.
135,lgC.M.R.261 (1955).
208SeeC.
McCormick, supranote 45, at 0 111.
ZogScher United States, 305 US. 251 (1938). v. 2'0353U.S.
53 (1957).
2111d.at 55.
z121d.
60.
at
53
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
charged, possible defenses, significance of the informer's testimony, and other relevant factors.213 And in McCray v. the Court held that, where the issue raised by the defense was the reliability of an informant who served merely as a conduit of information establishing probable cause for a police search, the "so long as the magistrate is in identity need not be formed of some underlying circumstances supporting the [officer's] conclusion and his belief that the informant involved whose identi ty need not be disclosed . . . was credible.. . [or]
62.
at 2'4386U.S.
300 (1967).
2151d.
305.
at 2161d.
311, quoting Aguilar v. Texas, 378 US.108 (1964). at 217See note 128, supra, for the opening sentences of the 1969 version of para. 151 b(1) of the Manual.
The remainder of that provision, which concerns primarily in formants, is as follows:
The deliberations of courts and of grand or petit juries are privileged, but the results of their deliberations are not privileged.
The identity of persons supplying information to public officials engaged in the discovery of crime is privileged against disclosure, and the communications of these in formants imparting the information are also privileged to the extent necessary to prevent disclosure of the informant's identity.
The privilege pertianing to the identity and communications of in. formants may be waived by appropriate governmental authorities.
This privilege is no longer applicable once the identity of the informant has been disclosed to those who would have cause to resent his communication.
Also, the privilege is not applicable with repect to an informant the disclosure of whose identity is necessary to the accused's defense on the issue of guilt or innocence.
Whether such a necessity exists will depend upon the particular circumstances of each case, taking into consideration the offense charged, the possible defenses, the possible significance of the informant's testimony, and other relevant factors.
When the prosecution used an infor mant as a prosecution witness, the privilege pertaining to communications made by informants is waived by the Government with respect to statements or reports of the informant which relate to the subject matter of the testimony of the witness, and therefore the privilege cannot be applied in opposition to an attempt by the defense to discover or disclose such a statement or report of the informant.
See 153 b (Impeachment of witnesses).
The principles expressed above, however, cannot be applied in opposition to a proper invocation of the privilege pertaining to diplomatic cor.
54
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
cases discussed above, but also as followed by military courts.218 Subsequent discussion of this topic will focus upon the provisions of Rule 507 of the M.R.E., including a discussion of the general rule and its exceptions, waiver, and the procedures established.
A. THE GENERAL RULE 1.
The Nature of the Privilege.
The privilege expressed in Rule 507 is essentially a recapitula that tion of the holding in R~viaro,~'~ the government has a privilege to withhold disclosure of an informant's identity.220 The respondence or to communications the disclosure of which would, in the opi nion of the head of the executive or military department or independent governmental agency concerned, be detrimental to the public interest.
In this connection, it should not be considered that the mere fact of disclosure of the communications or identity of informants is, of itself and regardless of the nature of the disclosure, detrimental to the public interest.
However, it should be recognized that invocation of such privilege might, depending upon the circumstances of the case, make it impossible to pro ceed with the trial where to do so would prejudice the substantial rights of the accused.
See 33f.
2'8Theprivilege may be limited only to protect the identity of the informant: United States v. French, 10 C.M.A. 171,27 C.M.R. 245 (1959).The privilege does not extend to situations wherein the informant was an active participant, or when the infor mant's testimony is necessary for a fair trial: United States v. Ness, 13 C.M.A. 18, 32 C.M.R. 18 (1962), United States v. Skywark, 37 C.M.R. 944 (A.C.M.R. 1967).
Disclosure is not required where the informant is a mere conduit for information: United States v. Miller, 43 C.M.R. 671 (A.C.M.R.),pet. denied, 43 C.M.R. 413 (1971).
'19353 U.S. 53 (1957).
ZZoThe privilege is set forth in Rule 507(a),Mil. R. Evid., as follows:
(a) Rule of privilege.
The United States or a state or subdivision thereof has a privilege to refuse to disclose the identity of an informant.
An "infor mant" is a person who has furnished information resulting in an investiga tion of a possible violation of law to a person whose official duties include the discovery, investigation, or prosecution of crime.
Unless otherwise privileged under these rules, the communications of an informant are not privileged except to the extent necessary to prevent the disclosure of the in formant's identity.
The rule is explained as follows in the official analysis: (a) Rule of privilege.
Rule 507(a) sets forth the basic rule of privilege for in formants and contains the substance of present Manual paragraph 151M1).
The new Rule, however, provides greater detail as to the application of the privilege than does the present Manual.
55
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
rule with respect to communications is stated in the negative: "The communications of an informant are not privileged except to the ex tent necessary to prevent disclosure of the informant's identity.22' This does not reflect any substantive change in the rule as it has evolved.
One curious aspect of the original statement of the privilege was the definition of the word "informant."
The rule as originally published stated, "An `informant' is a person who has furnished in formation resulting in an investigation of a possible violation of law to a person whose official duties include the discovery, in vestigation, or prosecution of crime."222 Both the proposed F.R.E. and the Uniform Rules of Evidence define an informant as one who "furnished information relating to or assisting in an investigati or^."^^^ A question of interpretation was clearly raised.
On the one hand it could be argued that this choice of words bodes nothing new.
None of the leading decisions concerning the privilege have focused on whether an investigation was in progress at the time the information was provided.
Furthermore, even if a person supplies information to law enforcement officials which is part of a broader inquiry, such information will result in a separate investigation of the facts contained therein.
Therefore the M.R.E. merely uses different words to express the same concept.
It could be argued, however, that this definition merely distinguishes an informant or conduit of information from an ac tive participant in the crime, shielding the former but not the latter.
This argument would seem to have two weaknesses.
First, such a definitional distinction seems to be unnecessary in the face of R ~ v i a r d ~ ~M ~ C r a y .Secondly, such a definitional resolution and ~~~.
The privilege is that of the United States or political subdivision thereof and applies only to information relevant to the identity of an informant.
An "informant" is simply an individual who has supplied "information resulting in an investigation of a possible violation of law" to a proper per son and thus includes good citizen reports to command or police as well as the traditional "confidential informants" who may be consistent sources of information.
Id. 2221d.
[Emphasis added.]
223Fed.
Evid. 510(a) (not enactedi; Unif.
R. Evid. 509(a).
R. 224353 U.S. 53 (19571.
225386 U.S. 300 (1967).
221
56
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
eliminates the need for an exception dealing with informants whose testimony concerns an issue of guilt or innocence.226 The counter argument is that the intent of the drafters is clear on the face of the rule.
Since this is a privilege held by the state, the rule should be strictly construed against the state.
Therefore the only "informant" is a person who provides information where there is no on - going investigation, since only then can the disclosure "result in an investigation."
All other police sources of information are "witnesses" and do not have the need for confiden tiality.
An alternative definition was available in the Uniform Rules and proposed Federal Rules; yet it was rejected in favor of the version at hand.
The consequences of such a definition were potentially disastrous.
The problem was brought to the drafter's attention and corrective action has been taken.227 2.
Exceptions
An exception to the government's privilege is made when the in formant's identity "is necessary to the accused's defense on the 226This exception is set forth at Mil. R. Evid. 507(c)(2), follows: as (2) Testimony on the issue ofguilt or innocence.
If a claim of privilege has been made under this rule, the military judge shall, upon motion by the ac cused, determine whether disclosure of the identity of the informant is necessary to the accused's defense on the issue of guilt or innocence.
Whether such a necessity exists will depend on the particular circumstances of each case, taking into consideration the offense charged, the possible defenses, the possible significance of the informant's testimony, and other relevant factors.
If it appears from the evidence in the case or from other showing by a party that an informant may be able to give testimony necessary to the accused's defense on the issue of guilt or in nocence, the military judge may make any order required by the interests of justice.
2270n July 3, 1980, the author discussed this problem with Major Fredric I. Lederer, JAGC, then of the Criminal Law Division, Office of The Judge Advocate General, Department of the Army, at the Pentagon.
Major Lederer, now an instructor at the Marshall - Wythe School of Law, College of William and Mary, Williamsburg, Va., was at that time a member of the committee that prepared the new military rules.
Major Lederer stated that the intention of the drafters was to mirror the proposed Federal Rule as to the functional definition of "informant."
He advised the author that the argument raised was valid and unanticipated, and would have to be ad-
57
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
issue of guilt or innocence."22* This would include not only factual defenses, as implied by the rule, but affirmative defenses as welLZ29 and other situations where a full and fair resolution of the case would be made possible by In determining whether the necessity exists the military judge is required to apply the balancing test prescribed in R~viaro.~~' all balancing tests this Like one relies upon uncertain standards, but the more recent cases in dicate that something more than mere speculation by the defense is required to trigger this exception to the privilege.232 Therefore the burden of proving the necessity of disclosure is on the defense, and a claim of necessity must be supported by some credible evidence.
Another exception is created for situations wherein the testimony of the informant is required to determine whether sufficient pro bable cause existed for the search that resulted in the evidence offered by the government.233 This exception is tied procedurally to dressed by the committee.
During a subsequent conversation between the same par ties on July 7, 1980, Major Lederer informed the author that, as a result of the 3 July discussion, the committee had included a proposed change to Rule 507(a)in the draft of the then unpublished executive order amending and correcting Exec.
Order No. 12,198, supra note 6.
On Sep. 1, 1980, the president signed Exec Order No. 12.233,45 Fed.
Reg. 58,503 (1980), which amended Rule 507.
In substance, the amendment deletes the word "resulting," and substitutes therefor the words "relating to or assisting" in the second sentence of rule 507(a).The text of the amendment is as follows: 1-111.
Rule 507(a)of the Military Rules of Evidence is amended by deleting "information resulting in an investigation" and substituting therefor "in formation relating to or assisting in an investigation" in the second sentence of that rule.
228Mil.
Evid. 507(c)(2), R. supra note 226.
229United States v. Hawkins, 6 C.M.A. 135, 19 C.M.R. 261 (1955)(affirmative defense of entrapment required disclosure of informant's identity); compareunited States v. Skywark, 37 C.M.R. 944 (A.F.C.M.R.),pet. denied, 38 C.M.R. 441 (1967) (evidence of entrapment heldinsufficient to warrant disclosure).
230Roviaro United States, 353 U.S.53 (1957) v. 231 Id. at 62.
232UnitedStates v. Bennett, 3 M.J. 903 (A.C.M.R. 19771, pet. denied, 4 M.J. 254; United States v. Marshall, 532 F.2d 1279 (9th Cir. 1976).
The proposed federal rule would have required the judge before taking action to find "a reasonable probabili ty" that the informant's identity would assist the defense.
Fed.
R. Evid. 510(c)(2J (not enacted).
Although the M.R.E. does not create such a standard, some of the cases suggest that some quantum of evidence has to be offered in support of the defense request for disclosure.
SeeUnited States v. Skywark, note 229, supra.
233Mil.
Evid. 507(c)(3).
R.
The text of this provision is set forth below:
58
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
motions made under Rule 311 to suppress evidence resulting from unlawful searches.
When such a motion has been made the govern ment must show by a preponderance of the evidence that the search was If the government cannot meet this burden without disclosing the informant's identity, and stands upon its privilege, then the evidence is If the government has met its (2) Adequate interest.
The accused had a reasonable expectation of privacy in the person, place or property searched; the accused had a legitimate interest in the property or evidence seized when challenging a seizure; or the accused would otherwise have grounds to object to the search or seizure under the Constitution of the United States as applied to members of the armed forces.
(3) Legality of obtaining evidence.
If a claim of privilege has been made under this rule with respect to a motion under rule 311, the military judge shall, upon motion of the accused, determine whether disclosure of the iden. tity of the informant is required by the Consititution of the United States as applied to members of the armed forces.
In making this determination, the military judge may make any order required by the interests of justice.
The official analysis of this rule explains as follows: (3) Legality of obtaining evidence.
Rule 507(c)(3) is new.
The Rule recognizes that circumstances may exist in which the Constitution may re quire disclosure of the identity of an informant in the context of determin ing the legality of obtaining evidence under Rule 311; see, e.g., Franks v. Delaware, 438 US.154,+ -, 98 S. Ct. 2674, 2684 (1978); McCray v. Illinois, 386 US.300 (1967) (both cases indicate that disclosure may be required in certain unspecified circumstances but do not in fact require such disclosure).
In view of the highly unsettled nature of the issue, the Rule does not specify whether or when such disclosure is mandated and leaves the determination to the military judge in light of prevailing case law utilized in the trial of criminal cases in the Federal district courts.
234This requirement is set forth at Mil. R. Evid. 311(e)(l), follows: as (e)Burden of proof.
(1)In general.
When an appropriate motion or objection has been made by the defense under subdivision (d),the prosecution has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that evidence was not obtained as a result of an unlawful search or seizure.
235That to say, the evidence is assumed to have been unlawfully obtained and is is treated accordingly.
This results from the application of Rule 311(a),Mil. R. Evid.: (a) General rule.
Evidence obtained as a result of an unlawful search or seizure made by a person acting in a governmental capacity is inadmissible against the accused if:
(1)Objection.
The accused makes a timely motion to suppress or an objec tion to the evidence under this rule; and
59
MILITARY LAW REVIEW burden, it disclosure M~Cra informant
[VOL. 92
seems to be upon the defense to demonstrate that is necessary.
In light of the Supreme Court's decision in ythe defense must offer some evidence to show that the ,~~~ was an "active participant in or witness to the crime in order to vitiate the privilege.
The burden imposed on the defense to overcome the policy supporting nondisclosure in such cases has been characterized as heavy.238
B. WAIVER Since the government is the holder of the privilege,239 certain ac tions by the government can abrogate the privilege.*`O Although the M.R.E. classify these actions as exceptions to the privilege, they are more properly viewed as types of waiver.
The acts that con stitute waiver are (a) the disclosure of the identity of the informant to "those who would have cause to resent" the inf~rmant,~~' (b) and calling the informant as a prosecution These same waivers are found both in paragraph 151b of the Manual and in the proposed Federal rules.
The disclosure contemplated by the first branch of the waiver rule is a revelation of the informant's identity to the persons from 236386 300 (1967).
U.S. 237United States v. Skeens, 449 F.2d 1066,1071 (D.C.
Cir. 1971).
2381d.
1070.
at 239Mil.
Evid. 507(b).This rule reads as follows: R. (bl Who may claim the privilege.
The privilege may be claimed by an ap propriate representative of the United States, regardless of whether the in formation was furnished to an officer of the United States or of a state or subdivision thereof.
The privilege may be claimed by an appropriate representative of a state or subdivision if the information was furnished to an officer thereof, except the privilege shall not be allowed if the prosecu tion objects.
24aThese actions or events are described at Rule 507(cl(l), Mil. R. Evid.:
(cl Exceptions.
(1) a Voluntary disclosures; informant as witness.
No privilege exists under this rule: (A) if the identity of the informant has been disclosed to those who would have cause to resent the communication by a holder of the privilege or by the informant's own action; or (BI if the informant appears as a witness for the prosecution.
24'Mil.
Evid. 507(c)(l)(A), R. id. 242Mil.
Evid. 507(c)(l)(B), R. note 240, supra.
60
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
whom the informant was intended to be protected.
As the Advisory Committee observed in the Federal rules, "disclosure.. . to another law enforcing agency is not calculated to undercut the objects of the privilege."z43 Therefore the fact that the police have shared their in formation with other law enforcement authorities is not a waiver.
It is interesting to note that disclosure to a hostile person by the informant is binding on the government as a waiver, notwithstan ding that it is the government, not the informant, that is the holder of the privilege.
The underlying reasoning is perfectly sound.
Once an informer has revealed his identity, no policy justification exists for prolonged governmental silence.
The witness branch of the waiver rule is grounded upon the deter mination that the defense interest in full and fair disclosure is serv ed by the ability to cross - examine all government witnesses.
In Harris v. United States,244 Ninth Circuit stated that the defense the interest in inquiring into the credibility of adverse witnesses outweighed the government's desire to conceal the fact that its witness was a paid informant.
Since the fact of a person serving as an informant bears upon his credibility as a witness, the govern ment waives its privilege by calling him.
C. PROCEDURES Subdivision (d)of Rule 507 directs the military judge to report to the convening authority for appropriate action the refusal of the government to reveal an informant's identity after the military judge has determined the revelation to be necessary.245 determinIn
243Fed Evid. 510 (not enacted), Advisory Committee's Note.
R. 244371 F.2d 365 (9th Cir. 1967).
265The procedures applicable under Rule 507 are described at Mil. R. Evid. 507(d): (d) Procedures.
If a claim of privilege has been made under this rule, the military judge may make any order required by the interests of justice.
If the military judge determines that disclosure of the identity of the infor mant is required under the standards set forth in this rule, and the prosecu tion elects not to disclose the identity of the informant, the matter shall be reported to the convening authority.
The convening authority may institute action to secure disclosure of the identity of the informant, terminate the proceedings, or take such other action as may be appropriate under the cir cumstances.
If, after a reasonable period of time disclosure is not made, the military judge, sua sponte or upon motion of either counsel and after a hear-
61
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
ing whether revelation is necessary, the military judge may hold an out - of - court hearing under Article 39(a).246 When insufficient or in conclusive evidence is produced in the 39(a) session, disclosure of the informant's identity may be the only means of determining whether the government claim of privilege is well taken.
This presents a procedural difficulty for the military judge.
Arti cle 39(a) requires the presence of the accused and of counsel from both sides.247 Disclosing the informant's identity to the judge in the presence of the accused is hardly a satisfactory way of preserving the government's privilege.
Therefore some kind of in camera pro ceeding may be required.
This is not the same kind of in camera hearing provided for in Rules 505 and 506, however.
As previously discussed, those rules define an in camera hearing as a 39(a)session but at which the accused and his that is closed to the counsel are still present.
There is substantial federal case authority for the judge to hold an inquiry in chambers wherein he or she compels disclosure of the informant's indentity out of the hearing of the This pro cedure would have been required in federal district courts had the proposed Federal Rule 510 been enacted.250 Given the mandate of Article 36 of the Uniform to conform military practice to accepted federal practice, this in camera procedure could probably be successfully urged upon a military court.
VIII.
RULES 508 AND 509: POLITICAL VOTE AND JURY DELIBERATIONS Rule 508 creates a privilege for which there is no counterpart in prior military practice.
The rule provides that the tenor of a pering if requested by either party, may dismiss the charges or specifications or both to which the information regarding the informant would relate if the military judge determines that further proceedings would materially pre. judice a substantial right of the accused.
U.C.M.J. art.
39(a),10 U.S.C. 0 839(a)(19761.
Id. 248Mil.
Evid. 505(i)(l), R. note 178, supra.
246 247
WJnited State v. Jackson, 384 F.2d 825 (3d Cir. 19671; United States v. Day, 384 F.2d 464 (3d Cir. 1967) (concurring opinion); United States v. Rawlinson, 487 F.2d 5 (9th Cir. 1973);United States v. Fischer, 531 F.2d 783 (5th Cir. 1976).
Z50Fed Evid. 510(c)(2) R. (not enacted).
25'U.C.M.J.art.
36, 10 U.S.C. 0 836 (1976).
62
19811 son's political vote illegally.252No such chapter XXVII.
The rule are substantially
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES is privileged unless the vote was cast provision is contained in the superseded new military rule and the proposed federal identical.253
The likelihood that the rule would find an occasion for applica tion is remote.
A person's vote would be relevant should anyone be tried by court - martial for violation of 10 U.S.C. 9 593.254 such a In case the tenor of the witness's vote would be relevant to the issue of whether the accused improperly prevented the witness from exer cising his franchise.
~~
Z52The text of Mil. R. Evid. 508, Political Vote, is as follows: A person has a privilege to refuse to disclose the tenor of the person's vote at a political election conducted by secret ballot unless the vote was cast illegally.
The official analysis explains the source, as follows: Rule 508 is taken from proposed Federal Rule of Evidence 507 and ex presses the substance of 18 U.S.C. 596 (1976) which is applicable to the รยง armed forces.
The privilege is considered essential for the armed forces because of the unique nature of military life.
253Fed.
Evid. 507 (not enacted).
R. 25410 U.S.C. 593.
This statute, entitled "Interference by armed forces," reads as รยง follows: Whoever, being an officer or member of the Armed Forces of the United States, prescribes or fixes or attempts to prescribe or fix, whether by pro. clamation, order or otherwise, the qualifications of voters at any election in any State: or Whoever, being such officer or member, prevents or attempts to prevent by force, threat, intimidation, advice or otherwise any qualified voter of any State from fully exercising the right of suffrage at any general or special election: or Whoever, being such officer or member, orders or compels or attempts to compel any election officer in any State to receive a vote from a person not legally qualified to vote: or Whoever, being such officer or member, imposes or attempts to impose any regulations for conducting any general or special election in a State, dif. ferent from those prescribed by law; or Whoever, being such officer or member, interferes in any manner with an election officer's dischage of his dutiesShall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned not more than five years, or both; and disqualified from holding any office of honor, profit or trust under the United States.
63
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
Rule 509, which extends a privilege to the deliberations of courts and juries, is a recodification of a similar privilege in the There is an extremely important exception to this privilege however.
That exception, Rule 606, is that a jury member may testify as to whether extraneous prejudicial information or unlawful outside or command influence was involved in the deliberative Although the Manual did not expressly provide for such an ex ception, the case law clearly indicates its existence.
Article 37, This section shall not prevent any officer or member of the Armed Forces from exercising the right of suffrage in any district to which he may belong, if otherwise qualified according to the laws of the State of such district.
June 25, 1948, c. 645, 62 Stat. 719.
Trial by court - martial would be possible, assuming no intervening jurisdictional defects were present, if the offense was alleged as a violation of art.
134, U.C.M.J., 10 U.S.C. 0 934 (1976).
255Manual Courts - Martial, para. 151M1), supra note 217.
The text of Rule 509 is for as follows: DELIBERATIONS OF COURTS AND JURIES Except as provided in rule 606, the deliberations of courts and grand and petit juries are privileged to the extent that such matters are privileged in trial of criminal cases in the United States district courts, but the results of the deliberations are not privileged.
256The exception is spelled out in Rule 606(b),Mil. R. Evid., as follows: (b)Inquiry into validity of findings or sentence.
Upon an inquiry into the validity of the findings or sentence, a member may not testify as to any mat ter or statement occurring during the course of the deliberations of the members of the court - martial or to the effect of anything upon the member's or any other member's mind or emotions as influencing the member to as. sent to or dissent from the findings or sentence or concerning the member's mental process in connection therewith, except that a member may testify on the question whether extraneous prejudicial information was improperly brought to the attention of the members of the court - martial, whether any outside influence was improperly brought to bear upon any member, or whether there was unlawful command influence.
Nor may the member's af fidavit or evidence of any statement by the member concerning a matter about which the member would be precluded from testifying be received for these purposes.
The official analysis explains as follows: (b) Inquiry into the validity of findings or sentence.
Rule 606(b) is taken from the Federal Rule with only one significant change.
The Rule, retitled to reflect the sentencing function of members, recognizes unlawful command
64
19811
EVIDE NTIARY PRIV IL E G E S
U.C.M.J.,257is a prohibition against unlawful exercise of command influence over the findings, sentences, or proceedings of courts martial.
When such influence appears, a presumption of prejudice to the accused is The government may rebut this presumption with evidence that indicates that the actions of the command had no influence over the members.259In the case of United States v. DuBay et al.,zsO the Court of Military Appeals established the procedure to be followed in resolving allegations of command influence: In each such case, the record will be remanded to a conven ing authority other than the one who appointed the court martial concerned.
, . .
That convening authority will refer the record to a general court - martial for another trial.
Upon convening the court, the law officer will order an out - of - court hearing, in which he will hear the respective contentions of the parties on the question, permit the presentation of witnesses and evidence in support thereof, and enter fin dings of fact and conclusions of law based thereon.26' [Emphasis added.]
Presumably the Rule 606 exception would apply at such a hearing.
influence as a legitimate subject of inquiry and permits testimony by a member on that subject.
The addition is required by the need to keep pro ceedings free from any taint of unlawful command influence and further im plements Article 37(a) of the Uniform Code of Military Justice.
Use of superior rank or grade by one member of a court to sway other members would constitute unlawful command influence for purposes of this Rule under para 74d(l).
Rule 606 does not itself prevent otherwise lawful polling of members of the court, seegenerally, United States v. Herdon, 6 M.J. 171, 174 (C.M.A. 1979) and does not prohibit attempted lawful clarification of an ambiguous or inconsistent verdict.
Rule 606(b) is in general accord with pre sent military law.
3 837 (1976).
258United States v. Berry, 39 C.M.R. 541 (A.C.M.R. 1968).
2s710U.S.C.
259B~b United States v. Boeuchir, 5, C.M.A. 15, 17 C.M.R. 15 (1954).
In this case, see the government did not rebut, yet the Court found in the defense affidavits an insuf ficient showing of command influence.
The defense introduced the hearsay affidavit of a nonmember alleging that a member was overheard discussing the nature of the court's deliberations.
Invoking the privilege against admitting such jurors' statements, the court held the affidavits inadmissible.
26017 C.M.A. 147,37 C.M.R. 411 (1967).
26137 C.M.R. at 413.
65
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
IX. RULE 510: WAIVER BY VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE Various kinds of waiver have been discussed in the sections deal ing with the particular privileges,262 a discussion of the general but rule of waiver by voluntary disclosure has been deferred until now.
Traditionally, waiver is said to occur when one intentionally relin quishes a known right.263 But when one voluntarily discloses a con fidential communication, lack of knowledge that the communica tion was privileged is irrelevant.264 Waiver by voluntary disclosure, and its counterpart, failure to object to disclosure by another, are well recongnized in military case law265 and are mentioned in the Rule 510 does not significantly alter these provisions.
It is instructive to note, however, that disclosure of "any significant part of the matter or communication" is a waiver of the whole, if the privilege is a sec tion V privilege.267 Yet partial voluntary disclosure of statements 262Examplesinclude waiver of the attorney - client privilege by allegation of in competence; waiver of the government's informant identity privilege by action of the informant; and waiver of the spousal competency privilege by divorce.
263Johnson Zerbst, 304 US. 458 (1938). v. 2648 Wigmore, Evidence 4 2327 (Rev. ed. McNaughton 19611.
265United States v. Reynolds, 19 C.M.R. 850 (A.F.C.M.R.
19551 (voluntary disclosure to third party as waiver of attorney - client privilege); United States v. Yzaguirre 19 C.M.R. 585 (C.G.C.M.R.
1955) (failure to object to wife's testimony as waiver of spousal privilege); United States v. Craig, 22 C.M.R. 466 (A.C.M.R. 19561 (disclosure of "Confidential" report to investigating officer as waiver of military secrets privilege).
266Manualfor Courts - Martial, supra note 5, para. 151 b(2).
This former Manual paragraph has been discussed in part at note 97, supra.
The waiver rules are stated negatively, as follows: The general rule is that the disclosure of a privileged communication between husband and wife, client and attorney, or penitent and clergyman should not be required or permitted unless the person who is entitled to the benefit of the privilege consents to the disclosure of the communication or has otherwise waived the privilege, as when he has consented to a disclosure of the communication at a previous trial or hearing.
Unless he voluntarily testifies concerning the communications, an accus ed who testifies in his own behalf, or a person who testifies under a grant or promise of immunity, does not, merely by reason of so testifying, waive any privilege pertaining to communications between husband and wife, client and attotney, or penitent and clergyman to which he may be entitled.
267This provided in Rule 510(a),which reads as follows: is (a) A person upon whom these rules confer a privilege against disclosure of a confidential matter or communication waives the privilege if the person
66
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
privileged by Rule 302 does not automatically constitute a waiver as to all such statements.z68 The primary exception to this kind of waiver is that, if the disclosing communication is itself subject to a privilege, than no waiver has A second exception, contained in subsec tion (b), provides that "an accused who testifies in his or her own behalf or a person who testifies under a grant or promise of im munity" does not, merely by testifying, waive any privilege per taining to confidential matter or communications.270These provi sions parallel the old waiver rules in the Manual, except that the Manual's provision applied only to the attorney - client, clergypenitent, and husband - wife privilege^.^^' Rule 510(b) applies to all section V privileges, many of which did not fall within the ambit of paragraph 151 b(2).272
X. RULE 511: INVOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE OF CONFIDENTIAL COMMUNICATIONS Subdivision (a) of Rule 511 effectively abrogates the rather harsh result of inadvertent or involuntary disclosure of otherwise privileged communications mandated by paragraph 151b(2) of the Manual.
How these sections operate with regard to the attorney client, husband - wife, and priest - penitent privileges has been or the person's predecessor while holder of the privilege voluntarily discloses or consents to disclosure of any significant part of the matter or communication under such circumstances that it would be inappropriate to allow the claim of privilege.
This rule does not apply if the disclosure is itself a privileged communication.
268Mil.
Evid. 302 deals with the privilege concerning mental examination of an ac R. cused.
The defense may offer expert evidence on the mental condition of the accus ed, and may withhold statements of the accused which are part of that evidence.
Rule 302(c), note 26, supra.
289See last sentence of Rule 510(a),note 267, supra. the "OThis is set forth in para. (b) of Rule 510, Mil. R. Evid.: (b) Unless testifying voluntarily concerning a privileged matter or com. munication, an accused who testifies in his or her own behalf or a person who testifies under a grant or promise of immunity does not, merely by reason of testifying, waive a privilege to which he or she may be entitled pertaining to the confidential matter or communication.
*"Manual for Courts - Martial, para. 151 b(2),note 266, supra.
272Theprivileges described in Rules 505, 506, 507 and 509 find their prior practice
67
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
discussed in the sections addressing the individual rules.
The net effect of Rule 511(a)is to preserve the privileged nature of confiden tial communications that have been compromised by compulsion or under circumstances that do not allow for assertion of the privilege.
The rule thus prevents involuntary waiver.
This subsection is virtually a verbatim adaptation of proposed Rule 512, F.R.E.
As the Advisory Committee observed, the kind of compulsion contemplated by the drafters as necessary to trigger the rule does not require the holder of the privilege to exhaust all legal recourse.
To require such a standard would, in the words of the committee, "[elxact of the holder greater fortitude in the face of authority than ordinary individuals are likely to p o ~ s e s s .
'Ex - ~ ~ '~ actly how much compulsion is enough the committee did not say.
The courts can be expected, except perhaps in self - incrimination cases, to require at least some overburdening of the individual's will.
Subdivision (bi of the military rule is an express revocation of the former provision that held all communications made by wire or radio to be nonpri~ileged.27~ Notwithstanding the rather draconian parallels in paragraph 151Ml).
See notes 128 and 217, supra.
Rule 508 has no counterpart in the Manual.
273Fed.
Evid. 512 (not enacted), Advisory Committee Notes.
The text of Mil. R. R. Evid. 511(a)is as follows: (a) Evidence of a statement or other disclosure of privileged matter is not admissible against the holder of the privilege if disclosure was compelled erroneously or was made without an opportunity for the holder of the privilege to claim the privilege.
The official analysis explains thus: Rule 511(a)is similar to proposed Federal Rule of Evidence 512.
Placed in the context of the definition of "confidential" utilized in the privilege rules, see, e.g., Rule 502(b)(4),the Rule is substantially different from present military law inasmuch as present law permits utilization of privileged in formation which has been gained by a third party through accident or design.
See present Manual paragraph 151 Ml).
Such disclosures are generally safeguarded against via the definition of "confidential" used in the new Rules.
Generally, the Rules are more protective of privileged in formation than is the present Manual.
274The former Manual provision was set forth in para. 151(c)(l): c. Certain nonprivileged communications.
(1)Communications by wire or radio.
Communications are not privileged because transmitted by wire or radio and the information concerning them that comes to the knowledge of
68
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
phrasing of this paragraph of the Manual, it did not serve as a license for wholesale wiretapping and electronic eavesdropping.
Paragraph 152 of the Manual, a codification of the exclusionary rule, prohibited the introduction of evidence obtained in contraven tion to either 18 U.S.C. 0 2515,275or the Communications Act of operators, either military or civilian, of any such means of transmission is likewise not privileged by reason of the means of transmission used.
Wire or radio operators, military and civilian, may be ordered or subpoenaed to testify before courts - martial as to wire or radio communications, and telegrams and radiograms may be brought before courts - martial by the usual process.
But see 151b(l) and the next to the last paragraph of 152.
*T5Theformer Manual provision, near the end of para. 152, reads thus: Evidence is inadmissable against the accused if it was obtained under such circumstances and in such a place that its use against him would be prohibited by section 2515, title 18, United States Code, pertaining to the prohibition of the use as evidence of certain intercepted wire or oral com munications, or by section 605 of the Communications Act of 1934 (82 Stat. 223; 47 U.S.C. Q 605), as amended, pertaining to the unauthorized divulgence or publication of wire or radio communications.
The Statute at 18 U.S.C. 5 2515 (1976) was enacted in 1968, as part of title 111of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, Pub. L. No. 90 - 351, 82 Stat. 211, codified at 18 U.S.C. 2510 - 2520 (1976).Entitled "Prohibition of use as evidence of intercepted wire or oral communications," it states: Whenever any wire or oral communication has been intercepted, no part of the contents of such communication and no evidence derived therefrom may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of the United States, a State, or a political subdivision thereof if the disclosure of that information would be in violation of this chapter.
The current counterpart of the former Manual provision at para. 152 is Mil. R. Evid. 317.
A detailed analysis of its application is beyond the scope of this inquiry.
However, for the convenience of the reader, the text of Rule 317, entitled "Intercep tion of Wire and Oral Communications," is set forth below: (a)General rule.
Wire or oral communications constitute evidence obtain.
ed as a result of an unlawful search or seizure within the meaning of rule 311 when such evidence must be excluded under the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States as applied to members of the armed forces or if such evidence must be excluded under a statute applicable to members of the armed forces.
(bl Authorization for judicial applications in the United States.
Under sec tion 2516(1) of title 18, United States Code, the Attorney General, or any Assistant Attorney General specially designated by the Attorney General may authorize an application to a federal judge of competent jurisdiction for, and such judge may grant in conformity with section 2518 of title 18, United States Code, an order authorizing or approving the interception of
69
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
1934.276 Therefore, nonprivileged, confidential communications obtained by illegal wiretapping were inadmissible.
However, this still left as admissible supposedly confidential communications obtain ed in the course of otherwise legal electronic surveillance.277 The new rule eliminates this gap by preserving the privileged nature of wire or oral communications by the Department of Defense, the Department of Transportation, or any Military Department for purposes of enforcing the Uniform Code of Military Justice.
(cl Regulations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of these rules, members of the armed forces or their agents may not intercept wire or oral communications for law enforcement purposes except as follows: (1)in the United States, under subdivision (b);and (2)outside the United States, under regulations issued by the Secretary of Defense or the Secretary concerned.
The official analysis of Rule 317 is as follows: (a)General rule.
The area of interception of wire and oral communications is unusually complex and fluid.
At present, the area is governed by the Fourth Amendment, applicable federal statute, DOD directive, and regula tions prescribed by the Service Secretaries.
In view of this situation, it is preferable to refrain from codification and to vest authority for the area primarily in the Department of Defense or Secretary concerned.
Rule 31 7(c) thus prohibits interception of wire and oral communications for law en forcement purposes by members of the armed forces except as authorized by 18 U.S.C. 0 2516, Rule 317(b), and, when applicable, by regulations issued by the Secretary of Defense or the Secretary concerned.
Rule 317(aJ, however, specifically requires exclusion of evidence resulting from non compliance with Rule 317(cJonly when exclusion is required by the Con stitution or by an applicable statute.
Insofar as a violation of a regulation is concerned, compare UnitedStates v. Dillard.
8 M.J. 213 (C.M.A. 1980) with UnitedStates v. Caceres, 440 U.S. 741 (1979). (b) Authorization for judicial applications in the United States.
Rule 317(b) is intended to clarify the scope of 18 U.S.C. 0 2516 by expressly recognizing the Attorney General's authority to authorize applications to a federal court by the Department of Defense, Department of Transportation, or the military departments for authority to intercept wire or oral com munications.
(c)Regulations.
Rule 317(cJrequires that interception of wire or oral com munications in the United States be first authorized by statute, see Rule 317(b), and interceptions abroad by appropriate regulation.
See the Analysis to Rule 317(aJ,supra.
The Committee intends Rule 3171~) limit to only interceptions that are nonconsensual under chapter 119 of title 18 of the United States Code.
27647 U.S.C. fj605 (1976).This is a lengthy provision.
See the summary in the portion of para. 152 of the Manual quoted in note 275, supra. ?"Munster 
70
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
confidential communications notwithstanding the person's use of telephonic or wireless means of c~mmunication.~~~ XI. RULE 512: COMMENT UPON OR INFERENCES FROM CLAIM OF PRIVILEGE
A strong argument can be made that to allow an adverse party to comment upon, or to allow a jury to draw an adverse inference from the assertion of an evidentiary privilege is to diminish the value of that privilege to the holder.
The drafters of both the F.R.E. and be faced with determining the legality of electronic surveillance.
They recommend consultation of Federal decisions interpreting 18 U.S.C. $5 2516 -2518 (1976).
For Department of the Army policy and procedures for the lawful gathering of electronic evidence, see Army Reg. No. 190.53, Interception of Wire and Oral Com munications for Law Enforcement Purposes (1 Nov. 1978).
Z78The text of Mil. R. Evid. 511(b)is as follows: (b)The telephonic transmission of information otherwise privileged under these rules does not affect its privileged character.
Use of electronic means of communication other than the telephone for transmission of information otherwise privileged under these rules does not affect the privileged character of such information if use of such means of communication is necessary and in furtherance of the communication.
The official analysis explains thus: Rule 511(b) is new and deals with electronic transmission of information.
It recognizes that the nature of the armed forces today often requires such information transmission.
Like present Manual paragraph 151Ml),the new Rule does not make a nonprivileged communication privileged; rather, it simply safeguards already privileged information under certain cir cumstances.
The first portion of subdivision (b) expressly provides that otherwise privileged information transmitted by telephone remains privileged.
This is in recognition of the role played by the telephone in modern life and par ticularly in the armed forces where geographical separations are common.
The Committee was of the opinion that legal business cannot be transacted in the 20th century without customary use of the telephone.
Consequently, privileged communications transmitted by telephone are protected even though those telephone conversations are known to be monitored for whatever purpose.
Unlike telephonic communications, Rule 511(b) protects other forms of electronic communication only when such means "is necessary and in fur therance of the communication."
It is irrelevant under the Rule as to whether the communication in question was in fact necessary.
The only relevant question is whether, once the individual decided to communicate, the means of communication was necessary and in furtherance of the com munication.
Transmission of information by radio is a means of com munication that must be tested under this standard.
71
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
Uniform Rules of Evidence appear to have been persuaded by this argument since both sets of rules prohibit such comments or adverse inferencese2'9 Although not specifically addressed in the ManuaLZ80military practice has allowed adverse inferences to be drawn from the failure of one side to produce evidence that is not available to both sides.281 While there exists no dispositive case,282 there is some military case authority permitting such an inference where the failure to produce evidence is the result of invocation of a pri~ilege,~8~ provided that the privilege asserted does not have con st it u t ional statu re .
279Fed.
Evid. 513 (not enacted); Unif.
R. Evid. 512.
R. 280Presumptionsand permissible inferences were discussed at para. 138a of the Manual for Courts - Martial, supra note 5.
No mention was made there concerning failure to produce evidence.
**'UnitedStates v. Braden, 14 C.M.R. 617 (A.F.C.M.R.
1954) (failure of the defense to call the accused's wife as a witness allows the inference that her testimony would be unfavorable to accused); United States v. Hamil, 34 C.M.R. 533 (A.C.M.R. 19641, aff'd, 35 C.M.R. 82 (failure of defense to call corroborating alibi witness allows adverse inference); United States v. Vigeault, 3 C.M.A. 245, 12 C.M.R. 3 (1953) (adverse inference not allowed where evidence was available to both sides).
July 1959).
'Wnited States v. Braden, 14 C.M.R. 617 (A.F.C.M.R.
1954).
284Griffin California, 380 U.S. v. 609 (1965) (refusal of the accused to testify on his own behalf in exercise of his privilege against self - incrimination held not to be the proper subject of comment or adverse inference).
282See Oldham, Privileged Communications in Military Law, 5 Mil. L. Rev. 17, 55 (1
285United States v. Pariente, 558 F.2d 1186 (5th Cir. 1977); Courtney v. United States, 390 F.2d 521 (9th Cir. 1968) (rule applied to exercise of spousal capacity privilege).
286See Munster 
J. 287This prohibition is set forth in Rule 512(a)(l), Mil. R. Evid., as follows: (a)Comment or inference not permitted.
(1)The claim of a privilege by the accused whether in the present proceeding or upon a prior occasion is not a
72
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
The M.R.E. also prohibit any comment upon the claim of a privilege by witnesses other than the accused, but allow adverse in ferences to be drawn when "determined by the military judge to be required by the interests of justice."2'36 This represents a con siderable narrowing of the previous rule, and probably eliminates any constitutional objections from the face of the rule.
Military judges, however, must be wary of allowing adverse inferences to be drawn from the assertion of a privilege by any defense witness who could arguably be said to be vicariously raising a privilege held by the accused.
Under cases such as Courtney v. United Stateszs9 and United States v. Pariente,z90one can argue that to draw such an adverse inference would be tantamount to infringing upon the ac cused's fifth amendment protections.
The remaining subdivisions of Rule 512 are direct adaptations of proposed Rule 513(b) 
No inference may be drawn therefrom.
The official analysis states in part: (a) Comment or inference not permitted.
Rule 512(a) is derived from pro. posed Federal Rule 513.
The Rule is new to military law but is generally in accord with the Analysis of Contents of the present Manual; United States Department of the Army, Pamphlet No. 27-2, Analysis of Contents, Manual for Courts - Martial, 1969, Revised Edition, 27-33,27-38(1970).
Rule 512(a)(l)prohibits any inference or comment upon the exercise of a privilege by the accused and is taken generally from proposed Federal Rule of Evidence 513(a).
288This provided in Rule 512(a)(2), follows: is as (2) The claim of a privilege by a person other than the accused whether in the present proceeding or upon a prior occasion normally is not a proper subject of comment by the military judge or counsel for any party.
An adverse inference may not be drawn therefrom except when determined by the military judge to be required by the interests of justice.
The official analysis continues: Rule 512(a1(2)creates a qualified prohibition with respect to any inference or comment upon the exercise of a privilege by a person not the accused.
The Rule recognizes that in certain circumstances the interests of justice may require such an inference and comment.
Such a situation could result, for example, when the government's exercise of a privilege has been sus tained, and an inference adverse to the government is necessary to preserve the fairness of the proceeding.
289390 F.2d 521 (9th Cir. 1968).
Seethe articles cited at note 8, supra.
290558 F.2d 1186 (5th Cir. 1968).
Seethe articles cited at note 8, supra.
73
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
with Rule 512(b) 
Subdivi sion (b) requires that proceedings be conducted "so as to facilitate the making of claims of privilege without the knowledge of the members."291In San Fratella v. United States,292 Fifth Circuit the found reversible error in the fact that the prosecutor called the defendant's wife to the stand and caused her to claim her fifth amendment privilege after she had informed the court without the jury present of her intention to do so.
Although the privileges ad dressed in section five of the M.R.E. do not rise to constitutinal level, such cases as San Fratella can serve as the authority for Here arguing that they must nevertheless be jealously guarded.293 again the military judge should carefully weigh any decision to per mit a witness to claim a privilege in the hearing of the jury rather than in an out - of - court hearing.
Subdivision (c) of the rule permits a party to request a special in struction that no inference may be drawn from a witness's claim of a pri~ilege.~g~ Whether in the absence of comment by opposing counsel it is advisable for a party to request such an instruction is problematical.
Little is to be gained by raising in the court 291The text of Mil. R. Evid. 512(b)is as follows: (b)Claiming privilege without knowledge of members.
In a trial before a court - martial with members, proceedings shall be conducted, to the extent practical, so as to facilitate the making of claims of privilege without the knowledge of the members.
This subdivision does not apply to a special court - martial without a military judge.
The official analysis states: (b) Claiming privilege without knowledge of members.
Rule 512(b) is in tended to implement subdivision (a).
Where possible claims of privilege should be raised at an Article 39(a)session or, if practicable, at sidebar.
292340 F.2d 560 (5th Cir. 1965).
2g3As Advisory Committee wrote concerning proposed Federal Rule 513, "While the the privileges governed by these rules are not constitutionally based, they are never theless founded upon important policies and entitled to maximum effect."
Fed.
R. Evid. 513 (not enacted),Advisory Committee Notes.
294Mil.
Evid. 512(c)reads thus: R. (c)Instruction.
Upon request, any party against whom the members might draw an adverse inference from a claim of privilege is entitled to an instruc tion that no inference may be drawn therefrom except as provided in sub. division (a)(2).
The official analysis states:
74
19811
EVIDENTIARY PRIVILEGES
members' minds an unfavorable inference that may have escaped them initially.295 XII.
CONCLUSION The Military Rules of Evidence have been a subject of prime im portance to military criminal practitioners for quite some time and will no doubt continue to be so.
They represent the single most far reaching revision of court - martial practice since the Code was enacted over three decades ago.
With the automatic amendment provision of the Rule 1102, they promise to be a vibrant and evolu tionary feature of substantive military law.
The privileges section is no exception.
For the first time a limited physician - patient privilege is created which applies to statements made by an accused during a mental evaluation.
The attorney - client, priest - penitent, and husband - wife privileges for confidential communications are no longer subject to an exception for eavesdroppers.
In keeping with recent constitu tional litigation, the spousal competency privilege has been placed in the hands of the witness spouse, and, in keeping with good sense, the injury exception has been extended to confidential interspousal communications.
The military judge has been given greater authority and an ex panded role to play in determining the applicability of the goverriment's privilege to safeguard state secrets.
Additional alternatives have been created so that the government no longer faces the pro spect of automatic dismissal if it stands on its privilege.
Rule 506 emerges as a rule which, if improperly invoked as a device for con cealing governmental information from the accused, faces the government with the prospect of constitutional defect in the pro ceedings.
However, if it is properly employed as a discovery pro cedure, the government and defense may both find it highly useful.
The M.R.E. codifies a privilege for the identity of police in formants that is in keeping with accepted federal practice.
The text (c) Instruction.
Rule 512(cl requires that relevant instructions be given "upon request."
Cf. Rule 105.
The military judge does not have a duty to in struct sua sponte.
295SeeOldham, Privileged Communications in Military Law, 5 Mil. L. Rev. 17,58 (1 July 1959).
75
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
of the rule was marred, however, by an unfortunate defect in the definition of "informant," a defect which survived several stages of review prior to the adoption of the rule.
Due to the research of the author of this article, however, the problem has been brought to the drafter's attention and corrective action, by way of an amending Executive Order, has been taken.
Also eliminated from military practice is the harsh provision which held all electronic communications to be nonconfidential.
This is a recognition not only of the societal impact of technological advances, but also of the extent of an individual's right to privacy.
Practice under the Military Rules of Evidence will be more demanding and will require the best that counsel can give.
At the same time, the new Rules will reward creativity and afford counsel the opportunity to utilize fully their profes sional abilities.
. . .
It should be an exciting time to be in the
296Lederer,The Military Rules of Evidence: An Overview, 12 The Advocate 117 (19801.
Major Lederer was one of the drafters of the Military Rules of Evidence.
Note 227, supra.
76
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
IN CONSISTENT DEFENSES IN CRIMINAL CASES* by Major James F. Nagle**
Occasionally a criminal defendant will respond to charges with two or more theories which may seem to contradict each other.
He or she may say, in effect, "I did not shoot the victim, but if I did so, it was in self -defense."
Civilian courts have taken many different positions on the extent to which this type of pleading is permissi ble, and military courts have permitted it in some cases but not others.
Major Nagle has extensively reviewed the case law on the sub ject.
He examines the decisions of state and military courts, but concentrates on the United States courts of appeals, where most of the authoritative positions on inconsistent defenses have been developed.
Major Nagle notes that in some cases the defenses used are not truly inconsistent, in the sense that factual proof of one does not necessarily imply disproof of the other.
Insanity and self defense provide one example.
In other cases, such as a claim of en*The opinions and conclusions expressed in this article are those of the author and do not necessarily represent the views of The Judge Advocate General's School, the Department of the Army, or any other governmental agency.
This article grew out of the author's work on a case which he briefed and argued before the U.S. Army Court of Military Review, Falls Church, Virginia.
The author gratefully acknowledges the assistance of Captain Robert L. Gallaway, JAGC, who offered helpful suggestions for the improvement of the article.
Captain Gallaway, assigned since 1978 to Defense Appellate Division, US.
Army Legal Services Agen cy, Falls Church, Virginia, is the author of Due Process: Objective Entrapment's Trojan Horse, 88 Mil. L. Rev. 103 (1980).
**Judge Advocate General's Corps, United States Army.
Appellate defense attorney assigned to the Defense Appellate Division, U.S. Army Legal Services Agen cy, Falls Church, Virginia, since August 1979.
Formerly assigned to the U.S. Army Communications and Electronics Material Readiness Command, Fort Monmouth, New Jersey, 1976-1979, where he performed a variety of military justice duties.
B.S.F.S., 1970, Georgetown University; J.D., 1973, Rutgers University; LL.M. can didate, 1979 to present, George Washington University.
Completed 70th Judge Ad vocate Officer Basic Course, December 1973, and the Judge Advocate Officer Ad vanced Correspondence Course, November 1979.
Members of the Bars of the Supreme Court of New Jersey, the United States Court of Military Appeals, the United States Supreme Court, and the United States Court of Claims.
Major Nagle has published articles on office management and legal assistance in the August and October 1979 issues of The ArmyLawyer.
77
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
trapment coupled with denial of guilt, there may be policy reasons for permitting such defenses even if they are inconsistent on the facts.
Major Nagle concludes that use of inconsistent defenses is generally permitted in American jurisprudence.
He feels, however, that so many variations in treatment of inconsistent defenses exist between jurisdictions as to result in significant unfairness to some defendants.
The United States Supreme Court has not acted to resolve some of the glaring inconsistencies of treatment among the various federal circuits, nor has the Court of Military Appeals done all that it could to clarify the state of military law on the subject.
Major Nagle argues that it is time for corrective judicial action.
I. INTRODUCTION One wants to say to the defense, "Shorn of technicality, what do you really want? Which way would you have it. . .
Either position is legitimate, but choose.
It ill behooves you to try to have it both ways."'
These words, written by a Maryland appellate judge, demonstrate the natural frustrations that courts often experience when confronted with the logical absurdity known as inconsistent defenses.
Such defenses arise when the accused, in effect, argues, for example, "I didn't shoot him, but if I did, it was in selfdefense."2 Such a tactic is clearly not a preferred strategem.
Inconsistent defenses have been described as: likely to mislead the 'Bartram v. State, 37 Md. App. 115, 364 A.2d 1119 (1976), aff'd, 280 Md. 616, 374 A.2d 114 (1977).
'Seetext above notes 81 - 90, infra.
"Inconsistent defenses" in this article means those defenses which, when asserted by a single defendant, are inconsistent with one another, such as denial and self defense.
It does not refer to those situations which arise in joint trials when the co defendants each allege a different defense which is inconsistent with that alleged by the other, nor those situations in which one lawyer represents two clients who assert inconsistent defenses.
3Newmann v. State, 166 Fla. 98, 156 So.
237 (1934).
78
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
fraught with great risk,4 multifarious and confu~ing,~ "hunting always with a shotgun, never with a rifle,"6 a device sure to destroy the defendant's credibility,' and a tactic no competent attorney would utilize.8 Despite such criticisms, inconsistent defenses have specifically been permitted to some extent in seven federal circuit^,^ 26 states,'O and the military,'l and seem to be a generally accepted principle in American jurisprudence.12 The reasons given for such acceptance have varied; most promi nent are: 1.
It is improper to force a defendant to admit certain essential facts (usually the commission of the "criminal" act) in order to avail himself of a defense such as self - defense or entra~ment.'~ While such an analogy certainly has analytic merit, one distinguishing factor is that in Simmons the Supreme Court was dealing with forced choices between two clear constitutional rights.
However, affirmative defenses such as entrapment are not perceived as constitutionally based.
See Groot, The Serpent Beguiled Me and I 4People v. Johnson, 47 App. Div.2d 893,366 N.Y.S.2d f98 (1975).
5People v. Jersky, 377 Ill. 261,36 N.E.2d 261 (1941).
6Kain v. State, 'Ramney, The Duquesne Law *United States 48 Wis.2d 212, 179 N.W.2d 277 (1970).
Entrapment Defense - What Hath the Model Penal Code Wrought, 16 Rev. 157,164 (1977). v. Kaiser, 138 F.2d 219 (7th Cir. 1943).
gFirst Circuit: Gorin v. United States, 313 F.2d 641 (1963); but see Sylvia v. United States, 312 F.2d 145 (19631, cert. denied, 374 US. 809 (1963).Second Circuit: United States v. Swiderski, 539 F.2d 854 (1976); but seeunited States v. DiDonna, 276 F.2d 956 (1960).Fourth Circuit: United States v. Harbin, 377 F.2d 78 (1967).Fifth Circuit: Sears v. United States, 343 F.2d 139 (1965); but see Longmire v. United States, 404 F.2d 326 (1968).
Sixth Circuit: United States v. Baker, 373 F.2d 28 (1967); but see United States v. Mitchell, 514 F.2d 758 (1975).
Ninth Circuit: United States v. Demma, 523 F.2d 981 (1975).D.C. Circuit: Johnson v. United States, 138 US.
App. D.C. 651 (19701, cert. denied, 401 US.846 (1970).
`Osee the appendix at the end of this article "United States v. Garcia, 1 M.J. 26 (C.M.A. 1975).
Seediscussion in text above notes 204-207, infra.
12See22C.J.S.
CriminalLawS 54 (1961);21 Am.
Jur.2d CriminalLawS 141 (1965).
13People v. Perez, 62 Cal.2d 769, 44 Cal.Rptr.
326, 401 P.2d 934 (1965).
It has been argued that such "forced admissions" violate the rationale of the Supreme Court's rulings in Simmons v. United States, 390 U.S. 377 (1968).In that case the Court rul. ed that a defendant could not be required to admit ownership of an item (and thereby give up his fifth amendment rights) in order to contest on fourth amendment grounds the validity of the search which uncovered the item.
79
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
2.
The defendant should be accorded every reasonable protection in defending himself against pro~ecution.'~ 3.
Inconsistent defenses often aid in the search for the truth by presenting different facts and theories to the fact finder and thereby enabling the fact finder to attach credibility to whatever facts and theory it believes.'5
A fourth justification might well be that it is, under certain cir cumstances, an indispensable tool for the defense counsel.
Con sider the following example: The client tells his counsel that he did not kill the victim and, in fact, was 100 miles away at the time.
The prosecution, however, has four eyewitnesses who positively iden tify the client as the assailant.
They testify further that the victim was advancing with a knife on the client.
If the counsel must rely solely on the client's version, then he is relying on an alibi defense that will be obliterated by the prosecution evidence.
Conversely, he is presented with a classic example of self - defense which, if he is allowed to present it, could save the client's life.
If inconsistent defenses are permitted, he may argue both denial and self - defense to the fact finder.16 While many jurisdictions have accepted the theory of inconsis tent defenses, that acceptance has varied greatly.
The United States Supreme Court has not rendered a decision on the subject of inconsistent defenses."
Consequently it is unclear whether a defen(Without Scienter) Did Eat - Denial of Crime and the Entrapment Defense, 1973 U. of Ill.
Law Forum 254.
273 (1973), and Comment.
The Assertion of Inconsistent Defenses in Entrapment Cases, 56 Iowa Law Rev. 686,690 (1971).
Wnited States v. Demma, 523 F. 2d 981, 985 (9th Cir. 1976).
15Henderson v. United States, 237 F.2d 169 (5th Cir. 1956); State v. Burns, 516 P.2d 748 (Or.
App. 1973).
16Another justification advanced for inconsistent defenses in entrapment cases is that it is unsound public policy to let police misconduct go unnoticed because the defendant who must either admit the "crime" and claim entrapment or deny the crime, chooses the latter.
See Comment, note 13 supra: Orfield, The Defense of Entrapmentin the Federal Courts, 1967 Duke L.J. 39.
"Thompson v. United States, 155 U.S. 271 118991.
comes close.
In Thompson, the defendant had entered pleas of not guilty and former jeopardy.
Mr. Justice Shiras, writing for the Court, said the defenses might stand together because they were not inconsistent.
The former jeopardy plea, however, being a plea in bar.
must be dispos. ed of first.
The case of Sorrells v. United States, 287 U.S. (1932).while not deal 435 ing with inconsistent defenses, has been the basis of a great deal of discussion in the area of inconsistent defenses in entrapment cases.
Seepages 24-25 infra.
80
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
dant has a constitutional right to present evidence which raises in consistent defenses.18 Furthermore, decisions diverge greatly on, first, what inconsistent defenses will be accepted.
Self - defense and denial are generally accepted,lg but entrapment and denial are not.20Second, decisions vary on how the defenses may be raised.
Can the defendant himself testify to both, or must the state's own evidence raise one of the defenses?2'
11.
DEFINITION This divergence of views is readily apparent when one seeks to find a common definition for "inconsistent defenses."
Rarely will a court attempt to give any specific meaning to the phrase.
Usually the courts will merely say the defenses are inconsistent and then permit them or not.
This lack of specificity has caused a division of the tactic into three separate meanings - alternative defenses, truly inconsistent defenses, and antithetical defenses.
Apparently the courts feel that the word "inconsistent" is clear enough to require no further clarification.
In civil cases it is said that "the test of inconsistency of defenses is whether proof of one necessarily disproves the other."22 This rule seems to have been adopted in criminal cases so that "mutually exclusive defenses" is often used as a substitute for "incon~istent.defenses."*~ Confusion has resulted, however, because there is a subjective dividing line between what is permissibly and impermissbly in consistent.
Some courtsz4 have stated that inconsistent defenses are allowed as long as they are not too inconsistent or as long as proof of one does not necessarily disprove the otheraZ5 This seems
'8For a survey of cases which might lead to that conclusion, see Imwinklereid, Chambers v. Mississippi, --U.S.--(1973}, The Constitutional Right to Present Defense Evidence, 62 Mil. L. Rev. 225 (1973).
19See notes 81 and 86, infra, and text thereat.
?Oseediscussions in sections VII, VIII, and IX of this article, infra. ?'SeeSears v. United States, 434 F.2d 139 (5th Cir. 1965); State v. Randolph, 496 S.W.2d 257 (Mo. 1973) (en banc).
22Shuffelbergerv.
Hopkins, 177 Kan. 513,280 P.2d 933 (1955).
23See, e.g.,State v. Burns, 516 P.2d 748 (Or.
App. 1973).
24Striplingv.
State, 349 So.2d 187 (Fla.
App. 1977);United States v. Greenfield, 554 F.2d 179 (5th Cir. 1977).
25Greenfield,supra note 24.
81
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
to be a contradiction in terms and illustrates the extent of the con fusion on the subject.
Other courts have utilized analysis of the facts involved to determine that defenses, which on the surface ap pear to be inconsistent, are not so.26 To provide a framework for analysis, the subject of inconsistent defenses can conveniently be divided into three levels.
The first level consists of the inconsistent defenses which are merely alternative because they can coexist at the same time and proof of one does not disprove the other.
For example, alibi and in sanity might at first glance appear to be inconsistent but upon analysis they clearly are not.
A person can be 100 miles away from the scene of the crime and still be insane.27 It is difficult to draw an exact logical line of demarcation between the second and third levels because of the conflicting decisions that have been issued in this area.
An arbitrary distinction, however, can be drawn on the basis of the traditional way courts have viewed certain defenses.
The second level comprises those cases which appear factually inconsistent but which have historically been viewed by the courts as not so repugnant as to be impermissible.
Two prime examples of this have been accident and self-defense,28 and denial and self The third level which the courts tably repugnant.
this prohibition of antithetical defenses consists of those defenses have viewed as so inconsistent as to be insuppor While some courts have, quite logically, applied to cases involving alibi,30it has most commonly
26Henderson v. United States, 237 F.2d 169 (5th Cir. 19561; Hansford v. United States, 12 U S .
App. D.C. 359.
303 F.2d 219 (1962).
*7Statev.
Lora, 305 S.W.2d 452 (Mo. 1957).
They might be inconsistent if the defense of insanity was based on the actions of the perpetrator at the scene, as in the following example: " My client was 100 miles away at the time.
Furthermore, because the perpetrator, you should find him to be insane.
" See alsonote 64, infra.
28Seetextabove notes 70 through 77, infra.
29Seenotes and 86, infra, and text thereat.
81 3GUnitedStates ex rel. Crosby v. Brierly, 404 F.2d 790 (3rd Cir. 1968) (alibi and self. defense not allowed).
Contra, Phillips v. State, 131 Ga. 426, 62 S.E. 239 (1908);Peo.
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
been used involving entrapment and denial in which the traditional rule has been that entrapment is not available to one who denies committing the crime.3' This rule, however, has been the subject of a considerable amount of scholarly critici~m3~ appears to be and declining.
Some courts have rejected it t0tally,~3 while others have parsed the relevant facts to show that the defenses are not necessarily inconsistent under the circumstance~.~~ 111.
HISTORICAL DEVELOPMENT The modern doctrine has been the result of a long development stemming from the early days of the Republic.
The early cases dealt with pleas in bar or pleas in abatement and it was only at the turn of the century that affirmative defenses began to be discussed.
The first such embryonic step took place in Commonwealth v. Myers,35 an 1812 Virginia case.
Myers was charged with murder and pled double jeopardy (autrefois acquit) and not guilty.
The court: stated that, although a person indicted for a capital offense may not enter two pleas in abatement which are deemed by law repugnant, pleas in bar which are only somewhat repugnant may be accepted if two conditions are met.
First, the court must be satisfied of their truthfulness, and second, they must not directly contradict each other.
In this case, the court considered that the conditions were satisfied and permitted these two pleas to be ad vanced. ple v. Doody, 343 Ill. 194, 175 N.E. 436 (1931); Brown v. Commonwealth, 308 Ky. 486,214 S.W.2d 1018 (1948).
3'Seethe annotation at 61 A.L.R.2d 677 (1958) for general background information on this rule.
The rule is discussed in the text at sections VII, VIII, and IX of this arti cle, infra.
32See Comment, supra note 13; Comment, United States v. Demma: Assertion of In consistent Defenses in Entrapment Cases Allowed, 1975 Utah L. Rev. 962; Groot, supra note 13; Orfield, supra note 16, at 65 - 66.
33United States v. Demma, 523 F.2d 981 (9th Cir. 1975); People v. Perez, 62 Cal. 2d 769, 44 Cal. Rptr. 326, 401 P.2d 934 (1965); People v. Chambers, 56 Misc.2d 683, 289 N.Y.S.2d 804 (1968).
34Hendersonv.
United States, 237 F.2d 169 (5th Cir. 1956); Sears v. United States, 343 F.2d 139 (5th Cir. 1965); Hansford v. United States, 12 U.S. App. D.C. 359, 303 F.2d 219 (1962).
351 Cas. (3 Va.) 188 (1812) Va.
a3
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
The defense argument, accepted by the court and unrebutted by the prosecution, was that in England it was the absolute right of a prisoner to enter as many pleas as were necessary and proper for his defense.
The defense counsel specifically challenged any lawyer "to produce a single dictum of the worst of the English courts, in the worst of times, to prevent a prisoner from pleading doubly in bar of prose~ution."~~ Virginia broadened that rule a year later3' to permit two pleas in abatement.
Alabama, in 1837, followed Virginia's lead and an nounced in State v. Green woocP that a defendant could not be com pelled to select one of several pleas submitted by him.
The development was slowed somewhat by State v. Potter.39In Potter, the defendant pled not guilty and also former conviction.
The North Carolina court ruled that "former conviction" is manifestly inconsistent with a plea of not guilty.
Therefore, the defendant must rely upon only one of the pleas or the court would treat the latter plea as a waiver of the former.
(Pottermay not have been too great an aberration since the court in Myers had used a former conviction and a not guilty plea as an example of an ex tremely repugnant set of pleas.)
The first federal case to deal with the subject was United States v. Richardson4*in 1886.
In Richardson, the court stated that, in this country, two or more pleas in abatement, not repugnant to one another, had been allowed to be pled together.
A major leap forward occurred in the 1888 case of State v. Stevens.41In that case, the Supreme Court of Missouri permitted the defendant to assert both accident and self - defense, because "any number of defenses may be made, whether consistent or not."42 More importantly, the court, in dicta, stated that, under a plea of not guilty, all defenses, such as self - defense, insanity, 361d.at 211-212.
Also seeRichardson v. City of Tuscaloosa, 22 Ala.
App. 604.
118 So.
496 (1925)(plea of not guilty and defense of former jeopardy not inconsistent).
37Comrnonwealth v. Long, 2 Va.
Law (4 Va.) 318 (1821).
Port.
474, 7 Ala.
Rep. 475 (1837),followed in State v. Allen, 1 Ala. 442 (1840).
'961 N.C.
(Phil.)337 (N.C. 1867).
"O28 F. 67 (D. Me. 1886).
"'96 Mo. 637, 10 S.W. 172 (1888) 421d.
178.
at
84
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
misadventure, or alibi, are available to the defendant regardless of their consistency with one another.43 Although no citation of authority was given for this broad unequivocal statement, it represents a significant breakthrough in the evolution of the law concerning inconsistent defenses.
Indiana, in 1895, permitted a defendant to plead the inconsistent defenses of denial and self - defense.
In Reed v. State,44 the accused had testified that the victim had advanced on him to attack him but that a third party had thrown the rock that killed the victim.
The trial judge felt self - defense had been raised, considering all the evidence, and instructed on self - defense over the objection of the defendant.
The appellate court agreed that, if the defense had been raised, it should be the subject of instruction.
A similar result was achieved in Kentucky, three years later, although the Reed case was not cited.45 In State v. Jackett, in 1909, Kansas permitted denial and self defense.
The court based its rationale on the practice followed in civil cases,46especially the fact that one sued for defamation could assert that he did not utter the defamatory comments and that, even if he did, they were true.
The court noted that, under a plea of not guilty, the defendant can utilize all ordinary defenses.
Georgia, in 1902, refused to permit accident and self - defense to be asserted simultaneously.47 Despite this temporary reluctance to adopt the rule announced in State v. Stevens, discussed above, those defenses were permitted the next year, 1903, in the New York case of People v. Gaimari48 (again with no citation of authority).
Kentucky followed in 1908,49 Texas in 1911,50 and finally Georgia in 43 Id. 44141Ind.
116,40N.E.
525 (11895).
45Morrisv.
Commonwealth, 46 S.W. 491 (Ky. 1898).
46Relianceon civil cases is also apparent in State v. Bidstrup, 237 Mo. 272, 140 S.W. 904 (1911). this case, the court permitted mistake and self - defense to be asserted.
In The court noted that "distinguished counsel" had been unable to find any case directly on point.
47D~nn State, 116 Ga. 515, 42 S.E. 772 (1902). v. 48176N.Y.
84,68 N.E. 112, 115 (1903).
"He clearly had the right to rely on inconsis. tent defenses but it is significant that only one could rest on truth."
`9Gatliff v. Commonwealth, 32 Ky.
Law Rptr. 1063, 107 S.W. 739 (1908). court's The rationale is interesting, The court stated that, even if the defendant gave false testimony, it would not deprive him of any defenses he might truthfully have.
Therefore both defenses should be presented to the jury for their consideration.
85
MILITARY LAW REVIEW 1922.51
[VOL. 92
Numerous other caseP covering a variety of defenses followed in rapid succession.
By 1912, in People v. C ~ n t ea, California court ~~ could state, without citation, that the rule permitting inconsistent defenses was "well settled" both in criminal and civil law.
The types of inconsistent defenses commonly changed dramatically since World War 11.
Before inconsistent defenses were raised in connection violence and usually consisted of accident and denial and self - defense.
Since World War 11, with narcotics prosecutions, the most prevalent set defenses has been entrapment and denial.
IV.
ALTERNATIVE DEFENSES Some cases said to involve inconsistent defenses actually present only alternative defenses.
In these cases, the defendant usually has pled insanity or intoxication.
Both defenses can co - exist with vir tually any other usually with no element of inconsisten cy.
The reason for this harmonious relationship with other defenses is clear: Although there is some authority to the contrary,55the Socardenv.
State, 62 Tex.
Cr. R. 607,138 S.W. 306 (1911).
51Jordanv.
State, 154 Ga. 390, 114 S.E. 349 (1922).
5ZBroughtonv.
State, 9 Ga.
App. 820, 72 S.E. 276 (1911) (denial and self - defense); Wiley v. State, 3 Ga.
App. 120, 59 S.E. 438 (1907) (denial and insanity); Green v. State, 7 Ga.
App. 803, 68 S.E. 318 (1910) (denial and self.defense); Phillips v. State, 131 Ga. 426, 62 S.E. 239 (1908) (alibi and self - defense); State v. Bradley, 120 La. 248, 45 So.
120 (19071 (self - defense and insanity);State v. Wade, 161 Mo. 441, 61 S.W. 800 (1901) (self - defense and insanity); Montgomery v. State, 68 Tex.
Cr. R. 78.
151 S.W. 813 (1912) (insanity and self - defense); State v. Sloah, 149 Iowa 469, 128 N.W. 842 (1910)(denial and self - defense); Love v. State, 16 Ala.
App. 44, 75 So.
189 (1917) alibi and provocation); Ward v. State, 4 Ala.
App. 112, 58 So.
788 (1912) (denial and defense of reasonable apprehension of harm - a statutory defense).
Contra, State v. Kinchen, 126 La. 39,52 So.
185 (1910).
5317Cal.
App. 771, 122 P. 450 (1912).
54Asmight be expected, they have also been asserted together.
Goforth v. United States, 106 US.
App. D.C. 111, 269 F.2d 778 (19591; Tatum v. United States, 88 US.
App. D.C. 386,190 F.2d 612 (1951).
Weveral courts have characterized insanity as a plea in confession and avoidance which concedes commission of the act.
Such views, however, have been expressed in dicta in cases that contained no denial by the defendant.
See People v. Wells, 33 Cal.2d 330, 202 P.2d 53 (19491, cert. denied, 338 U.S. 836 (1949); State v. Sapp, 356
asserted have that time, most with crimes of self - defense or the increase in of inconsistent
86
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
defenses of insanity or intoxication do not involve an implicit con fession that the defendant committed the act.
These defenses focus solely on the defendant's mental responsibility at the time of the crime without necessarily admitting certain acts while in that state.
Consequently, those defenses are not mutally exclusive when coupled with a denial of the crime.
If the Government could prove that the defendant was sane, that would not necessarily prove that he committed certain acts.
Conversely, proof of the commission of certain acts does not necessarily disprove the defendant's conten tion of insanity.
Therefore, as the District of Columbia Circuit has said, there is no logical inconsistency.
The defendant is merely claiming he was not mentally responsible, while still requiring the Government to meet its burden of proof.56 Despite the seeming persuasiveness of the District of Columbia Circuit's logic, some courts have viewed alibi as inconsistent with intoxication, yet allowed their assertion since inconsistent defenses were permitted in those j~risdictions.~' Alternatively, at least one other court5* has reached the same conclusion as the District of Columbia Circuit, holding that alibi and insanity are not truly inconsistent, since proof of one does not disprove the other.
Although the Michigan Court of Appeals has permitted denial to be asserted with the defense of intoxication, it views such defenses as incon~istent.~~ other courts have adopted the rule that Most Mo. 705, 203 S.W.2d 425 (1947);People v. Dumas, 51 Misc.2d 929, 274 N.Y.S.2d 764 (1966).
Also seestate v. Forcier, 95 N.H. 341, 63 A.2d 235 (1948).
In Forcier, because of the wording of the New Hampshire statute, the court prohibited the defendant from entering pleas of not guilty and not guilty by reason of insanity.
See generally 22 C.J.S.
Criminal Law 9 448 (1961).
The appellant in People v. Ford, 39 I11.2d 318, 235 N.E.2d 576 (1968), attempted to utilize this rationale to her advantage.
She argued that she was denied her right not to be a witness against herself because, by raising the defense of insanity, she was admitting commission of the offense.
The court was not persuaded by such logic.
It held that there was no reason a defendant could not deny commission of the crime and still claim insanity.
The court compared this to the situation in which a defen dant denies making incriminating statements and also challenges their voluntariness.
56Whittakerv.
United States, 108 U.S. App. D.C. 268, 281 F.2d 631 (1960).
57People v. Conte, 17 Cal. App. 771, 122 P.450 11912); People v. Hansma, 84 Mich.
App. 308,269 N.W.2d 504 (Mich. 1978).
Y3tate v. Lora, 305 S.W.2d 452 (Mo. 1957).
Seenote 27, supra.
S9Peoplev.
McClean, 52 Mich.
App. 182,217 N.W.2d 138 (1974).
87
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
there is no inconsistency between a denial and insanity or intoxicat io n ,60 A more difficult question arises, however, when the defendant wishes to claim insanity and self - defense.
Although the two defenses have been labeled "inconsistent,"61 most courts which have faced the question have held they are not inconsistent,62since proof of one does not necessarily disprove the other.
The latter position seems correct.
While self - defense requires by definition an intentional act of reasonable insanity would not necessarily deprive an individual of his ability to perceive an attack upon himself and to act accordingly; nor would it deprive him of his com mon law right of self - defense in such circumstance^.^^ Two examples of cases presenting alternative defenses not in volving insanity or intoxication are Stalling v. Statg5 and People v. Lee.66Stalling was charged with failing to stop and render aid to an individual his vehicle had struck.
His main defense was alibi.
He attempted to utilize a "fallback" theory, to the effect that, even if he did do it, the state had not shown that he knew his vehicle had struck anyone because the accident occurred on a cloudy night.
60SeeWiley v. State, 3 Ga.
App. 120, 59 S.E. 438 (1907);Womack v. United States, 119 US.
App. D.C. 40, 336 F.2d 959 (1964);State v. Kills Small, 269 N.W.Pd 771 (S.D. 1978); People v. Genovese.
65 Ill.
App.3d 819, 382 N.E.2d 872 (19781.
Lovell v. State, 525 S.W.2d 511 (Tex.
Cr. App. 1975).
Contra, United States v. Ervin, 436 F.2d 1331 (5th Cir. 1971).
In the Ervin case, court said that insanity is the very antithesis of denial, and compared the two defenses to denial and entrapment.
6'Statev.
Morris, 248 S.W.2d 847 (Mo. 1952) 62Statev.
Bradley, 120 La. 248, 45 So.
120 (1907); State v. Porter, 213 Mo. 43, 111 S.W. 529 (1908);State v. Wade, 161 Mo. 441, 61 S.W. 800 (1901); Flake v. State.
156 Ark. 34, 245 S.W. 174 (19221; Montgomery v. State, 68 Tex.
Cr. R. 78, 151 S.W. 813 (1912);Warren v. State, 565 S.W.2d 931 (Tex.
Cr. App. 1978).
63W.LaFave 
1
5 53 (1972).
"State v. Bradley, 120 La. 248, 45 So.
120 (1907).The degree of inconsistency will de pend on the test for insanity adopted in the particular jurisdiction.
The ALI.Model Penal Code test would not appear to increase the likelihood of inconsistency because it speaks in terms of appreciating the criminality of one's conduct, or of con forming one's conduct to the law.
The M'Naghten test, however, because one of its tenets is that the defendant did not know what he was doing, seems to involve a greater likelihood of inconsistency when asserted with self - defense.
See W. LaFave 
38 (1972).
6590Tex.
Cr. 310, 234 S.W. 914 (1921) 66248Ill.
64, 93 N.E. 321 (1910).
88
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
Such knowledge was an essential element of the charge under the applicable statute.
The trial judge refused to submit this fallback theory to the jury because it was inconsistent.
The Texas appellate court reversed, saying that, although the defendant had relied on alibi, this did not deprive him of using any other "defense theory" sanctioned by the evidence.
In Lee, the defendant was charged with intending to kill by ming ling carbolic acid with beer.
Lee denied placing the acid in the beer but also attempted to produce evidence showing that the amount of acid in the beer was not sufficient to produce death.
The trial judge did not permit such evidence because it was inconsistent with Lee's denial.
The appellate court reversed, saying that a plea of not guilty renders competent any evidence that tends to prove or disprove any issue involved even if one defense is inconsistent with another.
While both decisions seem correct, their reasoning has certain flaws.
Certainly by claiming alibi or denying the commission of the crime, the accused is not thereby relieving the state of its burden to prove all the elements of an offense beyond a reasonable doubt.
Furthermore, there is no logical inconsistency between asserting alibi or denial (or insanity or into~ication~~),still claiming that and the state has not successfully carried its burden of proof, because those defenses do not necessarily involve an admission that the "criminal" act occurred.
1
A thornier problem develops, however, if the defense asserted is self - defense, accident, or entrapment.
Such defenses are based on the assumption that an act occurred which, absent the defense, would be criminal.
Therefore, an inconsistency may occur if the ac cused asserts such a defense and simultaneously contests that the act occurred or that he committed it.68 Such defenses are then truly inconsistent and will be discussed infra.
A final example of alternative defenses is found in murder pro secutions when the defendant asserts the affirmative defense of 67Seenote supra and accompanying text.
60, 68Aninconsistency would not arise if the accused contested only one of the elements of the offense, and if that element were not implicitly assumed in his affirmative defense.
For example, the defendant in a murder case who claimed he shot the victim in self - defense may still contest the allegation that his shot was the cause of death.
See Harrison v. State, 461 P.2d 1007 (Okla.
Cr. 1969).
This rule, however, is not
89
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
self - defense and simultaneously claims that his actions constitute the lesser included offense of voluntary manslaughter rather than murder.
Beginning as early as 1909, the courts ruled that such defenses were not necessarily inconsistent because the fear which might prompt an individual to act in self - defense might also pro duce the heat of passion necessary for voluntary man~laughter.~~ It was for the jury to decide which was more applicable.
V. CONTRADICTORY DEFENSES
"Contradictory defenses" are those defenses which are truly in consistent, i.e., mutually exclusive, but which traditionally have been permitted.
The most common examples of these are accident/self-defense and denial/self-defense.
Accident and self - defense are usually inconsistent.
Self - defense requires a voluntary, intentional act in response to some type of at tack.
For example, the defendant shoots the victim intentionally because the victim is trying to stab him.
The defense of accident (or misadventure), however, requires the doing of a lawful act, free from negligence, which has unintended results.'O For example, the defendant is lawfully hunting in a woods.
Despite using due care, he trips and, as he falls, his weapon fires and strikes his com panion.
Accident does not require an impending attack nor does it require the operative act to be intentional.
In the hunting situation above, the "act" of shooting was not intentional."
generally applicable in cases involving denial and entrapment.
See note 168-182.
supra, and accompanying text.
69SeeState v. Crawford, 66 W.Va. 114, 66 S.E. 110 (1909);Batchelor v. State, 18 Ga.
App. 756, 90 S.E. 487 (1916); Kinard v. United States, 96 F.2d 522, 526 (D.C.
Cir. 1938);Addison v. State, 124 Ga.
App. 467, 184 S.E.2d 186 (1971).See also Stevenson v. United States, 162 U.S. 313 (1896);State v. Burnell, 298 Mo. 672, 252 S.W. 709 11923); McClerkin v. Commonwealth, 221 Ky. 689, 299 S.W. 570 (1927)(denial, self defense, and manslaughter defenses permitted).
'O21 Am.Jur.2d Criminal Law 9 83 (1965); para. 216b, Manual for Courts - Martial, United States, 1969 (Revised edition).
The Manual provision describes accident or misadventure as an excuse, and states, "A death, injury, or other event which oc curs as the result of an accident or misadventure in doing a lawful act in a lawful manner is excusable."
"Some courts have referred to accident as an involuntary act by definition.
See, e.g., State v. Peal, 463 S.W. 2d 840 (Mo. 1971).This appears to be incorrect.
The act might be voluntary but the results were unforeseen and unwanted.
as illustrated by the
90
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
The defense of accident or misadventure is complicated somewhat by the fact that courts often do not specify whether they are discussing the affirmative defense of accident which renders a homicide excusable, or are using "accident" in its ordinary sense, which does not.
Consider the following example: Defendant enters a crowded room and, to show off his dexterity, begins to twirl a loaded pistol.
The pistol fires during this exhibition and kills an onlooker.
Certainly in this case the defense of accident or misadventure is not applicable, because the defendant was not do ing a lawful act in a non - negligent way.
Therefore the homicide would not be excusable.
The killing, however, was nonetheless "ac cidental" in the sense that there was no intent to kill or even to in jure. consequently, the defendant's claim of "accidental" shooting would tend to negate any element of intent and would serve as a defense to premeditated murder or voluntary manslaughter.
It will not, however, serve as a defense to any other degree of homicide which did not require specific intent.
People v. GaimarP and People v. D e R o ~ are ~ examples of a a ~ two situation in which the two defenses are not necessarily inconsis tent.
Gaimari and DeRosa might be called "two - shot" cases.
Both were murder prosecutions in which the defendant fired two shots into the victim in the course of a struggle.
In each case, the defen dant asserted that the first shot was fired accidentally but the se cond shot was fired in self - defense, In such cases, the defenses are clearly not inconsistent because they are based on two different (although closely related) events.
Proof that one shot was fired ac cidentally does not necessarily disprove the notion that the second Both courts, shot was fired in self - defense and vice ~ersa.7~ however, referred to the defenses as inc~nsistent.~~ following example: A defendant on a lawful hunting trip fires at a deer.
The bullet ricochets in a totally unforeseen manner and strikes his companion.
Clearly the act of shooting was voluntary but the results were unintended.
72176N.Y.
84,68 N.E. 112 11903).
73378Ill.
557, 39 N.E.2d l(1941).
74Asimilar "two - shot" case with a unique twist was Scott v. State, 239 Ga. 46, 235 S.E.2d 523 (1977).In that murder case the facts as developed showed that, if the first shot killed the victim, then the defenses of accident and self - defense were raised.
If the second shot was the fatal one, then self - defense and voluntary manslaughter were in issue.
The trial judge, to be safe, instructed on all three issues to provide the jury with sufficient guideposts for their deliberations.
75Neither court specified whether they were referring to the affirmative defense of accident (misadventure) or meant that the shooting was accidential in its normal sense.
91
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
A case that provides an excellent vehicle to illustrate that the two defenses are not inconsistent is the military case of United States v. Perry.76 In Perry, the accused was tried for unpremediated murder.
He testified that he punched the decedent in self - defense.
The victim fell and later died from head injuries.
The United States Court of Military Appeals held that the act of throwing one punch in response to a threatened attack was an act of permissible self defense.
Such a permissible act of self - defense would constitute a lawful act done in a lawful manner.
Therefore, the defense of acci dent or misadventure was available and the homicide would be ex cusable if the court believed the accused's testimony.77 Obviously the defenses in Perry are not contradictory.
Quite the contrary, they complement each other and are vital to full defense to the charge.
Such cases illustrate that despite the definitional difference, many inconsistent defenses, upon analysis of the facts, are not mutually exclusive but rather alternative defenses.
In the absence of such severable factual bases, however, accident and self - defense are inconsistent and courts have traditionally viewed them as such.
Despite this perception, the defenses have been permitted,78as have the similar sets of the defense of accident 7616C.M.A.221,36C.M.R.377(1966).
"But see State v. Carter, 26 N.C.
App. 84, 214 S.E.2d 611 (1975).This was a murder prosecution in which the defendant was convicted of voluntary manslaughter.
His defense was self - defense.
in that he shot the victim while the victim was trying to stab him.
He claimed, however, that he had not intended to shoot the victim in the chest but only in the leg.
The appellate court said accident (misadventure) was not raised.
However, the defense probably was raised under the Perry theory that the act of firing at the knife - wielding victim was a permissible act of self - defense.
Therefore the unintend ed fatal results would be excusable under a theory of accident or misadventure.
Even assuming that accident or misadventure was not applicable because the act of shooting was not reasonable under the circumstances, it would appear that the defendant's testimony raised the partial defense of lack of intent to kill.
7BJordonv.
State, 238 Ark. 398, 382 S.W.2d 185 (1964); Jordan v. State, 154 Ga. 390.
114 S.E. 349 (1923);People v. Woods, 131 Ill.
App.2d 54, 268 N.E.2d 246 (Ill. 1971); People v. Smythe, 132 Ill.
App.2d 685, 270 N.E.2d 431 (1971); Gatliff v. Com monwealth, 32 Ky. 1063, 107 S.W. 739 (1908); Commonwealth v. Barton, 367 Mass. 515, 326 N.E.2d 885 (1975);United States v. Williams, 604 F.2d 277 (4th Cir. 1979); People v. Jew, 21 Mich.
App. 408, 175 N.W.2d 544 (1970); State v. Randolph, 496
92
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
and defense of others,79 and accident and defense of habitation.*O Denial and self - defense are clearly inconsistent, but the general rule has been that the combination of these defenses is permissible,81 as are alibi and self-defense,a* which represent an even greater extreme.
The rule had its start before the turn of the century83 and continues unabated to the present.84 T-he ratio decidendi of the decisions has been that, even if the defendant denies the act, if self - defense is raised by the other evidence, it should be the subject of instruction because the jury S.W.2d 257 (en banc) (Mo. 1973); State v. Herrill, 496 S.W.2d 321 (Mo.
App. 1973); State v. Grier, 218 N.C. 660, 12 S.E.2d 238 (1940);State v. Adams, 2 N.C.
App. 282, 163 S.E.2d 1 (1968); State v. Rodriquez, 110 Ohio App. 307, 13 Ohio Op. 2d 79, 169 N.E.2d 444 (1959);State v. Burns, 516 P.2d 748 (Or.
App. 1973);Harris v. State, 101 Tex.
Cr. 33, 274 S.W. 568 (1925); and Carden v. State, 62 Tex.
Cr. R. 607, 138 S.W. 396 (19111.
State v. Flint, 142 W.Va. 509, 96 S.E.2d 677 (19571, cert. denied, 356 U.S. 903 (1957).
This was an interesting case in which accident was defendant's theory.
The prosecution specifically requested an instruction on self - defense, over the defense's disclaimer.
The judge instructed on both.
79State v. Adams, 2 N.C.
App. 282, 163 S.E. 2d 1 (1968).
In this case, the North Carolina Court said accident, self - defense, and defense of others should have been subjects of instruction.
See also Lester v. State, 280 N.W. 334, 228 Wis. 631 (1938) (accident and heat of passion).
*'State v. Mitcheson, 560 P.2d 1120 (Utah 1977).In this case, the court noted that the defenses are not necessarily inconsistent, and stated that they should be permitted even if they were.
''40 Am.Jr.2d Homicides 521 (1968).41 C.J.S.
Homicideรยง 375 (1944).
But seeunited States v. Bellamy, 47 C.M.R. 319 (A.C.M.R. 1973).
82Seecasescited in note 30, supra.
83Seetext above notes 44 - 53.
supra.
S4Davisv.
State, 20 Ala.
App. 131, 101 So.
171 (1924);Gibson v. State, 135 Ark. 520, 205 S.W. 898 (1918); People v. Keel, 91 Cal. App. 599, 267 P. 161 (1928);Green v. State, 7 Ga.
App. 803, 68 S.E. 318 (1910);Reed v. State, 141 Ind. 116, 40 N.E. 525 (1895);People v. Gill, 7 Ill.
App. 3d 24, 286 N.E.2d 516 (1972); State v. Sloah, 149 Iowa 469, 128 N.W. 842 (19101; State v. Jackett, 81 Kan. 168, 105 P. 689 (1909); Mor ris v. Commonwealth, 46 S.W. 491 (Ky. 1898); Combs v. Commonwealth, 196 Ky. 804, 246 S.W. 132 (1922);State v. Wright, 352 Mo. 66, 175 S.W.2d 866 (1943);Ickes v. State, 42 Ohio App. 446,182 N.E. 49 (1931);Graham v. State, 98 Ohio St. 77,120 N.E. 232 (1918); Harrison v. State, 461 P. 2d 1007 (Okla.
Cr. 1969); State v. Anderson, 207 Or. 675, 298 P.2d 195 (19561; State v. Taylor, 261 S.C. 437, 200 S.E.2d 387 (1973); Scott v. State, 150 Tex.
Crim. 529, 202 S.W.2d 669 (1947).
Contra: Smith v. State, 22 Okla.
Crim. 383,212 P. 1012 (1922);Commonwealth v. Mains, 374 N.E.2d 576 (Mass. 1978).
93
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
need not believe the defendant.85In other words, "[ilt would be perfectly proper for him to say: (a) I did not fire the shot, but (b) whatever I did, I did in my own self-defense."86 Similarly incongruous are the defenses of denial or alibi and voluntary manslaughter.
It is certainly contradictory for a defen dant to argue "I didn't stab him but, if I did, it was intentional and in the heat of passion."
Yet the same principle that has permitted denial and self - defense has permitted the simultaneous assertion of these two defenses also.8' The obvious problem with the assertion of such defenses is that it frequently wreaks havoc with the defendant's credibility, at the least, and insults the intelligence of the jury (and thereby raises its ire) at worst.
Such an effect was noted in Johnson v. United States.88Johnson was charged with rape and contended that he did not have inter course with the girl.
Because of evidence in the government's case, the defense counsel argued that the victim consented, "but I don't concede one second that the act of intercourse took place."8g An en banc District of Columbia Circuit permitted such inconsistent defenses to be argued, noting that it was a tactical decision to be made at trial.
The court added, however, that it would not be sur prising if such a position reflected unfavorably on the defendant's ~redibility.~O 85Davisv.
State, 20 Ala.
App. 131, 101 So.
171 (1924);Gibson v. State, 135 Ark. 520, 205 S.W. 898 (1918).
86Grahamv.
State.
98 Ohio St. 77,120 N.E. 232,233 (1918).
E7People Smith, 121 Ill.
App.2d 105, 257 N.E.2d 261 (1970);People v. Williams, 26 v. Mich.
App. 218, 182 N.W.2d 347 (1970);McClerkin v. Commonwealth, 221 Ky. 689, 299 S.W. 570 (1927).
8e138U.S.
App. D.C. 174,426 F.2d 651 (D.C.
Cir. 1970)(enbanc), cert. denied401 U.S. 846 (1970).
89426F.2d at 653 n. 3.
$OThe Johnson case is in marked contrast to Anderson v. State, 104 Ind. 467, 4 N.E. 63 (1885), in which the defendant in a rape case was not permitted to claim both con sent and lack of intercourse.
94
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
VI. ANTITHETICAL DEFENSES The "inconsistent" defenses which have faced the greatest dif ficulty in gaining judicial acceptance have been entrapment and any type of denial such as alibi, general denial, lack of knowledge, and lack of intent.
Why the judiciary would be so unwilling to ac cept the simultaneous assertion of denial and entra~ment,~' per yet mit denial and self - defense is Certainly it cannot be explained totally by the principle of stare decisis.
The first cases which refused to permit the simultaneous assertion of entrapment and denial were People v. Murng3in the in the federal courts.
state courts, and Nutter v. United Both courts simply stated that the defenses were inconsistent and refused to permit them, without giving any citation of authority.
During the same era, however, and equally available as citation of authority had successor courts been willing, were Scriber v. United Statesg5and two Missouri cases, State v. DeckeP and State v. all of which indicated that the combination of denial and entrapment should be available.
Scriber was a bribery case in which the defendant had admitted the act of taking the money but denied any criminal intent and thereby denied the crime.
He also claimed that he had been entrap ped.
The trial judge refused to submit entrapment to the jury because it was inconsistent.
The Sixth Circuit stated, in dicta, "it would seem that a defendant should have the benefit of the defense, even though such inconsistency exists . . .
[A] jury might conclude that the defendant's claim of good intent was untrue and that he really intended to keep the money but might also conclude he was entrapped and therefore not Two years later the United States District Court for Nebraska in United States v. Washington99permitted alibi and entrapment to be 91See21Am.Jur.2d CriminalLaw8 144 (1965);22 C.J.S. CriminalLaw3 45(1)(19611, Annot., 61 A.L.R.2d 677 (19581.
92See40Am.Jur.2d Homicide8 521 (1968);41 C.J.S. Homicide3 375 (1944).
93220Mich.
555, 190 N.W. 666 (1922).
94289F.
484 (4th Cir. 1923).
954F.2d 97 (6th Cir. 19251.
96321Mo.
97320Mo.
%criber 9920F.2d 1163, 14 S.W.2d 617 (1929).
219,6 S.W.2d 877 (1928). v. United States, 4 F.2d 97, 98 (6th Cir. 1925).
160 (D. Neb. 1927).
95
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
asserted without discussing the consistency of the two.
(In Washington, the defendant claimed she was in St. Louis at the same time that she was alledgedly making an illegal sale of liquor in Om ah a .I1 O0 Perhaps the real but never pronounced reason for the courts' aversion to such combinations of defenses is the fact that entrap ment is not a traditional common law defense.
It is a relatively re cent inventionla' which permits an individual to escape what would otherwise be "his just desserts" by showing that the police were overzealous in their methods.
Consequently, the defense was view ed essentially as a possibly undeserved legal windfall for the defen dant.
He would be set free not because he himself was clearly inno cent, but because, for public policy reasons, this mischievous type of police conduct could not be permitted to go unabated.lo2 However, to allow the defendant to cry entrapment and also to con test the commission of the crime was to permit him to have "two bites at the apple."
Although the prohibition against these defenses has clearly been the prevailing view of 40 years,'03 the rule has been soundly criticiz ed in law reviews1@' and appears now to be steadily declining.
The loo Washington is typical of the early cases involving denial and entrapment in that it involves the illicit sale of liquor.
Before the 1950's and the deluge of narcotics con victions, this offense was the one most frequently encountered in the area.
See Annot.
55 A.L.R.2d 1322, 1343 (1957).
'O'SeeOrfield, note 16, supra.
lo2Thisis essentially the view expressed by Mr. Justice Roberts in his concurring opinion in Sorrells v. United States, 287 US. 435 (1932).
It is not the position of the Supreme Court that the purpose of allowing the entrap ment defense is to deter police misconduct, although several justices have espoused the position in concurring or dissenting opinions.
The police misconduct rationale is sometimes called the "objective" test for entrapment, and is contrasted with the "subjective" test, which focuses on the motivation of the defendant or accused to commit a crime independently of police inducement.
The view of the various justices.
expressed in Sorrells and later in Sherman v. United States, 356 U.S. 369 (19581, United States v. Russell, 411 US. 423 (1973), and Hampton v. United States, 425 US.484 (1976). are discussed in an article by Captain Robert L. Gallaway, Due Process: Objective Entrapment's Trojan Horse, 88 Mil. L. Rev. 103, 104-116 (spring 1980).
lo3SeeAnnot.,61 A.L.R.2d 677 (1958) lo4SeeGroot, note 13, supra; Comment, note 13, supra; Orfield, note 16, supra; Com ment: United States v. Demma: Assertion of Inconsistent Defenses in Entrapment
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
present status of the jurisdictional landscape on the simultaneous assertion of entrapment and denial of the crime is divided into three separate and distinct layers.
The first is a group of cases which permit these defenses to be asserted without re~ervati0n.l~ Second, some cases refuse to permit them to be asserted under any circumstances.lo6 Third, other cases permit the assertion of such defenses under certain circumstances depending mainly on the degree of denial."J7 Before examining the state of the law in various jurisdictions, however, we will benefit from analyzing the subject overall to discover some of the fundamental differences that exist.
Some courts have refused to allow denial and entrapment because, in order to assert entrapment, one must admit commission of the crime.loB Other courts have ruled that entrapment will not be available to one who denies commission of the offense.lo9The dif ference, if intentional, would be substantial.
If the defendant may not deny the commission of the offense, then he can still retain his right to remain silent and simply not testify.
If the defendant must "admit" the commission of the offense then he must take the stand (or enter into stipulation) and judicially confess.
Although prima facie motion for defendant in either case the Government must have established a case at the conclusion of its own evidence to overcome a a finding of not guilty, it is obvious that compelling a to confess judicially eliminates any difficulty the
Cases Allowed, 1975 Utah L. Rev. 962; Murcheson, The Entrapment Defense in Federal Courts: Modern Developments, 47 Miss.
L. J. 573, 609 (1976); Comment: Entrapment: A Critical Discussion, 37 Mo.
L. Rev. 633, 658 (1972); Hardy, Traps of Entrapment, 3 Am.
J. Crim.
Law 165,174 (1974).
lo5Seesection VI1 of this article, infra.
lo6Seesection VIII, infra.
lo7Seesection IX, infra.
la8E.g., United States v. Watson, 489 F.2d 504 (3rd Cir. 1973);United States v. Prieto Olivas, 419 F.2d 149 (5th Cir. 1969);Johnson v. United States, 426 F.2d 112 (7th Cir. 1970); Chisum v. United States, 421 F.2d 207 (9th Cir. 1970);Reeves v. State, 244 So.
2d 5 (Miss.
1971); Mafnas v. State, 149 Ga.
App. 286,254 S.E.2d 409 (1976).
lo9E.g., United States v. Badia, 490 F.2d 296 (1st Cir. 1973); United States v. Pickle, 424 F.2d 529 (5th Cir. 1970); Munroe v. United States, 424 F.2d 243 (10th Cir. 1970); McCarroll v. State, 294 Ala. 87, 312 So.2d 382 (1975); Ivory v. State, 173 So.
2d 759 (Fla. 3rd D.C.A. 1965);People v. Gonzalez, 24 Ill.
App.3d 259,320 N.E. 2d 197 (1974).
97
MILITARY LAW REVIEW
[VOL. 92
Government might have had in meeting the standard of proof beyond a reasonable doubt.
Such a prerequisite to an assertion of entrapment certainly puts the defendant in a quandary.
Should he forego the entrapment defense and hope that the Government has not convinced the jury beyond a reasonable doubt, or should he assert entrapment and take the stand and confess, thereby effec tively relieving the Government of its burden of proof? Requiring an individual to judicially confess has two substantial flaws.
First, to require an individual to confess in order to avail himself of a defense seems a clear violation of an individual's fifth amendment rights against self-incrimination.'1o Second, such a re quirement would seem to frustrate the entire purpose of the entrap ment defense, which is to deter unlawful and overzealous officials from preying upon innocent citizens.
This requirement would in sulate the police from judicial scrutiny, because the defendant, rather than judicially confess, would forsake the entrapment defense."'
Some courts112have applied that rule literally and required the defendant to take the stand and confess before he could assert en trapment.
Despite this, it appears that the two expressions, "ad mit" and "must not deny," were meant to be used interchangeably.
This construction is based on several considerations.
First, it is obvious why such a misunderstanding could arise.
In the vast majority of entrapment cases that reach an appellate court, the evidence which raises entrapment was the defendant's own testimony.
Consequently, faced with this fait accompli, the courts have stated in effect that, once the defendant takes the stand and discusses the offense, he must admit complicity since he gave up his right to remain silent.
Once he is on the stand and subject to cross - examination, the difference between "must admit" and "may not deny" becomes non - existent.
"OSeenote 13, supra "'See Orfield, note 16 supra at 65 - 66; Groot, note 13 supra at 269 et seq.
Concerning the view of the United States Supreme Court on the purposes of the entrapment defense, and the distinction between the subjective and objective tests for entrap ment, seenote 102, supra.
l12SeeUnited States v. Hart, 546 F.2d 798 (9th Cir. 1976); United States v. Staggs.
540 F.2d 1010 19th Cir. 19761.
See also Judge Hufstedler's dissent in United States v.
19811
INCONSISTENT DEFENSES
Second, various jurisdictions have used both terms in stating the req~irement,"~ indicating they viewed the terms as inter changeable.
Third, in Gorin v. United States114 and United States v. Groe~sel,"~ defendants did not take the stand, yet the courts the permitted them to assert denial and entrapment if other evidence raised entrapment.
In Gorin, the court specifically stated that it would have been inconsistent for the accused to take the stand and deny commission of the offense and then assert entrapment.
However, it was not fatally inconsistent for him to claim entrap ment but also to keep silent in. the hope that the jury would find that the Government had not proved its case beyond a reasonable doubt.
The law would permit that much inconsistency.
Such a holding seems eminently correct, in light of the majority opinion in Sorrells v. United States which held that entrapment could be raised under a plea of not guilty,l16 Fourth, other courts have specifically noted in dicta that a defen dant claiming entrapment may not take the stand and deny com mission of the crime.l17 Such decisions imply agreement with Gorin and Groessel that if the defendant merely remains silent he may contest the state's case and still assert entrapment.
Fifth, certain jurisdictions have adopted the converse of the pro position that in order to assert entrapment, one must admit or not deny the commission of the crime.
They have ruled that by asserPaduano, 549 F.2d 145, 151 (9th Cir. 1977),for a discussion of this "manifest error" which "impaired a defendant's constitutionally secured rights."
l13See United States v. Pickle.
424 F.2d 529 (5th Cir. 1970);United States v. Prieto Olivas, 419 F.2d 149 (5th Cir. 1969); United States v. Badia, 490 F.2d 296 (1st Cir. 1973); United States v. Caron, 588 F.2d 851 (1st Cir. 1978); and State v. Mendoza, 109 Ariz. 445, 511 P.2d 627 (1973).
114313F.2d 641 (1st Cir. 1963).
ll5440 F.2d 602 (5th Cir. 1971). cert. denied, 403 U.S. 933 (1970).
`16Sorrells v. United States, 287 U.S. 43
